1212974
Courtenay,_British_Columbia
footnotes              Courtenay is a city on the east coast of Island, in the Canadian province of Columbia. It is the largest city (and only city) in the area commonly known as the Valley, and it is the seat of the Valley Regional District which replaced the Regional District. Courtenay is just  west of the town of Comox,  northeast of the village of Cumberland,  northwest of the unincorporated settlement of Royston, and  northwest of Nanaimo. The city, along with Nanaimo and Victoria is home to Canadian Scottish Regiment (Princess Marys), a Primary Reserve infantry regiment of the Forces.HistoryFirst contactFor thousands of years before the first contact with European explorers, Courtenay had been the home to the people now the First Nation.(Kmoks History & Tradition) The Kmoks people were able to utilize the rich agricultural land to produce crops and proximity to the local waterways allowed for fishing and trade with nearby Nations people. In the language, Komoks means plenty  resulting in the Valley being known as the Land of Plenty.(Comox Valley History) In 1792, Captain Vancouver, anchored the HMS Discovery in what soon would be known as the Comox Harbour and made contact with the First Nations people in the area. In recent years, there has been some speculation whether or not Vancouver was the first explorer to make contact with the people in this area. According to research by Sam Bawlf, it could be that Sir Drake made first contact with them in 1579, on a secret expedition ordered by Queen Elizabeth I.(Early settlersThe settlement of Courtenay began in the spring of 1862. The first settlers were coal miners from Nanaimo who were drawn to the area, because it had been known as one of the best agricultural districts in the Colony. The early settlers relied on the knowledge and help of the local First Nations people. They hired them for general labour and farm work, although they were paid low wages as were most non-white people during that time. Many of the settlers ended up marrying or living with First Nations women who provided trading and social connections to surrounding First Nations people.In 1864, Robert Brown, leading the Island Exploring Expedition, discovered coal deposits in the Comox Valley, and by 1888 Dunsmuir purchased mining claims in the area. He eventually established a mine in Union, later renamed Cumberland, which brought an influx of settlers, and Chinese and Japanese immigrants. During the establishment of the mining and farming industry, the downtown of Courtenay developed on both sides of the Courtenay River, initially on the east side then the west.(Downtown Courtenay) The two sides were eventually connected by a bridge in 1874.(Early 20th centuryCourtenay was officially incorporated as a town on January 1, 1915,( and eventually designated a city in 1953. The city was named after the Courtenay River, which in turn, was named after George William Courtenay, captain of the British ship , which was stationed in the area between 1846 and 1849. From then on, Courtenay continued to grow providing the necessary services for the growing population. On July 12, 1915, a large fire ripped through 5th Street destroying much of the south side of the downtown. After much of the street was rebuilt, another fire hit the south side of 5th Street, again destroying many of the stores.(Earthquake of 1946On June 14, 1946, a 7.3 magnitude earthquake struck just west of Courtenay, with the epicentre located at Plateau. The earthquake was felt as north as Prince Rupert and as far south as Oregon. Many of the towns chimneys were destroyed, as well there was some significant damage to the post office and the Courtenay elementary school. This was the largest earthquake to hit Vancouver Island, and the largest onshore earthquake in Canada. There were only two reported deaths, one Seattle man died of a heart attack and another drowned when his boat capsized due to a resulting wave.(The M7.3 Vancouver Island Earthquake of 1946)GeographyAccording to Canada, the city has a total land area of .(2006 Community Profiles) The city is located on the Columbia Coast and sits on the of Georgia.ClimateThe climate in Courtenay is very similar to that of the rest of Vancouver Island, classified as a marine west coast climate. In the summer months it can sometimes be considered to have a Mediterranean like climate due to the low levels of precipitation and drying in the summer months. In the spring and fall seasons, Courtenay tends to be quite cool, damp, and wet. The high precipitation levels can be attributed to both the oceanic climate and also its close proximity to the Insular Mountain range which results in the shadow effect. Courtenay has quite mild winters, maintaining the cool, damp, and wet characteristics, but temperatures can drop below freezing levels and snow may happen throughout the season due to Arctic air movements.dateApril 2011DemographicsAs of the Canada 2006 Census, there are 21,940 people, 9,750 private households, and 6,335 families residing in the city. The density is . The city has a total of 9,748 private dewllings. The racial makeup of the city is 94.74% non-visible minority, 5.08% Aboriginal (67.3% First Nations and 27.4% Mtis people), 1.53% Chinese, 0.75% Filipino, 0.62% Asian, 0.50% Asian, 0.48% Black, 0.32% Latin Americans, 0.23% Korean, 0.09% Japanese and 0.05% who list themselves as multiple visible minority.(There are 9,750 households, out of which 19.08% are couples with children, 31.74% are couples without children, 31.54% are single person and 17.64% are other. The average household size is 2.2.(In the city the population is spread out with 23.15% under the age of 20, 5.81% from 20 to 24 due to lack of employment opportunities for that age group, 24.27% from 25 to 44, 28.37% from 45 to 64, and 18.37% who are 65 years of age or older. The median age is 43 years compared to 40.8 for BC as a whole. For every 100 females there are 89.7 males and for every 100 females age 20 and over, there are 86.6 males. For every 100 males there are 111.5 females and for every 100 males age 20 and over, there are 115.5 females.(There are 17,135 people in the city with an income, with a median total income of $22,662. Of this income, earnings are 64.7%, government transfers are 16.5%, and other income is 18.8%. There are 11,585 people with earnings and the average overall earnings are $20,529, with an average among full-year full-time earnings of $36,960.(In 2006 it was the 61st largest metropolitan area (which includes Comox and Comox Valley B) and the 69th largest urban area.((2006 Community Profiles (Census agglomeration))EconomyIn its early inception, Courtenays economy relied heavily on the extraction of the natural resources, like coal, logging, fishing, and agriculture. Over the years as this natural resource extraction decreased, Courtenay has focused its economic growth on supplying services to the large retiree community and the military families at CFB Comox, who is the largest employer in the Valley supplying approximately 1,400 jobs.(Business Activity Comox Valley) Tourism has also been steadily increasing and has now become a vital part of the Comox Valley economy. St. Josephs General Hospital, Mount Washington home of the Endangered Island marmot,(Nagorsen, D.W. & NatureServe (Cannings, S. & Hammerson, G.) (2008). . 2008 Red List of Threatened Species.) Crown Isle Golf Course, Kingfisher Resort and Spa and the Coast Westerly Hotel are in the top 15 employers in the Comox Valley providing 1,200 jobs.(Approximately $573.8 milion are spent in the retail industry in the Comox Valley, with half of the sales coming from supermarkets, gas stations, and car sales. The average household income is $59,136 which is 16% less than the BC average and 18% lower than the Canadian average. In Courtenay, 60% of the income sources is employment, 19% from pensions, and 6% coming from investments.(Arts and cultureEvery summer, usually in July, the largest music festival, the Island Music Fest(Island Music Fest) on Vancouver Island takes place in the Comox Valley. Performers and audience members from near and far gather for three days of camping and an eclectic mix of music. There are several other festivals in the area and they include the North Island Festival of Performing Arts, Fiddlefest, Comox Valley Highland Games and the Comox Valley Piano Society puts on performances at the Stan Hagen Theatre.(North Island Festival of Performing Arts)(Fiddlejam)(Comox Valley Highland Games)(Comox Valley Piano Society)The city is home to the Comox Valley Youth Music Centre, originally the Courtenay Youth Music Camp, a two week long annual summer school, which has increased to a six week program.(Comox Valley Youth Music Centre - History) Notable people involved with the centre include Freedman who taught at there 1971-1982, Bellemare (composition), Krall (piano), Argenta (voice), Jensen (trumpet) and Rosnes (piano).(Comox Valley Youth Music Centre - Alumni)The Williams Theatre, located in downtown Courtenay, is the major performance theatre in the Comox Valley.(Sid Williams Theatre) Other theatres include the Rainbow Youth Theatre, the Courtenay Little Theatre and the Stan Hagen Theatre.(Rainbow Youth Theatre)(Courtenay Little Theatre)The Island Regional Library has a branch located in downtown Courtenay. The Courtenay branch offers many services such as free WIFI for library members, computer access, and printing and photocopying stations.(Computer & Internet)AttractionsPaleontologyIn recent years, Courtenay has established itself as a hot spot for paleontology discoveries. Professional and amateur paleontologists have been discovering fossils of pre-historic sea life in Courtenay, and the Comox Valley is considered to be the first stop on the Great Canadian Fossil Trail.(Courtenay Accommodations) Millions of years ago Vancouver Island was submerged under a warm salt-water sea, this habitat provided an excellent home to pre-historic marine life. After the extinction event, that caused the extinction of dinosaurs, Vancouver Island began to be shaped by volcanic activity, tectonic plate movement, and glacial ice movements. This activity and glacial erosion along the Puntledge and Trent rivers have revealed some of that 80-million year old sea floor. This access to the ancient sea bed has provided the opportunity for many great marine dinosaur discoveries, like the Elasmosaur and the Mosasaur.The first major paleontological discovery in Courtenay occurred in 1988 when resident Mike Trask and his daughter discovered the first fossil of an 80 million year old Elasmosaur on the banks of the Puntledge River.(The Great Elasmosaur Find) Over the next few months, the excavation, led by Dr. Roif Ludvigson, revealed a near complete skeleton. The skull and other key bones for identifying the species were in poor condition, and it is still unknown as to what species or genus this Elasmosaur belonged. The original bones and a replica model are on display at the Courtenay & District Museum and Paleontology Center.(Courtenay & District Museum and Paleontology Center)In 1991, during a field trip, Dr. Joe Zanbilowicz discovered a fossilized bone along the Puntledge River and a few more vertebrae were excavated that day. During the summers of 1997 and 1998, excavation led by Dr. Dirk Meckert revealed a near complete Mosasaur skeleton. After analysis of the skeleton began, paleontologists Dr. Meckter and Dr. Besty Nicholls, realized this 80-million year old skeleton was a new kind of Mosasaur that had not yet been discovered. They named this new species of Mosasaur, Kourisodon Puntledgensis, for its unique two extra rows of razor-like teeth and its discovery location.After these two large discoveries, there are still many species of animals being discovered, such as desmatochelys (turtles), jeletzkyi (squids), and multiple species of octopods.(Our Latest Palaeontology News)Museums and art galleriesThe Courtenay and District Museum and Palaeontology Centre(The Courtenay and District Museum and Palaeontology Centre) offers fossil tours of local rivers and historical exhibits. It is open year-round.The Comox Air Force Museum and Heritage Airpark is located in nearby Comox and has exhibitions from the First World War onwards and is open year round.(Comox Air Force Museum) The Heritage Airpark is home to several aircraft and is open from May to September.(Heritage Airpark) Also in Comox is the Comox Archives & Museum which depicts the history of the town.(Comox Archives & Museum)Located in Cumberland is the Cumberland Museum & Archives. The museum which is open year round depicts the history of coal mining in the area.(Cumberland Museum & Archives)Just north of the city is the Nim-Nim Interpretive Centre. Situated on the Puntledge RV Campground, the site was the original home of the now extinct People, it is named for Chief Joe Nim-Nim. The centre highlights the achievements of the First Nations people of the area.(Nim-Nim Interpretive Centre)There are several art galleries in the city. The I-Hos Gallery is run by the Kmoks First Nation and displays modern and traditional BC coastal First Nations art.(I-Hos Gallery) The Comox Valley Community Arts Council helps to support the Comox Valley Art Gallery and the Muir Gallery.(Comox Valley Art Gallery)(Muir Gallery)(Comox Valley Community Arts Council)Provincial parksThere are several Provincial Parks in the area and they include;* Island Nature Provincial Park, about  away, is located on Mitlenatch Island, a small islet in the northern Strait of Georgia* Coleman Provincial Park, about  away, is located south of the mouth of the Oyster River just northeast of Courtenay* Geoffrey Regional Nature Park, about  away, is located on Island* Bay Provincial Park, about  away, is located on Hornby Island* Provincial Park, about  away, is located on the east side of Denman Island, southeast of Courtenay* Provincial Park, about  away, is located on the southeast end of Hornby IslandOther attractionsWoodhus Slough is a noted nature area especially for bird watching.(Woodhus Slough) Walking trails include Nymph Falls Regional Park,(Nymph Falls Regional Park) Seal Bay Regional Nature Park(Seal Bay Regional Nature Park) and the Courtenay Riverway Heritage Walk.(Courtenay Riverway Heritage Walk)The Kitty Coleman Woodland Gardens is a woodland garden that was developed by hand. Bryan Zimmerman spent more than two year clearing the brush on his  lot and using a wheelbarrow to make the paths.(Kitty Coleman Woodland Gardens)Community parks include the Simms Millennium Park and Lewis Park.(Lewis Park) Owned by the city the Simms Millennium Park is a  park that was used during the Second World War as a training area for the D-Day landings.(Simms Millennium Park)Washington Alpine Resort is the largest commercial ski area on Vancouver Island. Each winter season many flock there to enjoy the seasonal sports such as skiing, snowboarding, cross-country skiing, snow tubing, snow shoeing, sledding and more, as well summer attractions such as mountain bike riding and hiking. The resort has a lot of on-mountain accommodation in the Alpine Village.SportsThe Valley Glacier Kings play junior hockey in the Island Junior Hockey League in the Comox Valley Sports Centre. They won the 1993-94 VIJHL League Season Championship and the 1994-95 VIJHL Playoffs. In the 2009-10 they were the North Division Playoff Champions.In 2009 the World U-17 Hockey Challenge played several games at the Comox Valley Sports Centre.GovernmentThe City of Courtenay is governed by a mayor and six member council. As of 2011 the mayor is Greg Phelps.(City of Courtenay Council)Provincially, Don McRae of the Columbia Liberal Party is the Member of the Legislative Assembly for the Comox Valley electoral district. Prior MLAs include Hagen and Gillespie.The city is part of the Island North federal electoral district and is currently represented by John Duncan of the Conservative Party. Prior to that the city was in the ComoxAlberni district.InfrastructureTransportationCourtenay is served by the Valley Transit System, which is managed and run by the BC Transit Authority, and the cost is shared between the Comox Valley Regional District and BC Transit.(Comox Valley Transit System) Although it is quite small with only 13 bus routes, it provides quick and inexpensive transportation throughout the Comox Valley. From the main bus stop, located on Cliffe Avenue in downtown Courtenay, there are buses that go to Cumberland, Royston, and as far as Oyster River.(Regional Map for Comox Valley) BC Transit also operates a handyDART transportation service, for people who have a disability or require extra assistance.(handyDART) In November 2007 as part of a pilot program, the Comox Valley buses were equipped with free wireless Internet access for its passengers.(Comox Valley Transit System FAQ)Within the Comox Valley Ferries has two terminals, one located in Little River, Comox, and the other south of Courtenay in Buckley Bay. The port in Little River provides service for ferry travel between Powell River and Vancouver Island, while the Buckley Bay ferry terminal provides a route between Vancouver Island and Island.(Northern Gulf Islands Schedules)File:Courtenay final 31.jpg|thumb|Landing at AirparkCourtenay has four airports in the area, Comox Valley Airport (CFB Comox),(Comox Valley Airport) Airpark, Airpark Water Aerodrome and (Smit Field) Airport.() From the Comox Valley International Airport, WestJet, Canada, Mountain Air, Coastal Airlines and Express Air provide flights to Vancouver, Calgary, Edmonton, Abbotsford and Campbell River. In recent years during the winter months, CanJet and WestJet have been offering seasonal flights to Vallarta and Cancn, Mexico. Courtenay Airpark and Courtenay Airpark Water Aerodrome are located in downtown Courtenay and are small airports owned by the City of Courtenay, but operated by The Courtenay Airpark Association.(Courtenay Airpark) Courtenay Airpark provides hangar space for recreational fliers and aerial tours of the Comox Valley. In addition Comox Water Aerodrome that has daily flights to and from Vancouver provided by Coast Air. Courtenay (Smit Field) Airport is a small privately owned airport.Rail operate the  Courtenay train on track owned by the Corridor Foundation and operated by the Railway of Vancouver Island (Esquimalt & Nanaimo Railway). The terminus, railway station is at the former Pacific Railway station that was designated a Heritage Railway Station in 1993.(List of Designated Heritage Railway Stations in British Columbia.)The major highway that runs through the city is Highway 19A, the Highway.(Island Highway (19))Health careSt. Josephs General Hospital (SJGH) is located in Comox, but serves as the primary hospital for the Comox Valley and surrounding communities from Bowser to Oyster River. SJGH provides 235 beds, with 110 for acute care and 125 for complex care.SJGH was founded by four nuns from the of St. Joseph of Toronto in 1913, to provide the needed health care to the settlers of the Comox Valley and its active logging industry.(St. Josephs Hospital History) Initially it had room for only 10 patients, but it has continually increased its bed count throughout the years to 235 beds, in addition to expanding its services. Currently SJGH falls under the Island Health Authority, but still maintains its Christian and Catholic principles through its current board of directors, of commitment, compassion, competence, excellence, human dignity, integrity, spirituality, subsidiarity and social responsibility while caring for the whole person.(St. Josephs General Hospital Profile)Today SJGH provides many specialist services including Dermatology, General Surgery, Gastroenterology, Internal Medicine, Obstetrics/Gynaecology, Ophthalmology, Orthopaedics, Paediatrics, Palliative Care, Pathology, Psychiatry, Radiology, and Urology.Emergency servicesCourtenay contracts out its police services to the Canadian Mounted Police. Their main detachment is located in East Courtenay along Ryan Road. This detachment provides policing services to the entire Comox Valley. Courtenay also has an active branch of Stoppers(Comox Valley Crime Stoppers) to help provide the Comox Valley information about recent crimes and a way to provide anonymous tips.Fire services are provided by the Fire Department, and it is one of the five volunteer fire departments that operate in the Comox Valley.(Fire Services) The Courtenay Fire Department has 42 career and paid-on-call firefighters that provide fire suppression, auto extrication, fire safety education, and the issue of fire permits.(AboutFirehall)Courtenay ambulance services are provided by Columbia Ambulance Service.EducationCourtenay has numerous public schools operated by District 71 Comox Valley. In the 2007 school year, School District 71 had 9,197 students enrolled.(Infrastructure) Elementary schools * Arden Elementary K-7* Courtenay Elementary K-7* cole Puntledge Park Elementary K-7* Huband Park Elementary K-7* Queneesh Elementary K-7* Valley View Elementary K-7 Secondary * Georges P. Vanier Secondary 8-12* Lake Trail Secondary 8-10* Mark R Isfeld Secondary 8-12* Sandwick Alternate School Post-secondary Courtenay is home to the largest Island College Campus with approximately 1, 669 students enrolled in credit classes and an additional 1,393 enrolled in short term or vocational courses. The campus is complete with cafeteria, bookstore, library, and the notable Stan Hagen Theatre that holds many community events. The Comox Valley Campus offers many certificate, associate degrees, and bachelor degree programs, and is known for its Bachelors of Nursing program and its Professional Photography Certificate.MediaThere are two newspapers in the city, the Comox Valley Echo and the Comox Valley Record.(Valley Echo Comox Valley Echo)(Comox Valley Record) Radio stations includes CKLR-FM and CFCP-FM.Notable persons* Barbarash, North American press officer for the Liberation Front from mid-1999 until late-2002* Blomgren, Canadian writer who is known for his published fiction and essays* Cattrall, actress, lived in the city until she was 11* Dafoe, NHL goalie* Fletcher, actor, attended Lake Trail Secondary School* Green, baseball player, attended Mark R. Isfeld High School in and played high school baseball for the Parksville Royals of the British Columbia Premier Baseball League* Carol Isfield, recipient of the Cross and Cross Mother in 2000(Carol Isfield)* Klzig, Hockey League goalie* Linton, designer and operator of the first Exchange Trading Systems* McLean, NHL forward* McQuillan, Progressive Conservative party member of the Canadian House of Commons* Medley, Canadian rock musician* Nessman, Canadian male model* Neufeld, musician, member of Fire and Luyas* Onewaystreet, the predecessor to Schizophonic was composed of high school students from the area* Hoy Price, started writing after taking a creative-writing workshop at North Island College at the age of 70ReferencesExternal links*City of Courtenay*Downtown Courtenay (Business Improvement Association website)*Comox Valley Visitor Center*Google Street View(British Columbia)(Brita Kolumbio)(Colombie-Britannique)(British Columbia)(Colmbia Britnica)( )British Columbiasv:Courtenay( ) (British Columbia)
1217155
Din_College
Din College is a two-year, tribally controlled college, serving the 27,000 square-mile (about 70,000 km) Indian Reservation, which spans the states of Arizona, Mexico, and Utah.Its main campus is in Tsaile, an unincorporated community in Apache County, Arizona. It also has seven other campuses on the reservation in Arizona (three in Apache County (Chinle, Ganado, and Window Rock), one in Coconino County (Tuba City), and one in Navajo County (Kayenta)) and New Mexico (one in McKinley County (Crownpoint) and one in San Juan County (Shiprock)). The college is directed by an eight-member Board of Regents confirmed by the Government Services Committee of the Navajo Nation Council. The name Din comes from the traditional name for the Navajo, meaning the people.Current enrollment is 1,830 students, of which 210 are degree-seeking transfer students for four-year institutions.  The main Tsaile campus includes eight 15-room dormitories housing about 150 students: each octagonally shaped unit has a fireplace in the center, and is described by the college as a hooghan away from hogan -- a reference to the traditional circular Navajo hogan dwelling.Scholarships available through the Indian College Fund (AICF) History The college was first opened in 1968 as the Navajo Community College, the first college established by Native Americans for Native Americans. Originally Housed at the Rough Rock Community School while current location was under constructions. Robert Roessel was an advocate for the Navajo language and culture. Although Rosessel was white the Navajo had much respect and considered him a Navajo Elder.(http://www.tribalcollegejournal.org/roessel.htm) He stayed at Rough Rock while the College moved to Tsaile.Ned Hatathli became the first president of Navajo Community College in 1969 when it relocated to its new location in Tsaile. Hatathlis presidency ended when he accidentally shot himself while cleaning his gun on October 16, 1972.Tommy Lewis became president in August 1992 and funding from the BIA was around $4 million a year.  Under his leadership, funding from the BIA increased to about $7.3 million a year in 2000. The usage of the Navajo Language Culture was strengthened and the Board made a decision to use it throughout the institution. Under the 1994 Equity in Education legislation of the US Congress, it became a Land Grant Institution, joining the ranks of the 1864 and 1890 land grant colleges.During the Summer of 1997 the Administration changed their name from Navajo Community College to Din College to reflect their name for themselves meaning The People.In 1998, Din College bestowed its first baccalaureate degrees under the Din Teacher Education Program, accredited under a partnership with Arizona State University.In 1998, the Library was rededicated the Kinyaaanii Charlie Benally.  Lewis became president in  Library.(http://library.dinecollege.edu/)On May 21, 2011, the womens archery team made history by winning the United States college national championship in compound bow. ()  This is believed to be the first time a tribal college team has won the top-level intercollegiate national championship event in any sport. Programs *The Center for Din Studies, whose goal is to apply Navajo  principles to advance quality student learning through  (Thinking),  (Planning),  (Living) and  (Assurance) in study of the Din language, history, and culture in preparation for further studies and employment in a multi-cultural and technological world.*The Uranium Education Program at the Shiprock campus, an empowerment program for Navajo concerning radiation and environmental health issues arising from the legacy of former uranium mining/milling operations and other serious environmental impacts on the Navajo reservation.*The Institute for Integrated Rural Development (IIRD) was established in 1996 by the Din College Board of Regents as part of their Strategic Plan for carrying out their responsibilities as a 1994 Land-Grant Institution. IIRD is charged with developing and administering education, research, economic, and community-based projects that promote and demonstrate sustainability in food production, agriculture sciences, rural community development, health and environment, government, economic development, and natural resource management. Degree programs *(AA) Associate of Art:**Business Administration**Computer Information Systems**Din Studies**Early Childhood Education**Elementary Education**Fine Arts**Liberal Arts**Navajo Language**Social & Behavioral Science**Social Work (Shiprock Campus ONLY)*(AS) Associate of Science: **Computer Science**Environmental Sciences**Biology Option**General Science Option**Health Occupation Option**Mathematics Option**Physics Option**Public Health**Public Health Ed Socio-Cultural Option**Public Health Envir Public Health Option*(AAS) Associate of Applied Science: **Business Management**Computer Science**Office Administration Notable people ;Professors* Morris, author, From the Glittering World: A Navajo Story (1997)* Lee Walters, author, Ghost Singer (1988)* Orlando White, poet, Bone Light (2009)References(External links* Official webpage* Center for Din Studies* Uranium Education Program
1219530
St._Anthony_Hall
St. Anthony Hall, also known as Saint Anthony Hall and The Order of St. Anthony, is a national college literary society also known as the Fraternity of Delta Psi () at colleges in the United States of America. St. Anthony Halls activities foster the social and intellectual development of its undergraduate members by encouraging individual expression, promoting the exchange of ideas by providing a forum for discussion and presentations. At several of its chapters, St. Anthony Hall hosts public series. The first, or Alpha Chapter was founded at University on January 17, 1847, which is the feast day of St. Anthony.In 1879, Bairds Manual characterized the organization as having the reputation of being the most secret of all the college societies. References appear in several Scott Fitzgerald short stories, and the Order has a distinguished architectural inheritance. The organization is often referred to as St. As or the Hall. It has no official religious affiliation. History and chaptersright|thumb|140px|circa 1873 symbol (http://www.archives.upenn.edu/primdocs/upm/upm7100/1873record.pdf) from the University of Pennsylvania Record undergraduate yearbookIn 1847, after the organizations Alpha Chapter was founded on January 17 at University, a Beta Chapter at York University was also founded, but by 1853 had been united with the Alpha.(http://www.answers.com/topic/baird-s-manual-of-american-college-fraternities-1879-delta-psi)  By 1879, Columbia Colleges Record listed the NYU founders alongside its own Columbia students.(http://books.google.com/books?vidOCLC38011776&idcxATAAAAIAAJ&pgRA1-PA29&lpgRA1-PA29&dqdelta+psi)The current undergraduate chapters of St. Anthony Hall, according to its website, are the following:*Alpha: University, New York, New York*Delta: of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania*Epsilon: Trinity College, Hartford, Connecticut*Theta: University, Princeton, New Jersey*Kappa: Brown University, Providence, Rhode Island*Xi: University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill, North Carolina*Phi: of Mississippi, Oxford, Mississippi*Sigma: University, New Haven, Connecticut*Upsilon: of Virginia, Charlottesville, Virginia*Tau: MIT, Cambridge, MassachusettsAt some universities, the Order of St. Anthony maintains a chapter house colloquially referred to as The Hall or St. As, although at MIT, the society is known as Number Six Club in reference to that chapters original founding and residence at No. 6 Louisburg Square in Bostons Beacon Hill neighborhood. According to its national website, St. Anthony Hall originally began as a fraternity dedicated to the love of education and the well-being of its members. Chapters were founded throughout the Northeast, and extended into the South during the mid-19th century. During the Civil War, formal contact ended between Northern and Southern chapters, though contact was restored between remaining and refounded chapters after the War.The Orders history states that many members wore their badges into battle, serving with distinction on both sides, and were often reunited in both pleasant and antagonistic situations throughout the war.*See the Bairds Manual excerpt below for a near-contemporary account of the disposition of the chapters following the Civil War.*Archive photo of Civil War officer killed at Gettysburg, who signed his portrait Yours in Delta Psi.Because their patron, Anthony of Egypt is often depicted with his Tau Cross, the symbol has been used to embellish the architecture of some St. As chapter houses. St. Anthony also became a swineherd, hence Hall members sentimentally regard the pig, one of the Saints attributes, as an informal mascot. However the fraternity has never had any religious affiliation; the inspiration provided by this ascetic saint (and his pig) is solely thematic. As a hermit and founder of monasticism, Anthony is identified with the book of nature and not writing. St. Anthony was the focus of a Roman Catholic Hospital Order which flourished from the 13th to 18th centuries and was responsible for treating the effects of ergot poisoning or St. Anthonys Fire. Todays Alpha chapter is decorated with prints of The Temptation of St. Anthony as well as the mythic symbol the Owl of Minerva. MembershipChapters of St. Anthony Hall demonstrate a range of membership formats and reputations. Whether known on their campuses as social fraternities, clubs, secret societies, or by other models, most nonetheless publicly articulate a literary focus. The chapters exhibit diverse characteristics with regard to campus presence, secrecy, and exclusivity. Yale became co-educational in 1969 and, in 1971, St. As became the earliest Yale society to accept women as members.(St. As occupies an odd status at Yale. It resembles a senior society (see of Yale University student organizations in that its senior members are precluded from joining a senior society; however, it is unique in that it is a three-year society, admitting  members during their sophomore year. See also secret society. It thus had a two-year advantage over the purely senior societies in admitting female members.) The Yale chapters action also accomplished, albeit not without friction, co-education as a permitted status within the national fraternity. A member of St. As at the University of North Carolina became the first person of color to pledge any fraternity at that campus, in 1967.(New York Times news archive)*Other St. As chapters subsequently became co-ed at the following schools: University, the of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, MIT, and Trinity College.*The chapters at University and University, inactive since the 19th century, were both re-founded as co-ed chapters in the 1980s.*The of Pennsylvania, the of Mississippi and the of Virginia chapters remain all-male. St. Anthony Hall chapters accommodate each others different policies, and the national organization lists both types on its website.ActivitiesStudent St. As members at various chapters pursue their literary mandate through different programs. The Columbia, University of North Carolina, and Brown Univesity chapters have published poetry journals. Also at the University of North Carolina, the chapter hosts events open to the community such as Poetry, Prose and Pancakes and Haiku Kung Fu. The Brown University Chapter publishes a literary and visual arts magazine, also available online, called The Sketchbook.The Trinity College chapter endows a St. Anthony Professorship in Art History, several annual prizes for Trinity students, and an annual public lecture, named for Martin W. Clement (Class of 1901). Yales chapter sponsors a public series of lectures every two to three weeks on literature, poetry, art and current affairs in general. (It is compared to but more generalized than the annual Maynard Mack Lecture of Yales Elizabethan Club, down the block, whose sessions with actors and directors focus on Shakespeares era.) The Yale St. Anthony Hall lectures, some co-sponsored with the Review recently have included Talese, A. Powell, Perotta, Kaminsky, Lin, Eggers, Lumsden, Bear, Groarke, OCallaghan, Guare, Messud, Elizabeth Alexander, Deresiewicz, Wilbur, Cole, Adrian, Julavits, Joseph Harrison, Strand, Koestenbaum, Dana Levin, Feldman, Butler, Manning, Orszag, Donaghy, Muldoon, Puryear, Young Pelton, DeLauro, Kagan, Bhagavan Das, Robert Stone, Matthiessen, Shahid Ali, Selzer, Wolf, Andre, Haas, P. De Vecchi, Fingar, Kramer, Deford,  Kennedy, Glck, Cole, Solomon and Christo.(http://opa.yale.edu/bulletin/yale_bulletin_section.aspx?id146&typeVC&pub_id36)(http://www.yale.edu/opa/v36.n20/visiting.html)(http://beineckepoetry.wordpress.com/readings-at-yale-university/)(http://www.yaledailynews.com/articles/view/17166)(http://beineckepoetry.wordpress.com/category/readings-at-yale/)(http://www.yale.edu/opa/newsr/07-11-14-01.all.html)(http://www.yale.edu/opa/v33.n22/story16.html)(http://www.yale.edu/english/events-schlesinger.html) http://www.yale.edu/opa/v35.n25/story10.html   http://opa.yale.edu/news/article.aspx?id6023 The University of Pennsylvania Delta Chapter also hosts an annual lecture series that has recently included guests such as F. Kennedy, Jr. http://media.www.dailypennsylvanian.com/media/storage/paper882/news/2004/04/07/News/Robert.F.Kennedy.Jr.Cheers.Conservation.Efforts-2151605.shtml,  Joseph Rishel, Tierney http://media.www.dailypennsylvanian.com/media/storage/paper882/news/2008/02/13/News/View-From.Inside.The.World.Of.Journalism-3206025.shtml, a Delta Chapter member and the current publisher of Philadelphia Inquirer, and journalist Tucker Carlson. Wolfe also made an impromptu appearance while conducting research for his book am Charlotte Simmons.(Daily Pennsylvanian website)St. Anthony Hall Chapter HousesThe majority of St. Anthony Hall chapters still own the Victorian, Age, Deco, and Beaux Arts chapter houses some of its socially prominent members commissioned from well-known 19th century and early 20th century architects. One of the buildings, at Yale, (its third on that campus), when donated by William Vanderbilt in 1913, was described by the New York Times as the most expensive and elaborate secret society building in the United States. In accordance with the respective traditions of each chapter, St. As is now self-described and referred  to on different campuses as a fraternity (or co-ed fraternity), a literary society, a secret society, or a private club.left|thumb|150px|Hornbostel, circa 1899: Alpha Chapter, New Yorkright|thumb|150px|Heins & LaFarge, 18941913, Sigma Chapter, without dormitory wing, New Havenright|thumb|150px|Heins & LaFarge, 18941913, with later-added dormitory, New Haven. Old York Hall (now Stoeckel Hall) also visible.right|thumb|150px|Haight, 1913current, Sigma Chapter, New Havenleft|thumb|150px|Renwick, 1879: Original Alpha Chapter House, Columbia University, when located in downtown NYC. (Now a restaurant/apartment bldg.)left|thumb|150px|Stone, Carpenter & Willson, 1895, Kappa Chapter, Brown University, Providenceleft|thumb|150px|Gage, 19021904: former St. Anthony Club, New YorkBecton Hall 2007.JPG|left|thumb|150px|Breuer, 1970, showing St. Anthony Tau Cross motif, commissioned by St. As member Henry P. Bectonright|thumb|150px|J.C. Cady, 1878: Epsilon Chapter, Trinity College.St. Anthony Hall Buildings*  Architectural credit may be shared for the Columbia University Chapter prior to 1899, still standing at 29 E. 28th Street, New York.  Either the Firm of James Renwick, Jr., and attributable to the master architects handor at least supervisionor specifically, William Hamilton Russell (18561907), an architect in the firm (and great-nephew of Renwick) and then-recent graduate of St. Anthony Hall. Old photographs show a high stoop arrangement with the figure of an owl on the peaked roof and a plaque with the Greek letters Delta Psi over the windowless chapter room. In 1879 The New York Tribune called it French Renaissance, but the stumpy pilasters and blocky detailing suggest the Neo-Grec style then near the end of its popularity. At the turn of the 20th century, when the building became a club for graduate members of the fraternity and a new undergraduate house was built at 115th Street, a newspaper account described the 28th Street house as a perfect Bijou of tasteful decoration.(New York Times news archive) Upon graduation in 1887, Russell became a protege of his great uncle, Renwick, Jr., the same year Renwick completed his best-known work, St. Patricks Cathedral (NYC). It is likely that Russell contributed work to his fraternitys first chapter house during his apprenticeship.( Another article in the New York Times (1987) asserts that Russell was actually responsible (while in Renwicks firm) for the building.(http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res9B0DE2DF143DF934A1575AC0A961948260) Another of Renwicks proteges, Grosvenor Goodhue, was architect of the Wolfs Head tomb at Yale. Russell later was Partner in his own firm & Russell, founded in 1894. Hornbostel, William Palmer (a St. As member), and Eric Fisher Wood, firm of Wood, Palmer and Hornbostel. (Columbia University Chapter since 1899, late 19th/20th century revivals. In 1996 building #96000484 was added to the National Register of Historic Places as Delta Psi, Alpha Chapter). Eyre, Jr. (University of Pennsylvania Chapter 18891908, Italianate Palazzo.) Cited as first fraternity house built on campus and pictured in the of Pennsylvania Archives.(University of Pennsylvania archives) Near the old Penn campus across the Schuylkill from the current site. Eyre also designed the of Pennsylvania Museum.& Stewardson. (University of Pennsylvania Chapter after 1908, Late Gothic Revival, Late 19th And 20th Century Revivals, added in 2005 to Register of Historic Places building  #05000064 as St. Anthony Hall House.((http://www.nationalregisterofhistoricplaces.com/PA/Philadelphia/state9.html)) Cope & Stewardson served as the architects for numerous other University of Pennsylvania buildings, including the Quadrangle.Described and pictured in George E. Nitzsches 1918 book,University of Pennsylvania: Its History, Traditions, Buildings and Memorials: Also a Brief Guide to Philadelphia (International Printing Company, 1918) J.P. Fuller (Former chapter house of M.I.T. Chapter prior to 20th century, designed 1826; built 183437, Revival, within historic Square.) Cited and pictured on the Boston College website. Cleaveland Cady. (Trinity College Chapter, 1878) Commissioned by member Habersham Coleman, the iron baron, rusticated Romanesque. Cady was also a Trinity Chapter St. Anthony Hall member. He erected several buildings at Yale (see Non-hall below).(Delta Psi website) At a cost of $40,000, it was considered at the time to be one of the most expensive fraternity chapter houses in America. Added in 1985 to the Register of Historic Places, building #85001017 as Saint Anthony Hall, the Epsilon Chapter house is the oldest of the Saint Anthony Hall fraternity buildings. The building has recently undergone extensive interior restorations. An exterior addition, in harmony with the original construction, has been added to comply with local building code requirements. J. C. Cady was also the architect of several prominent buildings in York City, most notably the old Metropolitan Opera House and the south section of the Museum of Natural History.( & LaFarge. Architects George Lewis Heins and Christopher Grant LaFarge (the son of the stained glass artist LaFarge).  (Yale Chapter building from 18941913, no longer extant, but its ornamental iron gates re-used in the 1913 building, Romanesque.) Described in (http://books.google.com/books?idalnup81pmkAC&pgPA123&lpgPA123&dqpatrick+pinnell+yale+anthony&sourceweb&otsMzn6w25dre&sigKRPoISsYFKMPZl6SIOhSU_aDMtE) and (http://books.google.com/books?vidOCLC03691304&idXuQ2g7L-xvIC&pgPA189&lpgPA189&dqdelta+psi) and pictured in the Yale Alumni Magazine. C. Haight (Yale Chapter, circa 1913, a commission of member William Vanderbilt to match the flanking donated dormitories (dated 190306) now part of College, neo-Gothic.) Described in ( and pictured in the Yale University website. Parker Medal namesake J. Harleston Parker, founder with Douglas H. Thomas, Jr. and Arthur W. Rice, of firm Parker, Thomas & Rice.(http://books.google.com/books?idXSSUestFtpkC&pgRA6-PA287&lpgRA6-PA287&dqarchitecture+of+jefferson+county+delta+psi&sourceweb&otsCiwhHnd-sa&sigdB5XlV4gow9tQFfGFpb5loIOB5Q) The Architecture of Jefferson Country: Charlottesville and Albemarle County, Virginia By K. Edward Lay, UVA Press, ISBN 0-8139-1885-5, p. 287   (University of Virginia, 1902, Revival or Jeffersonian. First fraternity house built on campus.(http://www.google.com/search?qcache:0pJWjB9ch78J:www.charlottesville.org/Modules/ShowDocument.aspx%3Fdocumentid%3D1964+charlottesville.org+anthony+hall&hlen&ctclnk&cd2&glus)) It is pictured on the University of Virginia website. White, firm of Mead, and White. (Former Williams College chapter), currently houses Center for Development Economics,(http://www.williams.edu/cde/) 1886, Old English-style.)(http://209.85.165.104/search?qcache:apszQrPZOewJ:archiveswilliams.edu/williamshistory/cde.php+st.+anthony+hall+architect&hlen&ctclnk&cd1&glus) S.E. Gage (http://www.nyc.gov/html/lpc/downloads/pdf/calendar/02_06_07.pdf) (16 East 64th Street, New York, originally erected 187879 and redesigned by Gage between 19021904 in the Neo-Federal style for St. Anthony Hall.)(http://www.elliman.com/MainSite/Company/News_Detail.aspx?ID1043) Until around 1990, it was the St. Anthony Club, a city club for St. As members. Interior details described include limestone columns, a detailed, wrought-iron front door and gate, a limestone and marble entry foyer, and a bronze and wrought-iron main staircase. In addition, the townhouse boasted ornate moldings, high ceilings, skylights, oak Versailles parquet floors and six wood-burning fireplaces.( It is also included in a walking tour of 64th Street(http://www.nyc-architecture.com/walks-ues.htm) The five-story,  brownstone is on a historically distinguished residential street.(http://soc.qc.cuny.edu/Maps/footnote.htmlhttp://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res9E06EFDB173DF93AA25755C0A962958260) In the early 1970s, the College Club leased space in the St. Anthony Club.(http://www.google.com/search?qcache:r0Z2k8oloscJ:alum.barnard.edu/site/PageServer%3Fpagename%3Dalu_groups_bccny+barnard+club+anthony+club&hlen&ctclnk&cd1&glus)Carpenter, and Willson, (Kappa Chapter, Brown University Chapter, 154 Hope Street, Rhode Island, erected in 1895, Revival). Originally a private residence, then until 1969 owned by University as its administration building formerly named Taft House for its first owners Robert W. and Alice Taft.  Unfortunately, an extensive formal garden to its west was replaced with parking. Renamed King House in 1974 in honor of Shaw King, former dean of Pembroke College.(http://www.brown.edu/Administration/News_Bureau/Databases/Encyclopedia/search.php?serialB0670) Historic American Buildings Survey data.(http://memory.loc.gov/cgi-bin/ampage?collIdpphhdatapage&fileNameri/ri0200/ri0262/data/hhdatapage.db&recNum0&itemLinkS?pp/hh:@field(TITLE+@od1(Robert+W++Taft+House,+154+Hope+Street,+Providence,+Providence+County,+RI)))Related Non-Hall Campus Buildings Additional Josiah Cleaveland Cady. An Epsilon Chapter (Trinity College) member, Cady in 1873 built the Yale Sheffield Scientific Schools first new building, North Sheffield Hall, on what had been the gardens of the Town-Sheffield mansion. This was followed by his Winchester Hall (1892) and Sheffield Chemical (189495). Of these, only the latter, Sheffield Chemical, is still standing, renovated and renamed Arthur K. Watson Hall. Breuer. Subsequent to the merger of the Sheff with Yale College, but within its original precincts, Yale St. As Chapter member and benefactor Henry P. Becton (BS 1937), son of Dickinson co-founder Maxwell Becton, donated the Becton Center (designed by Breuer), opened in 1970, replacing Winchester Hall and North Sheffield, mentioned above.  Breuer cenceived the building ...as a wall that folded horizontally and vertically, with pipes and ducts located in the folds...  Located at 15 Prospect Street, the buildings most distinctive feature is an arcade of monumental Tau Cross-shaped concrete columns designed to invite pedestrians. It appears as a visual reference to the benefactors society, whose emblem is the Tau Cross; the buildings are within each others view along the axis formed by Prospect and College Streets. Described and pictured in the Yale University website.(http://images.google.com/imgres?imgurlhttp://www.facilities.yale.edu/images/BFS/1525.jpg&imgrefurlhttp://www.facilities.yale.edu/Campus/Building1.asp%3FlstBldg%3D1525&h2048&w1536&sz594&hlen&start11&tbnidCks4UNZE4tMFjM:&tbnh150&tbnw113&prev/images%3Fq%3Dbecton%2Bcenter%26gbv%3D2%26svnum%3D10%26hl%3Den)(http://images.google.com/imgres?imgurlhttp://www.library.yale.edu/science/library/bectlrg.gif&imgrefurlhttp://www.library.yale.edu/science/library/engdirections.html&h200&w247&sz41&hlen&start8&tbnidpuyl8NJCCwbZWM:&tbnh89&tbnw110&prev/images%3Fq%3Dbecton%2Bcenter%26gbv%3D2%26svnum%3D10%26hl%3Den) A late 19th/early 20th century chapter house of the University of Mississippis St. Anthony Hall Phi Chapter subsequently was an on-campus childhood home of later Nobel Laureate author Faulkner, although Oak is better known for having been his home when he achieved greatness. The older house was a large brick turreted edifice where the Alumni Center Hotel now stands. The Falkners lived in it during the period 191222 when fraternities were outlawed and was the first building of note that incoming freshmen saw when they walked from the train station into campus. It and a successor burned down. The Cofield photographic Collection 978-0-916242-02-2, p. 58, cites Faulkners younger brother, Dean Faulkner, that his brothers room was in the tower. Referenced in University of Mississippi photographic archive.Exclusions and Obsolete ChaptersThe Delta Psi Fraternity at the University of Vermont was founded in 1850 by Professor John Ellsworth Goodrich and was always unrelated(http://www.answers.com/topic/baird-s-manual-of-american-college-fraternities-1879-delta-psi-vermont) It also is apparently only recently defunct.In 1879, Bairds Manual (see Wikisource, the free library of source texts.(http://www.answers.com/topic/baird-s-manual-of-american-college-fraternities-1879)), contained an extensive Delta Psi/St. Anthony Hall chapter list.  Bairds characterized the organization, at that time, as having the reputation of being the most secret of all the college societies.Chapters at the end of the 19th century were:Alpha, Columbia College, 1847.Beta, New York University, 1847 (closed 1853).Gamma, Rutgers College, 1848 (closed 1850).Delta, Burlington College, 1849; transferred to Delta, University of Pennsylvania, 1854.Epsilon, Trinity College (Connecticut), 1850.Eta, South Carolina College, 1850 (closed 1861).Theta, Princeton College, 1851 (closed 1863).Iota, Rochester University, 1851 (closed 1895).Kappa, Brown University, 1852 (closed 1853).Lambda, Williams College, 1853 (closed 1969).Sigma, Randolph-Macon College, 1853 (closed 1861).Xi, North Carolina University, 1851 (closed 1863).Psi, Cumberland University, 1858 (closed 1861).Phi, University of Mississippi, 1855.Upsilon, University of Virginia, 1860.Sigma, Sheffield Scientific School (i.e. Yale), 1868.Theta, Washington-Lee University, 1869.Bairds 1999 edition amends the last listing for Washington and Lee as Beta (defunct).The Xi Chapter was re-founded in 1926, as was the Phi Chapter, which had become extinct in 1912. The Kappa Chapter at Brown University was re-founded in 1983,(Brown University newsite) and the Theta Chapter was re-founded at Princeton University in 1986.The 1999 edition of Bairds appeared unaware of the re-founding of Theta, erroneously listing that as Thetas last year.Bairds text also noted information regarding the effects of the Civil War,  then just forty years paston the Order, and contemporary references to several of the fraternity chapter buildings that still exist today: The Beta Chapter was declared extinct in 1853, and its members affiliated with the Alpha. The Gamma and Theta disbanded. The Alpha has a fine chapter house in East Twenty-eighth Street, New York City.( The Epsilon has one of the most expensive chapter houses in the country,(Delta Psi website) $40,000 having been given for that purpose by one of the members. The Kappa Chapter is generally repudiated by the fraternity, but its official existence was recognized in the catalogue draft of 1876. The Southern Chapters were closed by the war, and only the Phi and Upsilon were revived at its close. The Lambda owns a chapter house,(http://www.williams.edu/library/archives/williamshistory/stanthonyhallicon.jpg) and the Iota and one or two others have building funds. (1879 text, from Wikisource.)In popular culture* The society tabloid Gawker said In the constellation of collegiate societiesfraternities, sororities, eating clubs, final clubs, and the likefew are more exclusive, and WASPy, as St. Anthony Hall, or St. As as it is commonly known...* Delta Brother Digby Baltzell coined the term, WASP in his 1964 book The Protestant Establishment: Aristocracy and Caste in America.* In December 1967, during a week-long fellowship on campus, then-California Governor Reagan was filmed for public television informally debating Yale students at the Yale St. Anthony Hall.  Nancy Reagan is also present, as the Yalies quiz the Governor on Vietnam and various social justice issues.(Yale Alumni Magazine website)* OHara, in his 1960 novel Ourselves to Know, uses St. Anthony Hall membership in the characterizations of the protagonists:  Did you join a fraternity at Penn? I said. Yes I did.  St Anthony-Delta Psi.  But I think they were sorry that they invited me... --- I happened to know, because I had seen it, that he had a Delta Psi Tea Company gold charm on his watch chain, but the reason he did not show it was one of delicacy; in 1908 they had not accepted his resignation but he kept the insigne hidden... --- He and Robert quickly looked at each others watch-chain and the Delta Psi charm and smiled. You know, Ive been meaning to write you a letter... (Tea Company was a then-used appellation referring to the fraternitys Tau Cross emblem.)* During the Gold Rush Fall of 1897 London was a tenant in Dawson of two mining engineers who were graduates of Yale named Latham Bond and Whitford Bond. Among the other cabin residents was Oliver LaFarge, son of LaFarge. The three men had the cabin designated a chapter house. Thus much of the period that London was in the Klondike he was a St. Anthonys guest. The cabin residents inspired many characters in London stories including Call of the Wild.* The St. Rays fraternity in Wolfes Am Charlotte Simmons is purportedly modeled after the Delta Chapter St. As at the University of Pennsylvania where Wolfe attended a fraternity cocktail party while conducting research for the book in 2001.*Lisa Birnbach, ed. The Preppy Handbook, Workman Publishing, 1980. St. As appeals to the cool element of Preppies at Yale; this means Preppies who dont iron their shirts. It isnt rowdy: parties there conform to the intellectual self-image Yalies hold dear.*Scott Fitzgerald, in several short stories, refers to the Pump and Slipper, an annual party at the Yale Chapter:**May Day in Tales of the Jazz Age A man with prominent teeth cut in. Edith inhaled a slight cloud of whiskey. She liked men to have had something to drink; they were so much more cheerful, and appreciative and complimentarymuch easier to talk to. My names Dean, Philip Dean, he said cheerfully. You dont remember me, I know, but you used to come up to New Haven with a fellow I roomed with senior year, Gordon Sterrett. Edith looked up quickly. Yes, I went up with him twiceto the Pump and Slipper and the Junior prom.**Bobs Her Hair Warren was nineteen and rather pitying with those of his friends who hadnt gone East to college. But, like most boys, he bragged tremendously about the girls of his city when he was away from it. There was Genevieve Ormonde, who regularly made the rounds of dances, house-parties, and football games at Princeton, Yale, Williams, and Cornell; there was black-eyed Roberta Dillon, who was quite as famous to her own generation as Hiram Johnson or Ty Cobb; and, of course, there was Marjorie Harvey, who besides having a fairylike face and a dazzling, bewildering tongue was already justly celebrated for having turned five cart-wheels in succession during the last pump-and-slipper dance at New Haven.**A Short Trip Home, Evening Post, January 17, 1927. Joe Jelke and two other boys were along, and none of the three could manage to take their eyes off her, even to say hello to me. She had one of those exquisite rose skins frequent in our part of the country, and beautiful until the little veins begin to break at about forty; now, flushed with the cold, it was a riot of lovely delicate pinks like many carnations. She and Joe had reached some sort of reconciliation, or at least he was too far gone in love to remember last night; but I saw that though she laughed a lot she wasnt really paying any attention to him or any of them. She wanted them to go, so that thered be a message from the kitchen, but I knew that the message wasnt comingthat she was safe. There was talk of the Pump and Slipper dance at New Haven and of the Princeton Prom, and then, in various moods, we four left and separated quickly outside. I walked home with a certain depression of spirit and lay for an hour in a hot bath thinking that vacation was all over for me now that she was gone; feeling, even more deeply than I had yesterday, that she was out of my life.*The exclusive Hamilton House from the hit tv show Girl was based on St. Anthony Hall.*The cover art of rock band Weekends first album is a photo of the Columbia Chapter chandelier.*1923 MIT campus newspaper reference to Select Wittstein providing music for the Pump and Slipper and the Yale Prom in New Haven.*Article purporting to describe the Columbia and Yale chapters, Daily News.* Mentioned various times in the 2010 novel,  Octopus Summer, by W. Malcolm Dorson (brother of the Delta Chapter, University of Pennsylvania)See also*secret societies in North America*http://www.archives.upenn.edu/primdocs/upm/upm7100/1873record.pdf  Reference in 1873 volume University Record (University of Pennsylvania), p. 13, 2nd column, under section Secret Fraternities, eight unnamed members.*Robbins, Alexandra. Secrets of the Tomb: Skull and Bones, the Ivy League, and the Hidden Paths of Power. Back Bay Books, 2003. ISBN 0-316-73561-2                                               oReferencesExternal links*St. Anthony Hall National Website* A photo comparison of William Burges Tower House and the St. Anthony Hall chapter House of College (Connecticut), by the architect William Burges.*Trinity College (Epsilon chapter)* Brown University (Kappa Chapter)* University of Mississippi (Phi Chapter)* Yale College (Sigma Chapter)*Massachusetts Institute of Technology (Tau Chapter)* University of North Carolina (Xi Chapter)
1222164
Thain_Wendell_MacDowell
 laterwork     Thain Wendell MacDowell, VC , DSO (September 16, 1890 &ndash; March 27, 1960), was a Canadian recipient of the Cross, the highest and most prestigious award for gallantry in the face of the enemy that can be awarded to British and Commonwealth forces.OverviewThain Wendell MacDowell was born in Lachute, Quebec, on September 16, 1890. His early days were spent in the Brockville area, where he was educated at Collegiate Institute. He later attended the of Toronto, where he joined the Canadian Officer Training Corps as an Officer Cadet of Queens Own Rifles of Canada. After graduating with a of Arts in 1914, he enlisted and was commissioned in the 38th (Ottawa) Canadian Infantry Battalion (now perpetuated as Cameron Highlanders of Ottawa). During service in France in 1916, he was awarded the Service Order on the Somme, and the following year, promoted to Major, he won the Victoria Cross at Vimy Ridge on 9. After the war, Colonel MacDowell served as an executive of several mining and chemical companies, and from 1923-1928 he acted as private secretary to the Minister of National Defence. He was placed on the retired list as a Lieutenant-Colonel. In July 1929, he married Norah Jean Hodgson, of Montreal. He and his wife, first lived in Toronto, but moved to Montreal in 1931. He had two sons, Thain H, and Angus J, who still live in Montreal (2007). His wife died on November 1, 1983.  He died in Nassau, the Bahamas, on March 28, 1960. Colonel MacDowell is buried at Oakland Cemetery (R.R.3, Brockville, Ontario, Canada. Anglican Section 3. Lot 112) in the Richardson family plot. The grave is marked by a headstone.Colonel MacDowells Victoria Cross medal is on display at the University of Toronto, Toronto, Ontario. There is a plaque in his honour on corner of Highway 2 and Church Street in Maitland, Ontario.Victoria Crossright|thumb|175px|Photo by Terry MacdonaldOne of four soldiers to earn the Victoria Cross in the of Vimy Ridge, (the others were Wellwood Sifton, Johnstone Milne and George Pattison), MacDowell was 26 years old, and a captain in the 38th (Ottawa) Battalion, Expeditionary Force during the World War when  he was awarded the Cross.On 9 April 1917 at Ridge, France, Captain MacDowell, with the assistance of two runners (company orderlies, Pvts. James T. Kobus and Arthur James Hay, both of whom were awarded the DCM for their part) reached the German position ahead of his company. After destroying one machine-gun nest he chased the crew from another. MacDowell then spotted one German going into a tunnel. At the base of the tunnel, MacDowell was able to bluff the Germans to think he was part of a much larger force, resulting in the surrendering of two German officers and 75 German soldiers. He sent the prisoners up out the tunnel in groups of 12 so that Kebus and Hay could take them back to the Canadian line. Seeing that he had been fooled, a German prisoner grabbed a rifle and tried to shoot one of the runners. The German was then shot and killed. Although wounded in the hand, MacDowell continued for five days to hold the position gained, in spite of heavy shellfire, until eventually relieved by his battalion. He was promoted to the rank of Major following his actions at Vimy Ridge. He later achieved the rank of Lieutenant-Colonel of the Frontenac Regiment from Ontario.References* On the Battlefields, From the archives of Macleans Magazine, Edited by Michael Benedict, Penguin Canada, 2002 ISBN 0-14-301341-6, page 100External links* Despatch written by Capt. MacDowell describing the events* MacDowell Plaque* Legion Magazine article on Thain Wendell MacDowell*  Find-A-Grave profile for Thain Wendell MacDowell* Also see University of Toronto Soldiers Tower: http://www.alumni.utoronto.ca/groups/tower.htm#memorial
1224994
Ray_Parer
Raymond John Paul Parer AFC (18 February 1894  4 July 1967), was an Australian aviator.Parer was born in Melbourne, and developed an interest in aviation at an early age. He enlisted in the Flying Corps in 1916, initially as a mechanic, but was soon accepted to train as a pilot. His initial training was conducted at Cook. He was sent to England, and served as a pilot there, particularly in the test pilot role.After the end of War I, the Australian government offered a prize of 10000 for the first flight from England to Australia. He paired with John McIntosh, and, although leaving well after the event had been won, they arrived in Darwin on 2 August 1920. Their aircraft was an DH-9, and theirs was the only other entrant to successfully complete the race. He was later awarded the Air Force Cross for this feat.(Its an Honour - Air Force Cross)Parer was also a pioneer of aviation in Guinea, one of the most hostile environments to operate an aircraft anywhere on earth. Aviation in the country at that time was chiefly involved with the gold mining industry, which was thriving in the 1920s. Parer set up business there, and is reputed to have been the first pilot to fly over the Stanley Range.In 1934, he participated in the Air Race from England to Australia, this time teamed with Hemsworth, flying a Fox. They departed on 20 October 1934, arriving at the destination, Melbourne, on 13 February 1935. Parer then returned to New Guinea, however the advent of War II found him once again in military service, this time in the Australian Air Force.  Due to his health he was made a reserve, since he could not fly he turned to the sea.  He was an engineer aboard the Melanesia, which delivered supplies and undertook reconnaissance along New Guineas northern coastline.(Keith Isaacs, Parer, Raymond John Paul (1894 - 1967), Australian Dictionary of Biography, Volume 11, Melbourne University Press, 1988, pp 133-134.)After the war he purchased a ketch in Darwin and embarked in pearl exploration in the Torres Strait.  From 1941 until 1951 he skippered a barge for the Department of Works around the Papua-New Guinea coast.   He then worked on tourist vessels on the Great Barrier Reef, Queensland as an engineer.  From 1956-58 he returned to Papua New Guinea to work in the oil exploration industry.  He spent the last years of his life running two small farms at Mount Nebo, Queensland.(Keith Isaacs, Parer, Raymond John Paul (1894 - 1967), Australian Dictionary of Biography, Volume 11, Melbourne University Press, 1988, pp 133-134.)ReferencesAffleck, A. H., (1964) The Wandering Years, MelbourneEustis, N., (1969) The Greatest Air Race: England-Australia 1919, Adelaide,Isaacs, K (1988)Parer, Raymond John Paul (18941967), Australian Dictionary of Biography, Volume 11, Melbourne University Press, 1988, pp 133134.Wixted, E. P.,(1985) The North-West Aerial Frontier 1919-1934, Brisbane .(External links*Tom Campbell Black*75th Anniversary of the Great Air Race October 1934 Tom Campbell Black
1228933
Best_of_Bee_Gees
Best of Bee Gees is the first compilation album of international hits by the Gees.  Brother Robin Gibb had left the group after the completion of the previous release, Odessa, and the timing was right for a compilation while the remaining brothers worked towards their next original album, Cucumber Castle.The original 1969 vinyl release included the Bee Gees 1966 Australian top ten hit Spicks and Specks, but due to licensing issues with Festival Records in Australia, the groups 1969 hit Tomorrow, Tomorrow was substituted on the Polydor CD release.The album is noted by fans for its bad stereo mix of the song Words, which increased the vocals so much that the percussion was lost in the background. This is the only album/CD with this mix. All future compilations have the proper stereo mix which is more balanced.Melouney, although playing guitar on most of the tracks, is not pictured on the front or back cover as he had departed the group a year earlier. With the release of Greatest Hits: The Record in 2001, this CD went out of print for several years until Rhino reissued it in November 2008 with the same tracks as the Polydor CD. Three of the thirteen tracks from the combined vinyl/CD Best of Bee Gees do not appear amongst the forty seven tracks on Their Greatest Hits: The Record: I Cant See Nobody and Every Christian Lion Hearted Man Will Show You had only actually been the B-sides of other hits on Best of Bee Gees, while Tomorrow, Tomorrow had charted but had never reached the top 20 in the charts of the UK, USA nor Australia. In October 2010, it was listed at No. 16 in the book, Best Australian Albums.()Track listing#Holiday (Barry & Robin Gibb)#Gotta Get a Message to You#I Cant See Nobody (Barry & Robin Gibb)#Words#Started a Joke# (Original vinyl LP only) Spicks and Specks (Barry Gibb) / (Original CD only) Tomorrow, Tomorrow (Barry & Maurice Gibb)#First of May#World#Massachusetts#To Love Somebody (Barry & Robin Gibb)#Every Christian Lion Hearted Man Will Show You#York Mining Disaster 1941 (Barry & Robin Gibb)Except where stated all songs written by Barry, Robin & Maurice GibbReferencesof Bee Geesof Bee Geesof Bee Geesof Bee Geesof Bee Geesof Bee Gees
1232465
Very_Best_of_the_Bee_Gees
Very Best of the Bee Gees is an album by the Gees. It was released in 1990 by label Polydor. This compilation was assembled from the box set from the Brothers Gibb: A History in Song released simultaneously. The new stereo mixes for World, Words and Ive Gotta Get A Message to You found on the box set are the same mixes used here. The album was only released in Europe and was a big seller in the U.K., charting several times over the years since its release in 1990.Track listing# New York Mining Disaster 1941# To Love Somebody# Massachusetts# World# Words# Ive Gotta Get a Message to You# First of May# Dont forget to Remember# Saved by the Bell# Run to Me# Jive Talkin# Nights on Broadway# You Should be Dancing# How Deep is Your Love# More than a Woman# Stayin Alive# Night Fever# Too Much Heaven# Tragedy# You Win Again# Ordinary Lives
1236501
David_R._Beatty
David Ross Beatty, OBE, MA, CFA (born 1942) is an experienced global businessman with extensive Board experience, he is also the Conway Director of the Clarkson Centre for Business Ethics and Board Effectiveness at the Rotman School of Management at the of Toronto.Born in Ontario, he was educated at Canada College, the of Trinity College (B.A. 1965), and Cambridge University (M.A. 1967). He has been awarded numerous honorary degrees and awards - most notably he is an Officer of the of the British Empire and honorary Consul-General is New Guinea.He currently serves as a professor at The Rotman School of Management at the of Toronto and Managing Director of the Canadian Coalition for Good Governance.Beatty has been a director of a variety of trans-national corporation, they are:*of Montreal*FirstService*Holdings Limited*Goldcorp*Mining*Mining*Securities Institute*Group Capital*Cambridge Shopping Centres LimitedAdvisor or Trustee*Canadian Corporate Funding Limited*Director, Institute of Corporate Directors*The Toronto Club*Vice-Chairman of the Peter F. Drucker Foundation in Claremont, California and founding Chairman in Canada*Founding Chairman of Orogen Minerals Limited a natural resources company (oil, gas, gold and nickel) listed on the Australian Stock Exchange and 51% owned by the Government of Papua New Guinea*Chairman and CEO of Old Canada Investment Corporation Limited a closed end fund traded on the TSE*President, Weston Foods a $2 billion CAD food processing company employing 12,000 people with 40 plants in Canada and the United States. Weston Foods is part of Canadas 4th largest company George Weston Limited of which Mr. Beatty was a Director until his retirement.*President, Gardiner Group Capital, a family holding company with interests in the oil and gas industry, hotels, and fast foods.*Management consultant in Canada and the USA*Director of the Central Planning Officeand Economic Advisor to the Prime Minister in Papua New Guinea during the transition from colonial status to self government and Independence. First Chairman of the Ok Tedi Development Corporation and an architect of the Governments mineral taxation strategy.*McKinsey & Co. and Chairman of Canada Consulting Group*Senior Transport Economist and Assistant Editor Second Five Year Plan in the Central Planning Office of the Government of TanzaniaInterests*Honorary Consul General for New Guinea in Canada*Past Chairman Canada College, Toronto*Past Director of the Gallery of Ontario & The George R. Gardiner Museum of Ceramic ArtsEducation*1965-1967 Queens College, Cambridge M.A. in economics and ODI-Nuffield Fellowship upon graduation.*1960-1965 Trinity College, Toronto B.A. in Political Science and Economics and Canadian Citizenship Award upon graduation as well as University Honour Award for outstanding contributions to undergraduate life.*1950-1960 Canada College, Toronto and entered university with the Pat Strathy Memorial Scholarship in Mathematics and PhysicsBoard Experience (29 companies  Chairman of 5)*Chairman, of Montreal*Canadian Corporate Funding Limited*Goldcorp*Thistle Mining*Ivanho Cambridge Shopping Centres*Garbell Holdings Limited*Gardiner Group Capital*FirstService Corp*Canadian Securities Institute*Inmet Mining Corporation*Qubecor Media Inc*Founding Chairman, Selwyn Mines Limited, Sydney Australia (ASX)*Strongco*Marine BioProducts Limited*Founding Chairman, Orogen Minerals Limited, Port Moresby, Papua New Guinea*Western Garnet*Chairman & CEO, Old Canada Investment Corporation Ltd*Medical Foods*MDS Associates*Bancomer*Invesprint*Chairman, Ghana Gold*Spar Aerospace*Chairman, Comstream in San Diego, California*George Weston Limited*Scotts Hospitality*Viewstar Inc.*Rostland Real Estate*Ryerson OilSource: The Government of Canada http://strategis.ic.gc.ca/epic/internet/inoec-bce.nsf/en/oe01339e.html
1240091
Lowell_Green
web         http://www.lowellgreen.com/Lowell Green (born 7 July 1936) is a Canadian personality.() He hosts a conservative morning show on Ottawa radio station CFRA, and has also syndicated programming to several other Canadian radio stations.Green was born in Ann Arbor, Michigan, States, to Canadian parents, and immigrated to Canada.Green graduated from Macdonald Agricultural College near Montreal in 1956. He started his radio career in Brantford, Ontario, subsequently moving to stations in Sudbury and Montreal. In Montreal, Green won awards for his coverage of the mining disaster in Scotia.()Green arrived at CFRA in 1960 as a news and farm reporter. In 1966, he began hosting Greenline, and eventually became the longest-running open line talk show host in America. He retired briefly from radio in the 1980s, but returned in 1990.He attempted to win the Liberal party nomination for the Pontiac riding in the 1968 federal election but lost this bid to Lefebvre.()On 13 December 1984, Green ran for the Liberal Party in a provincial by-election in Ottawa Centre. He came third, behind the New Democratic Party and the Progressive Conservative candidates, with 26.6% of all votes cast. Green blamed this loss on his sharp personality and low voter turnout.()In 1993, Green returned to CFRA, and has hosted The Lowell Green Show ever since.Bibliography* Death in October. Renfrew, Ontario: General Store, 1996. ISBN 1-894439-19-8* The Pork Chop and Other Stories: A Memoir. Carp, Ontario: Creative Bound Resources, 2005. ISBN 1-894439-19-8* How the Granola-crunching, Tree-hugging Thug Huggers are Wrecking Our Country! Carp, Ontario: Creative Bound Resources, 2006. ISBN 1-894439-30-9* Its Hard to Say Goodbye. Carp, Ontario: Creative Bound Resources, 2007. ISBN 1-894439-37-6* Hoodwinked Carp, Ontario: Spruce Ridge, 2009. ISBN 9780981314907* Mayday. Mayday: curb immigration and stop multiculturalism, or its the end of the Canada we know. Carp, Ontario: Spruce Ridge, 2010. ISBN 9780981314914ReferencesExternal links*CFRA Radio: Lowell Green Show information** http://www.cbsc.ca/english/decisions/2006/061215.php * http://www.cbsc.ca/english/decisions/2009/090206a.php Canadian Broadcast standards Council Decisions re Lowell Green
1242740
Bolson_tortoise
The Bolson tortoise (Gopherus flavomarginatus), also called the Mexican giant tortoise or Yellow-margined tortoise, is a species of tortoise from America.  Of the four North American tortoise species, it is the largest, having a carapace length of about .  It lives in a region of the Desert known as the de Mapim, which is located in north-central Mexico. DiscoveryThe Bolson tortoise was discovered only in 1959.  The legend is that a group of biologists working in the Bolsn de Mapim were at a ranch and saw chickens eating out of a large tortoise shell.  They inquired about the origin of the shell and the locals responded by saying that it was, la tortuga grande del desierto, the big turtle of the desert.In 1979 the 340,000 hectare Mapimi Biosphere Reserve was created to protect the Bolson Tortoise and other unique flora and fauna of the Bolsn de Mapim.  Despite this designation, cattle ranching and mining still occur in the Reserve.  Whether this is detrimental to the tortoise is not known.Declining populationThe most recent research, published in 1991 from data collected in 1983, estimates that fewer than 10,000 tortoises remain in the wild.  Populations have declined mostly due to overcollecting for food and the pet trade.  Incursion of roads, railroads and agricultural development have accelerated the decline of the species in the last 40 years.  In the central portion of its range locals are keenly aware of the tortoises protected status and aid in its conservation.  However, in the northeastern portion of its range, near La Sierra Mojada, populations of the tortoise are low.  It is believed that tortoises are still collected and eaten in this area.  Additionally, extensive brush clearing operations are being conducted to make way for cattle grazing. In 2008, following the construction of federally subsidized ethanol plants, extensive corn farming operations began within the Mapimi Biosphere Reserve. Farms have been tilled in tortoise habitat, despite its protected status.  Appleton tortoisesIn the fall of 2006, 26 Bolson Tortoises were translocated from the Audubon Appleton-Whittell Research Ranch in Arizona to Turners Armendaris Ranch in south-central Mexico, a Chihuahuan desert environment within the prehistoric range of this species.  These tortoises, known as the Appleton tortoises in commemoration of Ariel Appleton, a champion of Bolson tortoise conservation, were originally brought to Arizona from Durango, Mexico by Dr. David Morafka in 1973.  Four tortoises from the Appleton population were established at the Living Desert Museum in New Mexico.  Both locations have active breeding programs in place.RewildingThe Bolson Tortoise was recently brought to the worlds attention when in August, 2005 a provocative article on rewilding appeared in the journal Nature (Donlan, et al., 2005) proposing that megafauna that went extinct in North America at the close of the Pleistocene (~12,800 years ago) be reintroduced to the continent to create a Pleistocene Park.  The Bolson tortoise was the first species proposed for this restoration effort.  The tortoise is unique in that, unlike mammoths, sabre-toothed tigers and giant ground sloths, it is not extinct.  The Turner Endangered Species Fund, who re-introduced the tortoise to New Mexico, has made it clear that the restoration of the tortoise to the Southwest is an endangered species recovery project and not a rewilding project, although elements of rewilding exist. References *  Listed as Vulnerable (VU A1d, B1+2bc, C1 v2.3)External links* Mexican Bolson Tortoise* http://www.torctimes.com/bolson.html* http://www.torctimes.com/bolson.html* http://www.sciencenews.org/articles/20061111/bob10.asp* http://www.telegraph.co.uk/connected/main.jhtml?xml/connected/2006/10/24/echighfield24.xml&page2* http://deserttortoise.org/symposium/2007program.pdfflavomarginatusde:Gelbrand-Gopherschildkrteflavomarginatus bords jaunesflavomarginatusja:flavomarginatuszh:
1246286
Jn_Bah
Jn Bah (25 May 1856  13 March 1916) was a Slovak inventor and constructor. He was working on several problems from the areas of military science, military construction, engineering etc. Among others, he focused on flying machines.(Jn Bah. Kontruktr, vynlezca. (en. Jn Bah. Constructor, inventor.) Slovak Academy of Sciences. Available at: http://www.mat.savba.sk/MATEMATICI/matematici.php?cislo5) In 1895, he was granted a patent on helicopter.(Jn Bah  ivotopis. (en. Jn Bah - biography.) Industrial Property Office of the Slovak Republic. Available at: http://www.indprop.gov.sk/?jan-bahyl-zivotopis)BiographyJn Bah was born in Slatina, of Hungary (today Slovakia). In 1869, Bah graduated from the Mining Academy of tiavnica (Selmecbnya) with a diploma in technical drawing. After graduation, he joined the Hungarian Army, where he was noticed by superiors after making technical improvements, and was transferred to the technical staff. The new assignment allowed Bah to study at the Vienna Military Academy, where he graduated in 1879, and was commissioned as a lieutenant. During his time in the army, Bah was able to develop a number of inventions, many of which involved hydraulics.InventionsBahs first invention, called the Steam Tank, was financed entirely by himself and was purchased by the Russian army.  Bah was granted seventeen patents in all, including the invention of a pump, a air balloon combined with an air turbine, the first petrol engine car in Slovakia (in partnership with Anton Marschall), and a lift inside the castle hill up to the Castle.See also*HelicopterReferencesExternal links*Jan Bahyl biography*Jan Bah Biography *Jan Bah BahBahylBahBah
1249009
Andrnico_Luksic
 parents      Policarpo Luksic, Elena AbaroaAntonio Andrnico Luksic Abaroa (Croatian: Androniko Luki) (November 5, 1926 &ndash; August 18, 2005) was a Chilean businessman of Croatian origin and founder of the Group. He was the richest person in Chile, the fourth in America, and the 132nd in the world, with a worth in 2005 of  according to Forbes magazine.(The Luksic Group has interests in the mining, financial, industrial and the beverages sectors. Major holdings include, or have included, de Chile, Compaia de Cervecerias Unidas (CCU), and plc, a UK-listed copper mining company. In Croatia he was involved in the tourist industry.FamilyLuksic was born in Antofagasta, to a Bolivian mother, Elena Abaroa (great-grandchild of Bolivian of the Pacific hero Abaroa), and a Croatian immigrant father, Policarpo, who had arrived in Chile from the Adriatic island of Brac in 1910 and had made a living in the nitrate industry. Luksic married Ena Craig and they had two sons: Andrnico (born April 16, 1954() and Guillermo (born January 14, 1956(). Luksic was widowed when Ena died in 1959. He married Iris Fontbona in 1961, when she was 18 years old.( They had two daughters: Paola (born 1961-1962) and Gabriela (born 1962-1963), and one son: Jean-Paul (born May 31, 1964(.)((Luksic died of cancer on August 18, 2005.(( As of 2011, Iris Fontbona and her family had a net worth of .(Referencesaccessdate February 24, 2011)()()()()}}External links*Antofagasta plcLuksicLuksic AbaroaLuksicLuksic
1252463
Marmora,_Ontario
Marmora is the largest community in the Municipality of Marmora and Lake in County, Ontario, Canada.   It is located on the River and along Highway 7 between Havelock to the west and Madoc to the east, about the half way point between Ottawa and Toronto.HistoryThe village was named after Marmora Township, which is itself named for the Latin word for marble. Marble is common in the area and a giant marble rock stood on nearby Crowe Lake.The rich history of Marmora Township is the story of mining in Ontario. Since 1820 this Township has played a leading role in the development of iron mining. In addition, copper, lead, silver, gold and limestone have been extracted.Iron mining was an important industry in the area during the 19th century. The village was originally named Marmora Iron Works. Gold and silver were also mined at nearby Cordova Mines, now a town. A nearby plant processes talc and dolomite.Marmora was separated from Marmora and Lake Township and incorporated as a village in 1901.On April 14, 1821, the government passed an act setting up Marmora Township and attaching it to Hastings County as per Charles Hayess request to do so in 1820. The new Township took its name from the Latin word for marble because of an immense rock of most delicate white marble. This giant rock stood on the southeast corner of Crowe Lake. The Lake took its name from the Crowe Indians that lived along the shore.Marmora Township was opened for sale in 1821, but there was little settlement outside of the newly created mining village. Although mining and lumbering have been vital to the Township, agriculture has probably supported more people in the area since 1850. A remaining legacy of iron mining is the Marmora Open Pit Mine, a man-made wonder-lake, seventy five acres in area, six hundred and thirty five feet deep, filled with four hundred feet deep of clear blue spring water that is steadily rising to the top.Marmora was re-amalgamated with the surrounding townships of Marmora and Lake in 2001 to form a newly expanded Municipality of Marmora and Lake.Local attractions and eventsAttractions include the Marmora Mine, an abandoned open-pit iron ore mine containing a wealth of minerals, including garnet and pyrite. This location is also a host to a variety of wildlife. The mine itself is filled with several hundred feet of water. The water originates from an underground spring which was exposed during mining operations.Camping and other outdoor recreational activities such as ATV trail riding, fishing, and hunting are very popular for locals and those on vacation. The Crowe River flows into Crowe Lake, which boasts excellent fishing for bass, muskie, pike, walleye, and  a few other types of fish.Since 1979 Marmora has held the Marmora Cup annual dog-sled races. However, the 2006 and 2007 races were cancelled because of inclement weather.There are two annual country jamborees held in Marmora each year.  The Marmora Crowe Valley Lions Club Country Jamboree at the Marmora Fair Grounds in June, and the Marmora Country Jamboree In September on highway 14 just south of Marmora.Formerly annual festivities of Punk Fest led by Warren Hastings, a.k.a Spider, were held here for several years before the township put them to an end, because they would not allow medics on site or supply washrooms\fresh water to the party-goers.  Punks and bands from all over the world traveled to Marmora for the weekends events.Former home of The Marmora Lakers Mens Senior AAA Hockey Team. It was recently sold in early 2008.Home of The Classic Cruisers (Show), running every Thursday at 6pm throughout the summer.External links* Municipality of Marmora & Lake* Information about Marmora, a community-based volunteer site * Marmora SnoFest, Marmora Cup Dog-sled races.* The Bassman, local fishing celebrity* Marmora Crowe Valley Lions Club Country Jamboree,* Marmora Country Jamboree* Crowe Valley Conservation Authority* Google Maps Satellite ImageNorth: WollastonWest: Havelock-Belmont-Methuen  MarmoraEast: Tudor and Cashel, Madoc South: Stirling-Rawdon(Ontario)
1254733
Chris_Hodgson
Chris Hodgson is a politician in Ontario, Canada.  He was a Progressive Conservative member of the Assembly of Ontario from 1994 to 2003, and a minister in the governments of Harris and Eves.  His uncle, Hodgson, was also a Tory MPP for many years. Biography Hodgson was born in Haliburton, Ontario, and holds a of Arts degree in science from University. He worked as a real-estate salesperson for RE/MAX before entering public life, and worked in health care planning for Haliburton County. He was also the warden of Haliburton County prior to entering provincial politics.Hodgsons son, Cody, is an hockey player picked 10th overall by the Canucks in the NHL Entry Draft who currently plays for the Moose of the Hockey League.Political careerHodgson was first elected to the Ontario legislature in a 1994 by-election, defeating Liberal candidate Sharon McCrae by fewer than 2,000 votes in the rural riding of VictoriaHaliburton.  This by-election was extremely bitter, and there were many accusations that Hodgsons team appealed to homophobic prejudice in the region to put their candidate over the top. At the time of the by-election, the Liberal Party supported the NDP governments plans to provide increased social benefits for same-sex couples in 167. They reversed their position after Hodgsons victory, amid fears that the issue had cost them rural support. This reversal in policy would later cost the party, however: after targeting the Liberal Partys purported lack of credibility, the Tories won a majority government in the provincial election of 1995, and Hodgson was re-elected over McCrae by almost 20,000 votes. On June 26, 1995, he was named Minister of Natural Resources, Development and Mines in Harriss government.Shortly after assuming office, Hodgson was involved in a cabinet discussion with Harris and members of the Provincial Police concerning a standoff with native protesters at Provincial Park. The police cleared the park by force on September 6, 1995, and in the process killed an unarmed protester named George.On October 10, 1997, Hodgson was named Minister of Northern Development and Mines, Chair of the Management Board of Cabinet and Deputy Government House Leader. He also served as Minister of Municipal Affairs and HousingHodgson defeated McCrae for a third time in the 1999 provincial election, this time in the redistributed riding of HaliburtonVictoriaBrock.  He retained his position as Chair of the Management Board in the new parliament, and was also named Commissioner of the Board of Internal Economy on July 27, 1999.  After a cabinet shuffle on February 8, 2001, he was named Minister of Municipal Affairs and Housing.As Minister of Natural Resources Hodgson launched the Lands for Life initiative, which saw the largest increase in parks and protected space in the history of the province.  As Municipal Affairs Minister he rewrote the Municipal Act for the first time since the passage of the Baldwin Act in the late 19th century, placed protective status on the Oak Ridges Moraine and began a smart growth program for the entire province, an initiative that was downsized to include only the GTA in the successive Liberal government and renamed Places to Grow. When Harris resigned as Premier in 2002, many expected Hodgson to enter the race to replace him.  Instead, he endorsed Eves, the victorious candidate. He retained the Municipal Affairs and Housing portfolio in the Eves cabinet, but unexpectedly stepped down on January 13, 2003, announcing his decision to retire from politics. He did not run in the 2003 election. In 2004, he supported Torys successful bid to replace Eves as party leader. He is currently president of the Ontario Mining Association.Ipperwash InquiryAn inquiry into the Ipperwash shooting was established by the Liberal government of McGuinty in 2004. In late 2005, former deputy Solicitor-General Elaine Todres testified that she heard Hodgson say, Get the fucking Indians out of my park at a lunch-hour meeting on the day of Dudley Georges shooting.  Former Attorney General Harnick had previously testified that he heard Premier Harris say I want the fucking Indians out of the park at the same meeting.(Kate Harries, Confidentiality question gets airing at inquiry. Globe and Mail,  December 2, 2005.) Harris and Hodgson both denied the allegations when they took the stand. Footnotes 
1257619
Benxi
 Benxi () is a city located in the east of Liaoning province in China, south-southeast of Shenyang. Its population is 1,7709,538 at the 2010 census whom 959,610 in the built up area It was founded as a metallurgical center in 1915. Benxi Iron and Steel Company (Bengang) is the largest employer in the city, and used to be the 4th largest steel company in China. The second largest industry in Benxi is coal mining. Benxi has pollution problems due to steel production and coal mining. The worst coal mining disaster in the world took place on April 26, 1942 in Colliery. A coal-dust explosion killed 1,549 miners working that day.During the disaster of Air France flight AF447, Benxi Iron and Steel Company lost 5 employees, including the executive Chen Chiping who was the wife of Liaonings provincial governor.()Administrative divisionsBenxi contains 4 districts and 2 autonomous counties for the Manchu nation:Within these there are 25 counties, 40 villages and towns, 229 communities and 289 village committees.GeographyBenxi is located at latitude 40 4941 35 N and longitude 123 34125 46 E, and has a total area of . To the east is City, Jilin Province, to the south is Dandong, to the southwest is Anshan (though the two dont actually border each other), to the west is Liaoyang, to the northwest is Shenyang, and to the north is Fushun. The area has many mountains as well as great forest coverage (74%).ClimateBenxi has a monsoon-influenced continental climate (Koppen Dwa), characterised by hot, humid summers, due to the Asian monsoon, and long, cold and windy, but dry winters, due to the anticyclone. The four seasons in Benxi are distinctive. Nearly half of the annual rainfall occurs in July and August. Monthly mean temperatures range from  in January to  in July, for an annual average of .EconomyBenxis economy grew 26% in 2008 to a regional GDP of 61.1 billion CNY. Urban per-capita disposable income was 13,300 CNY (1,913 USD), and consumption per capita 10,167 CNY (1,462 USD).With 46 large and medium-sized enterprises in Benxi, main industrial products are raw iron (14 million tons), steel (13 million tons), finished steel (12 million tons), cement (3 million tons) and raw coal (1 million tons). In 2008, 92,615 people were employed in manufacturing, 20,368 in education, 19,228 in public administration and social organizations, 17,913 persons in the mining industry, and 12,997 in transportation and storage. According to the type of business ownership, 63,000 were employed in private companies.(China Liaoning Business Guide)Uranium is mined in the region.Asias biggest iron ore mine, which is reported to possess more than 3 billion tons of proven reserves, has recently been found in this region.http://www.ibtimes.com/articles/20090623/huge-iron-ore-resource-with-more-than-three-billion-tons-rsquo-proven-reserves-has-been-found-china-.htmTourist ActivitiesThe Benxi Water Cave National Park.A river 3,000 meters long, 2 meters deep and wide enough for 20-30 boats, is found flowing through this cave 35 km from downtown Benxi. The cave is also filled with countless stalactites and stone flowers, pillars and curtains.References(External links* Benxi Municipal Peoples Government official website* Benxi Man Autonomous County official websiteda:Benxide:Benxies:Benxieo:Bensieu:Benxifr:Benxiid:Benxiit:Benxihe:lt:Bensinl:Benxija:no:Benxipl:Benxipt:Benxiru:sah:uk:Khwar:Benxizh:
1262179
Waihi_miners_strike
The Waihi miners strike was a major action in 1912 by gold miners in the Zealand town of Waihi. It is widely regarded as the most significant industrial action in the history of New Zealands labour movement. It resulted in one striker being killed, one of only two deaths in industrial actions in New Zealand.OriginsAt the time of the strike, the labour movement in New Zealand was expanding rapidly. The New Zealand Federation of Labour (known as the Red Fed), which was linked to the Socialist Party, was gaining considerable support from the class, and the Waihi Trade Union of Workers, to which many miners belonged, was part of the Federation. Disputes between the union and the large Goldmining Company were frequent. Miners had many grivences with conditions of work and often downed tools and walked off the site in response to accidents in the mine falls, broken limbs, crushing, brusings and even the occasional fatality. A more insidious killer than the accidents was miners phthisis- dust on the lungs. Because of miners complaint as it was  known, men who started mining at 16 would be lucky to reach 40. The company offered no compensation for miners and long before the strike (1906) there was a feeling among them that there were too many accidents, to many maimings, too many deaths... Miners would ask themselves bitterly what they were dying for. The answer seemed to be: for themselves, 2/8s. a week, just enough to feed and clothe their families; for the shareholders in the Waihi Gold Mining Company, a quite fabulous flow of unearned income.(Stanley Roche The Red and the Gold: An informal account of the Waihi Strike, 1912, p.29-31)In May 1912, a number of engine drivers who rejected the Federation of Labours strong positions established a breakaway union. Although the Waihi Goldmining Company claimed to have no involvement in the breakaway union, saying that it was a matter of union politics, many workers believed that the Company was attempting to split the union, and called a strike. The local police chief reacted cautiously to the action, but Police Commissioner John Cullen ordered a strong response, dispatching additional police. Two months later, the conservative Reform Party came to power &mdash; the new Prime Minister, Massey, declared that he would strongly oppose the enemies of order.ConfrontationThe police buildup in Waihi continued until an estimated ten percent of New Zealands police force was present. Around sixty strikers were arrested and jailed. Anger among the strikers grew, and the Federation of Labour gradually began to lose control to even more radical groups, such as the Workers of the World organisation.In October, the Company was able to re-open the mine with non-union workers (scabs). The union workers reacted angrily, and the new workers were attacked with stones. Tensions between the union and non-union workers were very high &mdash; the union workers saw the newcomers as threatening their livelihoods and as being traitors to the working class, while many of the newcomers felt they had little choice but to take what work they could find, and resented the attacks and condemnation.The violence gradually escalated, with union workers on one side and non-union workers and police on the other. The greatest level of violence came on 12 November, known as Black Tuesday. A group of armed non-union workers and police attacked the union hall, which was defended by a small group of union workers (also armed). Thomas Johnston, a non-union worker who had come to the mines after his garden in Auckland was bankrupted, was shot in the knee, and a police constable was shot in the stomach. The shots are believed to have been fired by Fred Evans, a radical unionist. Evans himself was beaten to the ground by the police, and later died of his injuries. Soon afterwards, the strikers broke ranks, with many fleeing Waihi altogether.AftermathEvans was later held by the hardliners up as a hero and a martyr, with Semple saying that Evans had been doing his duty and should have shot more of them. Despite this, however, many people in the union movement actually moderated their positions after the strike &mdash; it had, after all, failed to achieve its goals. The strike also contributed to unity in the New Zealand labour movement &mdash; the Socialist Party, which had backed the strike, moved towards merger with the more moderate United Labour Party, which had not. The resultant Social Democratic Party later formed the basis of the modern Labour Party.See also*in New ZealandReferencesExternal links*NZHistory.net.nz feature*Waihi Museum
1266201
Cugir
websitehttp://www.primariacugir.roCugir (; German: Kunendorf, Kudschir, Hungarian: Kudzsir) is a town in Alba county, the central settlement of the Breadfield, in Romania. About 45 kilometers south-west of Alba-Iulia, the capital of the county, and 300 meters above sea level at the base of the Mountains. It has a population of  25.950.AdministrationCugir, a town since 1968, administers seven villages: Bocitura (Potschitur), Bucuru (Bukur), Clene (Kalleney), Feeni (Fetzeberg), Goaele (Eisenhammer), Mugeti (Kudschirstallen) and Vinerea (Wolfsdorf). Demographics According to the census from 2002 there was a total population of 25,977 people living in this commune. Of this population, 96.84% are ethnic Romanians, 1.38% are ethnic Hungarians and 1.30% ethnic Rroma.(http://www.edrc.ro/recensamant.jsp?regiune_id2568&judet_id2569&localitate_id2577)NameThroughout the history the name of the town is mentioned in many documents under different names in different languages, therefore the old settlement villa Kunentum becomes in 1493 villa Kudzyr, in 1566 Kwczyr, in 1599 - Kuchir, in 1656 - Kuchjir, in 1673 - Kucsir, in 1733 - Kuser, in 1750 - Kudsier, 1760-1762 - Kudzser, in 1805 Kudsir and in 1850 - Kusir.HistoryIt has a complex political history with periods of Principality of Transylvania, periods of Monarchy, of Hungary and of Romania. Numerous archeological discoveries prove that life in the region flourished as early as the Age, around the 10th century BC, Cugir being part of the territory known as The Iron Gates of Transylvania, a region famous for its natural iron resources. In 88-44 BC, king Burebista, the most powerful of the kings of Thrace, according to the historian Acronion, establishes the new capital in the area, at Regia (located in the Surianu Mountains west of Cugir). In this period of time the settlement of Cugir(villa Kunentum) is known as an important center for metal extracting and processing with its famous workshops producing tools, weapons and coins. In the mid 18th century the Empire authorities established the Frontier Police in Transylvania. They tried to recruit also Romanians from the southern Transylvania between Baraolt and Ortie but the locals put up a fierce resistance against the enrollment. The population revolted due to a policy of forced removal and deportation used to convince the peoples to join in and a bloody massacre took place in the place known today as the old market of the town. Severe clashes occurred again in the area when the authorities decided to brake the neighboring villages ibot and Vinerea to establish the 4th company. Finally, after severe conflicts and pressure, in 1764, 6 regiments were established and in 1768 another battalion was formed so that the frontier police in Transylvania was of approx. 17000 soldiers.After the lost of Silesia, the authorities and the Austrian business begun to invest more and more founds in the mining and manufacturing industry in Transylvania. In 1764 Empress Theresa of Austria begins to allow long-term loans without interest to concessionaires that pledge to exploit the mines and the state and concessionaire manufactories used free workers brought from Styria, Carinthia, Tyrol, Hungary or Dalmatia, but the local men, the peasants represented the main work force. Due to the industrialisation, a great number of Romanian villages and their grounds, pastures, agricultural land and forest, were seized. At the end of the 18th century factories for metal processing were founded in Cugir and Sibiel, just after 15 years after the suppression of the of Horea, Cloca and Crian so that to exploit the mineral resources but also to insufflate obedience towards the Empire. According to documents, the Iron and Steel factory was established in Cugir in the year 1799, one of the first siderurgy factories in Transylvania and since then the history of the town revolves around it.After the Compromise of 1867, it became part of the of Hungary within Austria-Hungary up until the end of War I.  From that time, it has been part of Romania, which was acknowledged internationally by the of Trianon in 1920.Thereafter the factory became owned by the Romanian state and during War II its production was seized by the Germany for war purposes. Since 1946 the factory oriented its production towards military components and house appliances especially washing machines. Also it became the top Romanian producer of sewing machines for industrial and private purposes.EconomyThe town is a heavy industrialised one, with at least half of the total working age population engaged in industrial activities, and around 30% engaged in lumbering activities. The S.C. Uzinele Mecanice Cugir S.A. is the main employer in town and it has diversified its production to include along the traditional products automotive components and firearms, and a large part of its production is destined for export. References External links*Hotel Cugir*Images from Cugir*History*Town website*Map of Cugir*Images Cugir, messages for Cugir peopleace:Cugirde:Cugireo:Cugirfa:fr:Cugirid:Cugirit:Cugirkk:hu:Kudzsirnl:Cugirpl:Cugirpt:Cugirro:Cugirru:sr:tg:
1267459
Andrs_Manuel_del_Ro
signature         Andrs Manuel del Ro Fernndez (10 November 1764 &mdash; 23 March 1849) was a SpanishMexican scientist and naturalist who discovered the element vanadium.EducationAndrs del Ro studied chemistry and metallurgy in Spain, where he was born. He received his bachelors degree from the of Alcal de Henares in 1780. The government gave him a scholarship to enter the School of Mines in Almadn, Spain, where he showed great aptitude. Later he moved to Paris, where he studied under the chemist Darcet. He continued his studies in Freiberg, Germany, under the direction of Gottlob Werner. In Freiberg he got to know Baron von Humboldt. He then returned to Paris as a student of Lavoisier. During the Revolution Lavoisier, considered the founder of modern chemistry, was executed on the guillotine. Del Ro was forced to flee to England. He also collaborated with Abb Just Hay, considered the founder of crystallography.Mining in New SpainIn 1792 the Real Seminario de Minera (College of Mines) was founded in New Spain by a decree of King III of Spain, with the object of reforming the study of mining and metallurgy in the colony. The institution was initially headed by Elhyar (17551833), the discoverer of tungsten. The young del Ro was named to the chair of chemistry and mineralogy. Del Ro arrived at the port of Veracruz on 20 October 1794, on the ship San Francisco de Alcntara out of Cdiz.Once in his new position, del Ro dedicated himself to teaching and scientific investigation. On 17 April 1795 he opened the first course in mineralogy ever presented in New Spain. He made important studies of minerals and developed innovative methods in mining. In Mexico he collaborated with the German naturalist Baron Alexander von Humboldt. Humboldt was impressed with del Ro, and wrote It is in Mexico where the best work of mineralogy in Spanish has been published, the Elementos de Orictognosia of Seor Del Rio. In fact, this was the first book of mineralogy published anywhere in America. Humboldt was an active participant in the investigations of the College of Mining. He organized excursions to Chapultepec, to the basaltic zone of Pedregal de Xitle, and to de los Baos, accumulating data and samples of minerals and rocks that were then submitted to chemical tests for identification.In 1820 del Ro was named a deputy to the Cortes. He was a liberal who argued for the independence of New Spain. He was in Madrid when Mexico gained its independence. Invited to remain in Spain, he nevertheless returned to Mexico (in 1821), which he considered his homeland.In 1829, after the turbulent period of war with Spain, the government of independent Mexico expelled the Spaniards resident in the country, with some notable exceptions. Del Ro was one of the exceptions. The expulsion had a major impact on the work of the College of Mining. The director, Fausto Elhyar, was forced to resign and leave the country. Indignant over the expulsion of his colleagues, del Ro showed solidarity by himself entering voluntary exile in Philadelphia. There he was highly honored, and his book was published in another edition. He returned to Mexico in 1834 and again occupied the chair of mineralogy at the College.The discovery of vanadiumImage:Vanadinita Mibladen, Midelt Marruecos.png|thumb|right|Vanadium is not found in the native state, but is present in minerals such as vanadinite, Pb5(VO4)3Cl.In 1801, while examining mineral samples sent to him by the Pursima del Cardenal mine in Zimapn in the state of Hidalgo, del Ro arrived at the conclusion that he had found a new metallic element. He prepared various of its compounds, and observing their diverse colors, he named the element pancromium. Later, on observing that the compounds changed color to red on heating, he substituted the name eritronium for the element. (Eritros means red in Greek.) The following year he gave samples containing the new element to Humboldt, who sent them on to Victor Collet-Descotils in Pars for his analysis. Collet-Descotilss analysis found (mistakenly) that the samples contained only chromium. Humboldt, in turn, rejected del Ros claim of the discovery of a new element, and del Ro himself concluded his discovery had been an error.In 1830, 29 years after its initial discovery, Professor Gabriel Sefstrm of Sweden rediscovered the element. He gave it its current name, vanadium, in honor of the Scandinavian goddess of love and beauty, Vanadis. In the same year, Whler, the German chemist who had synthesized urea, analyzed some of del Ros samples and proved that vanadium and eritronium were the same. Later the U.S. geologist William Featherstonhaugh proposed without success that the element should be named rionium, in honor of its original discoverer.In 1867 the English chemist Enfield Roscoe isolated the pure metal for the first time. He used hydrogen to get rid of the chloride around the pure vanadium.Later lifeIn 1805 del Ro established an ironworks at Coalcomn. After overcoming numerous obstacles, he produced the first iron in Mexico, on 29 April 1807. Four years later, during the Mexican war of independence, the royalists destroyed the ironworks. The iron he produced was superior to the celebrated imported iron from Biscay, Spain.He was bitter about Humboldts mistake in not confirming the discovery of vanadium, and strongly reproached him. He continued to teach at the College of Mines until his death, a course that could well have been taught at the Polytechnic school in Paris, according to Chevalier, who visited del Ro shortly before the latters death.Death and recognitionthumb|left|Palacio de Mineria, Mexico CityAndrs Manuel del Ro died at 84 in 1849, after a long and productive academic career. His work and his liberal politics were important to the building of an independent Mexican nation. He was a founding member of the College of Mines, and laid the base for the current Institute of Geology of the University of Mexico. He was a member of the Royal Academy of Sciences in Madrid, The Natural History Society of Edinburgh, the Royal Academy of Sciences of France, the Economic Society of Leipzig, the Linnean Society of Leipzig, the Royal Academy of Saxony and the Philosophical Society of Philadelphia. He was also president of the Geological Society of Philadelphia and the Lyceum of Natural History of New York.His extensive scientific work, besides the first identification of vanadium, included the discovery and description of various minerals and the invention of methods of extraction of minerals for use in the mining industry. After his death, the important mining district that includes Batopilas in Chihuahua was named in his honor.thumb|right|A sample of vanadiumThe Society of Mexico instituted the prestigious National Chemistry Prize Andrs Manuel Del Ro in 1964, with the object of giving public recognition to the work done by chemical professionals who have made extraordinary contributions to raise the level and prestige of the profession. It is awarded with a medal containing the likeness of del Ro and a commemorative plaque.When he died, he left his family a famous name, many debts, and some copies of his Elementos de orictogonosia (1804), which he had been unable to sell.Andrs Manuel Del Ro, E. Miramontes, inventor of the first oral contraceptive, and J. Molina, winner of the Prize in Chemistry in 1995, are the three Mexican chemists of outstanding world significance. Miramontes won the Andrs Manuel Del Ro Prize in 1986.Selected scientific works*Elementos de Orictognesia o del conocimiento de los fsiles, prepared for use in the Real Seminario de Mineria de Mxico, 1795.*Analyse des deus nouvelles espces minrales composes de slniure de zinc et de sulfure de mercure. Annals des Mines, Paris, 5, 1829.*Dcouverte de liodure de mercure au Mexique. Annals des Mines, Paris, 5, 1829.*Elementos de Orictognesia, o del conocimiento de los fsiles segn el sistema de Bercelio; y segn los principios de Abraham Gttlob Wrner, con la sinonimia inglesa, alemana y francesa, para uso del Seminario Nacional de Minera de Mxico. Philadelphia, 1832.Bibliography* Ro, Andrs Manuel del, Enciclopedia de Mxico, v. 12. Mexico City, 1987.* Alessio Robles, Vito. El ilustre maestro Andrs Manuel del Ro. Mexico City, 1937. 31 p.* Arnaiz y Freg, Arturo. Andrs Manuel del Ro: Estudio biogrfico. Mexico City: Casino Espaol de Mxico, 1936.* Arnaiz y Freg, Arturo. Don Andrs del Ro, descubrimiento del Eritronio (Vanadio). Mexico City: Cultura, 1948. 44 p.* Prieto, Carlos et al. Andrs Manuel del Ro y su obra cientfica: Segundo centenario de su natalicio, 1764-1964. Mxico: Compaa Fundidora de Fierro y Acero de Monterrey, 1966. 81 p.* Ramrez, Santiago E. Biografa del sr. D. Andrs Manuel del Ro: Primer catedrtico de mineraloga del Colegio de Minera. Mxico: Imp. del Sagrado Corazn de Jess, 1891. 56 p.* Ramrez, Santiago. Ensayos biogrficos de Joaqun Velsquez de Len y Andrs Manuel del Ro. Mxico: UNAM, Facultad de Ingeniera, Sociedad de ex-alumnos, 1983.* Rojo, Onofre. La prioridad en los descubrimientos y su relacin con la infraestructura cientfica. Avance y Perspectiva 20: 107-111 (1997). ISSN: 0185-1411.A short biography of Andrs Manuel del Ro is found in Oxford Dictionary of Scientists by Oxford University Press, 1999.External links* La importancia qumica del vanadio y Don del Rio* Histria de la mineraloga en Mxico y sntesis biogrfica (Archived 2009-10-25)* Portada del Manual de Orictognosia* Palacio de Mineria en la Ciudad de Mxico* Premio Nacional de QumicaManuel del Ro FernndezManuel del RoManuel del RoManuel del RoManuel del RoManuel del Roja:Manuel del RoManuel del Ro
1271199
Gweek
thumb|Gweek Village HallGweek () is a civil parish and village in Cornwall, Kingdom. It is situated approximately three miles (5 km) east of Helston.(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 203 Lands End ISBN 9780319231487) The civil parish was created from part of the parish of Constantine by boundary revision in 1986. The name Gweek is derived either from the postulated Cornish word gwig, meaning village, or from the English wic, meaning hamlet.()Gweek village has a pub, the Gweek Inn,() a shop, a tea garden and a restaurant. The village is also home to the Seal Sanctuary, Gweek.Gweek is at the head of navigation of the River. It has been a port since Roman times and was a thriving port in the Tudor period, with its own Customs House.(Scolding, Bill (2006) Five Walks around Constantine: heritage, landscape, wildlife. Constantine, Kerrier: Constantine Enterprises Company ISBN 0-9552816-0-1) During the mining boom, a tin-smelting house operated at the quayside.(Barton, D. Bradford (1969) A History of Tin Mining and Smelting in Cornwall; revised edition. Cornwall Books, reprint 1989 ISBN 1-871060-03-6; p. 20 fn)In Lewiss Topographical Dictionary of England published in 1848, the village was described as:()GWEEK, a small port, in the of Kerrier, W. division of Cornwall, 3 miles (E. by S.) from Helston. The pilchard-fishery is carried on extensively, 200 boats being employed in taking the fish, which are cured in the various creeks and coves within the limits of the port. In addition to the fishery, the chief trade consists in the exportation of copper-ore, corn, moorstone, and oysters, and the importation of timber, coal, and limestone. Musical activitiesGweek has a band() which performs locally and provides music at some Anglican services in the Gweek Mission Church. The band also organises a yearly band week. This starts with a concert of three local brass bands in a field overlooking the River. Afterwards, there is a pig roast with stalls and entertainment and at the end of the week a clay pigeon shoot.The Fiddle Orchestra() was formed in 2007 by fiddle player Swan. He was a member of Scottish band, Tannahill Weavers but now lives in Cornwall and works as a violin teacher for the Cornwall Music Service.() The orchestra rehearses weekly at Helston School.ReferencesExternal links* The Village Website of Gweeknl:Gweekpl:Gweek
1275006
List_of_Australian_Commonwealth_Government_entities
This is a list of Australian Commonwealth Government departments, bureaus, authorities and commissions.A new Government led by the Leader of the Labor Party, the Hon Gillard MP, was sworn in by the of Australia on 24 June 2010. The new Government has changed the structure and portfolios of a number of agencies.Department summaryFrom September 2010Based on the Administrative Arrangements Order of 14 September 2010,(Commonwealth of Australia Administrative Arrangements Order made on 14 September 2010)(  ) Departments are:* The Department of Agriculture, Fisheries and Forestry* The Attorney Generals Department* The Department of Broadband, Communications and the Digital Economy* The Department of Climate Change and Energy Efficiency* The Department of Defence* The Department of Education, Employment and Workplace Relations* The Department of Families, Housing, Community Services and Indigenous Affairs* The Department of Finance and Deregulation* The Department of Foreign Affairs and Trade* The Department of Health and Ageing* The Department of Human Services* The Department of Immigration and Citizenship* The Department of Infrastructure and Transport* The Department of Innovation, Industry, Science and Research* The Department of the Prime Minister and Cabinet* The Department of Regional Australia, Regional Development and Local Government* The Department of Resources, Energy and Tourism* The Department of Sustainability, Environment, Water, Population and Communities* The Department of the Treasury* The Department of Veterans AffairsPortfolio of Agriculture, Fisheries and ForestryMinisters* Minister for Agriculture, Fisheries and Forestry* Secretary for Agriculture, Fisheries and ForestryDepartment* Department of Agriculture, Fisheries and Forestry** Bureau of Agricultural and Resource Economics** Australian Quarantine and Inspection Service (AQIS)** Australia** of Rural SciencesOther portfolio bodies* Egg Corporation* Fisheries Management Authority* Landcare Council* Livestock Export Corporation Limited* Pesticides and Veterinary Medicines Authority (formerly National Registration Authority for Agricultural and Veterinary Chemicals)* Pork Limited* Wine and Brandy Corporation* Wool Innovation Limited* Research and Development Corporation* Adjustment Authority* Australia* Research and Development Corporation* and Wood Products Research and Development Corporation* Research and Development Corporation* and Wine Research and Development Corporation* Australia Limited* & Water Australia* and Livestock Australia* Basin Commission* Basin Ministerial Council* Consultative Committee on Animal Welfare* Land and Water Resources Audit* Rural Advisory Council* Resource Management Ministerial Council* Territory Fisheries Joint Authority* Breeders Rights Office* and Exports Advisory Council* Industries Ministerial Council* Fisheries Joint Authority* Industries Research and Development Corporation* Fishing Rights Allocation Review Panel* Research and Development Corporation* Strait Protected Zone Joint Authority* Australian Fisheries Joint Authority* Export AuthorityPortfolio of the Attorney-GeneralMinisters* Attorney-General* Minister for Home Affairs* Minister for Justice* for Privacy and Freedom of InformationDepartment* Attorney-Generals DepartmentOther portfolio bodies* Appeals Tribunal* Review Council* Crime Commission* Customs Service* Federal Police* Government Solicitor* Human Rights Commission* Institute of Criminology* Law Reform Commission* Security Intelligence Organisation* Transaction Reports and Analysis Centre* Border Protection Command (also Defence)* Director of Public Prosecutions* Copyright Tribunal* Research Council* CrimTrac* Force Discipline Appeal Tribunal* Director of Public Prosecutions* Law Council* Costs Advisory Committee* Police Disciplinary Tribunal* and Trustee Service, Australia* Legal Services Advisory Council* Council on the Administration of Justice* Alternative Dispute Resolution Advisory Council* Counter Terrorism Committee* Native Title Tribunal* Office of Film and Literature Classification** Board** Review Board* of Parliamentary Counsel* of the Privacy Commissioner* Committee of Attorneys-GeneralPortfolio of Broadband, Communications and the Digital EconomyMinisters* Minister for Broadband, Communications and the Digital Economy* Assisting the Prime Minister on Digital ProductivityDepartment*Broadband, Communications and the Digital EconomyOther portfolio bodies* Broadcasting Corporation* Communications and Media Authority* Postal Corporation* Co Limited* Broadcasting Service (SBS)Portfolio of Climate Change and Energy EfficiencyMinisters* Minister for Climate Change and Energy Efficiency* Parliamentary Secretary for Climate Change and Energy EfficiencyDepartment* of Climate Change and Energy EfficiencyOther portfolio bodies*Office of the Renewable Energy RegulatorPortfolio of DefenceMinisters* Minister for Defence* Minister for Veterans Affairs* Minister for Defence Science and Personnel* Minister for Defence MaterielDepartments* Department of Defence** Defence Force*** Australian Air Force*** Army*** Australian Navy** Science and Technology Organisation** Intelligence and Security*** Imagery and Geospatial Organisation*** Intelligence Organisation*** Signals Directorate*** Security Authority** Materiel Organisation* Department of Veterans AffairsOther portfolio bodies* Defence** of Reserve Service Protection** Defence Force Academy Consultative Council** Oceanographic Data Centre** Defence Human Research Ethics Committee** Maritime Defence Council** Military Forces Relief Trust Fund** Border Protection Command (also Attorney-Generals)** Development Advisory Forum** Support Consultative Forum** Consultative Forum** Exporters Council** Families of Australia** Force Retirement and Death Benefits Authority** Defence Housing Authority** Reserves Support Council** Materiel Organisation** Defence Services** Superannuation and Benefits Board of Trustees No. 1** Veterans Residence Trust** Welfare Trust Fund** Australian Navy Relief Trust Fund* Veterans Affairs** War Memorial** Rehabilitation & Compensation Commission** of Australian War Graves** Commission** Medical Authority** of Service Delivery Arrangements** Medical Review Council** Review Board** Veterans Counselling ServicePortfolio of Education, Employment and Workplace RelationsMinisters* for Tertiary Education, Skills, Jobs and Workplace Relations* for School Education, Early Childhood and Youth* for Employment Participation and Childcare* Minister for Indigenous Employment and Economic DevelopmentDepartment* Education, Employment and Workplace RelationsOther portfolio bodies* Decisions Review Committee * Curriculum, Assessment and Reporting Authority* Fair Pay Commission* Industrial Relations Commission and Australian Industrial Registry* Institute for Teaching and School Leadership Ltd (Teaching Australia)* Learning and Teaching Council* National University* Education Collaboration Council* Mining Industry (Long Service Leave Funding) Corporation* Comcare* Force Remuneration Tribunal* Work Ombudsman* Workplace Relations Consultative Council* of Australian Building and Construction Commissioner* Tribunal Secretariat* Work Australia* Rehabilitation and Compensation Commission* Safety, Rehabilitation and Compensation Authority (Seacare Authority)* Authority* Relations Ministers CouncilPortfolio of Families, Housing, Community Services and Indigenous AffairsMinisters* Minister for Families, Housing, Community Services and Indigenous Affairs* Minister for Housing* Minister for the Status of Women* Minister for Social Housing and Homelessness* Parliamentary Secretary for Disabilities and Carers* Parliamentary Secretary for Community ServicesDepartment* Families, Housing, Community Services and Indigenous AffairsOther portfolio bodies* Commonwealth, States, Territories and New Zealand Ministers Conference on the Status of Women * and Disability Services Ministers Conference* Services Ministers Advisory Council* Equal Opportunity for Women in the Workplace Agency* Housing Ministers Conference* Ministerial Council on Gambling * National Housing Supply Council  * Repatriation Reference Committee* Social Security Appeals TribunalIndigenous* of Indigenous Policy Coordination (OIPC)** Coordination Centres (ICC)* Torres Strait Regional Authority (TSRA)* Indigenous Land Corporation (ILC)* of the Registrar of Indigenous Corporations (ORIC)* of the Aboriginal Land Commissioner* Land Council* Land Council* Land Council* Land Council* Indigenous Business Australia* Ministerial Council for Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Affairs* Township Leasing* Aboriginal Benefit Account Advisory Committee* Aboriginal Hostels Limited  * Defunct see OIPC** and Torres Strait Islander Commission (ATSIC)** and Torres Strait Islander Services (ATSIS)Portfolio of Finance and DeregulationMinisters* Minister for Finance and Deregulation* Minister of State* Minister Assisting on DeregulationDepartments* Department of Finance and Deregulation* Department of Human ServicesOther portfolio bodies* Finance** Electoral Commission** Development Corporation** Government Employees Superannuation Trust** Industry Development Corporation** Australian Political Exchange Council** Australian Procurement and Construction Ministerial Council** Australian Reward Investment Alliance ** River Co. Limited** Chief Information Officer Committee** Commonwealth Superannuation Administration (ComSuper)** Board** Board** Future Fund Management Agency** Medibank Private Ltd** Retiring Allowances Trust** Parliamentary Budget OfficePortfolio of Foreign Affairs and TradeMinisters* Minister for Foreign Affairs* Minister for Trade* Parliamentary Secretary for Trade* Parliamentary Secretary for Pacific Island AffairsDepartment* Department of Foreign Affairs and TradeOther portfolio bodies* Australian Agency for International Development (AusAID)* Centre for International Agricultural Research* Australian Trade Commission (Austrade)* Secret Intelligence Service* Finance and Insurance Corporation* Policy Advisory CouncilPortfolio of Health and AgeingMinisters* Minister for Health and Ageing* Minister for Indigenous Health* Minister for Mental Health and AgeingDepartment* Department of Health and AgeingOther portfolio bodies* Care Advisory Committee* Care Planning Advisory Committees* Care Residential Classification Scale (RCS) Review Team* Care Standards and Accreditation Agency Ltd* Care Risk Management Team and Complaints Management Team* Community Pharmacy Authority* Council for Safety and Quality in Health Care* Health Ministers Advisory Committee Working Party on Highly Specialised Drugs* Health Ministers Advisory Council* Health Ministers Conference* Institute of Health and Welfare* National Council on AIDS, Hepatitis C and Related Diseases* National Council on Drugs* Organ and Tissue Donation and Transplantation Authority* Pharmaceutical Advisory Council* Pharmaceutical Advisory Council (APAC) Subcommittee on Intentional Misuse of Pharmaceutical Drugs (APACIMP)* Radiation Protection and Nuclear Safety Agency* Screening Advisory Committee* Technical Advisory Group on Immunisation* Diseases Network Australia New Zealand* Council* and Community Services Ministerial Council* Standards Australia New Zealand* Committee on AIDS, Hepatitis C and Related Diseases (IGCAHRD)* Services Consultative Committee* Committee on Drugs* Elimination Advisory Committee* Services Advisory Committee* and Other Treatment Subcommittee* Council on Drug Strategy* and Evaluation Coordination Committee* Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Health Council* Advisory Council on Suicide Prevention* Breast Cancer Foundation* Blood Authority* Disaster Relief (Health) Committee* Drug Research Strategy Committee* Drug Strategy Reference Group for Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Peoples* Expert Advisory Committee on Alcohol* Expert Advisory Committee on Illicit Drugs* Expert Advisory Committee on School Drug Education* Expert Advisory Committee on Tobacco* Expert Advisory Group on Safety and Quality in Australian Health Care* Health and Medical Research Council* Immunisation Committee* Pathology Accreditation Advisory Council* Public Health Partnership* Benefits Advisory Committee* Benefits Pricing Authority* Benefits Remuneration Tribunal* Health and Rational Use of Medicines Committee* Health Insurance Administration Council* Health Insurance Ombudsman* Services Review* Health and Safety Advisory Council* Health Support, Education and Training Program Committee* on DiabetesPortfolio of Human ServicesMinisters* Minister for Human ServicesDepartment* Human ServicesOther portfolio bodies* Centrelink* Australia* Child Support Agency* Australia* HearingPortfolio of Immigration and CitizenshipMinisters* Minister for Immigration and Citizenship* Parliamentary Secretary for Immigration and CitizenshipDepartment* Department of Immigration and CitizenshipOther portfolio bodies* Review Tribunal* Review Tribunal* Agents Registration AuthorityPortfolio of Infrastructure and TransportMinisters* Minister for Infrastructure and Transport* Parliamentary Secretary for Infrastructure and TransportDepartment* Department of Infrastructure and Transport** Transport Safety Bureau** of Transport Security** AusLink** Bureau of Transport and Regional Economics (BTRE)Other portfolio bodies* Transport Safety Bureau* Australia* Maritime Safety Authority* Motor Vehicle Certification Board* Rail Track Corporation* Transport Council* Aviation Safety Authority* Air Services Commission* Government and Planning Ministers Council* Marine Safety Committee* Transport Commission* Development Council* Committee on Regional Development* Committee on TransportPortfolio of Innovation, Industry, Science and ResearchMinisters* Minister for Innovation, Industry, Science and Research* Minister for Small BusinessDepartment* of Innovation, Industry, Science and ResearchOther portfolio bodies* Council on Intellectual Property* Institute of Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Studies* Institute of Marine Science* Nuclear Science and Technology Organisation* Research Council* Scientific and Industrial Research Organisation * Cooperative Research Centres Committee* Innovation Australia* Australia* Questacon---The National Science and Technology Centre* Oceans Policy Science Advisory Group* Plant Breeders Rights Advisory Committee* Development Funds Registration Board* Standards Board for Patent and Trade Marks Attorneys* Australia* Ministers Council* Professional Standards Board for Patent and Trade Marks AttorneysPortfolio of Prime Minister and CabinetMinisters* Prime Minister* for Regional Australia, Regional Development and Local Government* Minister for the Arts* Minister for Social Inclusion* Minister for Privacy and Freedom of Information* Minister for Sport* Special Minister of State for the Public Service and IntegrityDepartment* Department of the Prime Minister and CabinetOther portfolio bodies* Council* Film Television and Radio School* Institute of Family Studies* National Audit Office* National Maritime Museum* Public Service Commission* Trust* Commonwealth Ombudsman* Inspector-General of Intelligence and Security* Advisory Committee* Archives of Australia* Australia Day Council* Gallery of Australia* Museum of Australia* of National Assessments* Establishments Trust* Museum of Australian Democracy* Australia CommitteePortfolio of the Resources and Energy and TourismMinisters* Minister for Resources and Energy* Minister for Tourism* Minister Assisting the Minister for TourismDepartment* of Resources, Energy and TourismOther portfolio bodies* Australia* Tourism Ministers Council* Australia* ANZLIC -- The Spatial Information Council* Ministerial Council on Mineral and Petroleum Resources* National Offshore Petroleum Safety AuthorityPortfolio of the Sustainability, Environment, Water, Population and Communities Ministers* Minister for Sustainability, Environment, Water, Population and Communities* Parliamentary Secretary for Sustainability and Urban WaterDepartment*  of Sustainability, Environment, Water, Population and CommunitiesOther portfolio bodies* Animal Ethics Committee* Ethics Committee (Human Experimentation)* Research Assessment Committees (ARACs)* Science Advisory Committee* Committee on Old Dutch Shipwrecks* Antarctic Names and Medals Committee* Heritage Council* of Meteorology* Protection and Heritage Council* Barrier Reef Consultative Committee* Barrier Reef Marine Park Authority* Barrier Reef Ministerial Council* Barrier Reef Structural Adjustment Package Technical Advisory Committee* Waste Technical Group* Cultural Heritage Committee* Environment Protection Council* Environmental Education Council* Water Commission* South Wales World Heritage Properties Ministerial Council* of the Renewable Energy Regulator* Program Management Committee* of the Environment Committee 2006* Intergovernmental Forum* Harbour Federation Trust* Wilderness World Heritage Area Ministerial Council* Species Scientific Committee* Tropics Ministerial CouncilPortfolio of TreasuryMinisters* Treasurer* Assistant Treasurer* for Financial Services and Superannuation* Parliamentary Secretary to the TreasurerDepartment* Department of the Treasury** Australian MintOther portfolio bodies* Accounting Standards Board* Bureau of Statistics* Competition and Consumer Commission* Loan Council* Competition Tribunal* Office of Financial Management* Prudential Regulation Authority* Securities and Investments Commission* Statistics Advisory Council* Taxation Office* Consumer Affairs Advisory Council* Grants Commission* and Markets Advisory Committee* Auditors and Liquidators Disciplinary Board* of Taxation* Financial Reporting Council* Sector Advisory Council* Investment Review Board* Insurance Actuarial Standards Board* Council on Consumer Affairs* Council for Corporations* Competition Council* Commission* Bank of Australia* Complaints TribunalReferencesde entidades do governo da Austrlia
1277879
River_Ystwyth
The River Ystwyth (; ) is a river in the county of Ceredigion, Wales. Its source is a number of streams that include the Afon Diliw, located on the border of Ceredigion and Powys in the Mountains.Image:Ystwyth.jpg|thumb|250px|right|River Ystwyth at TrawsgoedThe river flows generally westwards before draining into Bay at Aberystwyth where it shares the harbour with the Rheidol.(Afon Ystwyth: The Story of a River)The Ystwyth valley is now sparsely populated with only a few towns and villages such as Ystwyth, Cwm Ystwyth, Pont-rhyd-y-groes, Llanilar and Llanfarian. In previous centuries, however, the Ystwyth valley was relatively densely populated due to its mineral wealth. Silver, lead and zinc have been mined in the valley since Roman times, an activity that reached its peak in the 18th century. The largest of the very many mines was Cwm Ystwyth Mine. It is reputed that the average age at death of the miners in Cwm Ystwyth was 32, largely because of acute poisoning. There is no active metal mining in the Ystwyth valley.The River still carries elevated levels of lead, zinc and silver in its water, mostly due to seepage from abandoned mine tailings and discharges from mine adits. Away from the abandoned mine workings, the river valley is one of the most beautiful in Wales with steep wooded banks carrying crystal-clear water. It is especially beautiful in autumn. The autumn tends to bring large numbers of visitors to parts of the upper valley.FootnotesReferences* Green, John (2006), Afon Ystwyth: The Story of a River, Artery Publications 2006. ISBN 0-9513909-7-X External links br:YstwythYstwythYstwythfr:YstwythYstwyth
1281328
1999_in_rail_transport
EventsJanuary events* January 15  The Island People Mover ends service between Tampa and Harbour Island in Tampa, Florida, United States.()* January 25  The York City Transit Authority installs the first MetroCard Vending Machines at two subway stations in the city.()March events* March 15  In the train accident, the southbound Amtrak train 59, of New Orleans, strikes a loaded semi-truck on a crossing in Illinois; all but three of the passenger cars derail, killing 11 of the trains passengers.  The NTSB attributes the cause to the truck driver trying to beat the train at the crossing.April events* April  Final trains operate between Asuncin and Ypacarai, the last regular passenger service in Paraguay and, arguably, the worlds last commuter service worked wholly by locomotives.()* April 12  A train on the Schwebebahn is derailed, plunging into the Wupper and killing five.()* April 15  First freight train operated under concession by Ferrovias Guatemala (subsidiary of Development Corporation) to rehabilitate the national rail network, disused since 1996.()May events* May 14  The first section of the Underground Line Extension opens between Stratford and North Greenwich in east London.June events* June 1  The end of Conrail, which is officially split up on this date, all operations being transferred to CSX and Norfolk Southern.* June 12  The rebuilding of (Amtrak station) is completed.* June 28  The Metro Line One is fully completed and operational.July events* July 16  Railways Trunk Express on its way to Delhi collides with derailed freight cars near Mathura, India; 17 people die and 200 more are injured in the accident.()August events* August 1  rail disaster: two trains carrying 2,500 people collide at the remote station of Gaisal, 310 miles from the city of Gauhati in Bengal, India, killing more than 285 people.(* August 22  Gardermobanen opens Tunnel () in Norway, the longest railway tunnel in Europe north of the Alps, completing the Line.()* August 30  The United States Transportation Board approves Railways petition to haul freight on the former Pacific Railroad line between Salt Lake City and Draper, a line now owned by Transit Authority.() September events * September 3  RailAmerica takes over operations of former Topeka and Santa Fe Railway subsidiary Peoria and Western Railway, for a purchase price of approximately $18 million.()* September 18  Rail subsidiary Colborne Terminal Railway begins operations on 41 miles (66 km) of track in Ontarios Peninsula.()October events* October  SY class 2-8-2 #1772 is completed at Tangshan, Peoples Republic of China, thought to be the worlds last locomotive built for commercial service. She is delivered to the Tiefa Mining Railway.* October 5  The Grove rail crash occurs at Ladbroke Grove Junction, a few miles west of London station, when two trains collide nearly head-on killing 31 and injuring 400; the cause is attributed to the placement of a signal (showing a stop indication) that could not be seen far enough down the track for drivers to react in time.()* October 18  After 15 months, three months ahead of schedule, the $74 million project to rebuild the Avenue Shuttle in New York City is completed; the shuttle as well as four stations reopen for service.(* October 22  Romeriksporten, Norways longest railway tunnel, is taken into use.November events* November 6  The first LRT Line in Singapore, Panjang LRT Line, opened.December events* December 2  rail accident occurs near Sydney, South Wales, Australia.* December 6  Metrolink in England is extended to Broadway.* December 22  The Underground Line Extension is finally fully operational with the start of services at tube station, although through running has been in operation since November.Unknown date events* L. Gunn is succeeded by Ducharme as commissioner of the Transit Commission.* Amtrak begins a massive rebuild program to overhaul the railroads fleet of AEM-7 locomotives at the Delaware, shops.* Melbournes suburban rail network and tram network is privatised with operators Hillside Trains (now Melbourne), Bayside Trains (later M>Train), as well as tram operators Swanston Trams (later M>Tram) and Trams.AccidentsDeaths Awards  North America ;1999 H. Harriman Awards;Awards presented by Age magazine* 1999 of the Year: A. Burkhardt (WC)* 1999 Railroad of the Year: and Worcester Railroad* 1999 Line Railroad of the Year: Central Florida Express United Kingdom ; Operator of the Year* 1999: Mainline() References dans les chemins de fera vasti kzlekedsbenja:1999    
1284762
FischerTropsch_process
The FischerTropsch process (or FischerTropsch Synthesis) is a set of chemical reactions that convert a mixture of monoxide and hydrogen into liquid hydrocarbons.  The process, a key component of to liquids technology, produces a petroleum substitute, typically from coal, gas, or biomass for use as synthetic lubrication oil and as fuel.(US Fuel Supply Statistics Chart)  The F-T process has received intermittent attention as a source of low-sulfur diesel fuel and to address the supply or cost of petroleum-derived hydrocarbons.Process chemistryThe FischerTropsch process involves a series of chemical reactions that lead to a variety of hydrocarbons. Useful reactions give alkanes::(2n+1) H2  +  n CO      CnH(2n+2)  +  n H2Owhere n is a integer. The formation of methane (n  1) is generally unwanted. Most of the alkanes produced tend to be straight-chain alkanes, although some branched alkanes are also formed. In addition to alkane formation, competing reactions result in the formation of alkenes, as well as alcohols and other oxygenated hydrocarbons. Usually, only relatively small quantities of these non-alkane products are formed, although catalysts favoring some of these products have been developed.Other reactions relevant to the F-T processSeveral reactions are required to obtain the gaseous reactants required for F-T catalysis.  First, reactant gases entering a F-T reactor must first be desulfurized to protect the catalysts, which are readily poisoned. The other major class of reactions are employed to adjust the H2/CO ratio:*gas shift reaction provides a source of hydrogen::H2O  +  CO      H2  +  CO2*For F-T plants that start with methane, another important reaction is reforming, which converts the methane into CO and H2:: H2O  +  CH4      CO  +  3 H2Chemical mechanismsThe conversion of CO to alkanes involves net hydrogenation of CO, the hydrogenolysis of C-O bonds, and the formation of C-C bonds. Such reactions are assumed to proceed via initial formation of surface-bound carbonyls.  The CO ligand is speculated to undergo dissociation, possibly into oxide and carbide ligands.(Bruce C. Gates Extending the Metal Cluster-Metal Surface Analogy Angewandte Chemie International Edition in English, 2003, Volume 32, pp. 228  229. )  Other potential intermediates are various C-1 fragments including formyl (CHO), hydroxycarbene (HCOH), hydroxymethyl (CH2OH), methyl (CH3), methylene (CH2), methylidyne (CH), and hydroxymethylidyne (COH).  Furthermore, and critical to the production of liquid fuels, are reactions that form C-C bonds, such as insertion.  Many related stoichiometric reactions have been simulated on discrete clusters, but homogeneous F-T catalysts are poorly developed and of no commercial importance.Process conditionsGenerally, the FischerTropsch process is operated in the temperature range of . Higher temperatures lead to faster reactions and higher conversion rates but also tend to favor methane production. As a result, the temperature is usually maintained at the low to middle part of the range. Increasing the pressure leads to higher conversion rates and also favors formation of long-chained alkanes both of which are desirable. Typical pressures range from one to several tens of atmospheres. Even higher pressures would be favorable, but the benefits may not justify the additional costs of high-pressure equipment and higher pressures can leading to catalyst deactivation via coke formation.A variety of synthesis gas compositions can be used. For cobalt-based catalysts the optimal H2:CO ratio is around 1.8-2.1. Iron-based catalysts promote the water-gas-shift reaction and thus can tolerate significantly lower ratios. This reactivity can be important for synthesis gas derived from coal or biomass, which tend to have relatively low H2:CO ratios (n/n  (1-&alpha;)2&alpha;n-1Where Wn is the weight fraction of hydrocarbon molecules containing n carbon atoms.  is the chain growth probability or the probability that a molecule will continue reacting to form a longer chain. In general,  is largely determined by the catalyst and the specific process conditions.Examination of the above equation reveals that methane will always be the largest single product so long as alpha is less than 0.5; however by increasing  close to one, the total amount of methane formed can be minimized compared to the sum of all of the various long-chained products. Increasing  increases the formation of long-chained hydrocarbons. The very long-chained hydrocarbons are waxes, which are solid at room temperature. Therefore, for production of liquid transportation fuels it may be necessary to crack some of the Fischer-Tropsch products. In order to avoid this, some researchers have proposed using zeolites or other catalyst substrates with fixed sized pores that can restrict the formation of hydrocarbons longer than some characteristic size (usually n) Alkali oxides on cobalt catalysts generally cause activity to drop severely even with very low alkali loadings. C5+ and CO2 selectivity increase while methane and C2-C4 selectivity decrease. In addition, the olefin to parafin ratio increases.LTFT and HTFTHigh-Temperature Fischer-Tropsch (or HTFT) is operated at temperatures of 330C-350C and uses an iron-based catalyst. This process was used extensively by Sasol in their Coal-to-Liquid plants (CTL). Low-Temperature Fischer-Tropsch (LTFT) is operated at lower temperatures and uses a cobalt based catalyst. This process is best known for being used in the first integrated Gas-to-Liquid (GTL) plant operated and built by Shell in Bintulu, Malaysia.(http://www.scribd.com/doc/3825160/Gas-to-Liquids-GTL-Technology page 33-41)GasificationF-T plants associated with coal or related solid feedstocks (sources of carbon) must first convert the solid fuel into gaseous reactants, i.e. CO, H2, and alkanes.  This conversion is called gasification.  Synthesis gas obtained from coal gasification tends to have a H2/CO ratio of ~0.7 compared to the ideal ratio of ~2.  This ratio is adjusted via the water-gas shift reaction.   Coal-based FischerTropsch plants can produce varying amounts of CO2, depending upon the energy source of the gasification process. However, most coal-based plants rely on the feed coal to supply all the energy requirements of the F-T process.  Ongoing research aims to combine gasification (BG) and Fischer-Tropsch (FT) synthesis to produce renewable transportation fuels (biofuels).()HistorySince the invention of the original process by Franz Fischer and Tropsch, working at the Wilhelm Institute in the 1920s, many refinements and adjustments have been made.  The term Fischer-Tropsch now applies to a wide variety of similar processes (Fischer-Tropsch synthesis or Fischer-Tropsch chemistry). Fischer and Tropsch filed a number of patents, e.g., US patent no. 1,746,464, applied 1926, published 1930.(http://www.fischer-tropsch.org/primary_documents/patents/US/us1746464.pdf)  It was commercialized in Germany in 1936.  Being petroleum-poor but coal-rich, Germany used the FT-process during War II to produce ersatz () fuels. F-T production accounted for an estimated 9% of German war production of fuels and 25% of the automobile fuel.(Leckel, D., Diesel Production from Fischer-Tropsch: The Past, the Present, and New Concepts, Energy Fuels, 2009, volume 23, 2342-2358. )The States Bureau of Mines, in a program initiated by the Liquid Fuels Act, employed seven Paperclip fuel scientists in a Fischer-Tropsch plant in Missouri in 1946.(German Synthetic Fuels Scientist)(In Britain, Alfred August Aicher obtained several patents for improvements to the process in the 1930s and 1940s.(E.g. British patent no. 573,982, applied 1941, published 1945)  Aichers company was named Synthetic Oils Ltd. (Now based in Canada.)CommercializationImage:Holzvergasung.jpg|thumb|right|bed gasification with FT-pilot in Gssing, Burgenland, AustriaThe F-T process has been applied on a large scale in some industrial sectors, although its popularity is hampered by high capital costs, high operation and maintenance costs, the uncertain and volatile price of oil, and environmental concerns. In particular, the use of natural gas as a feedstock becomes practical only with use of stranded gas, i.e. sources of natural gas far from major cities which are impractical to exploit with conventional gas pipelines and LNG technology; otherwise, the direct sale of natural gas to consumers would become much more profitable. Several companies are developing the process to enable practical exploitation of so-called gas reserves.SasolThe largest scale implementation of F-T technology are in a series of plants operated by Sasol in South Africa, a country with large coal reserves but little oil. Sasol uses coal and now natural gas as feedstocks and produces a variety of synthetic petroleum products, including most of the countrys fuel.(technologies & processes Sasol)Shell Middle Distillate SynthesisOne of the largest implementations of F-T technology is in Bintulu, Malaysia.  This Shell facility converts gas into low-sulfur fuels and food-grade wax. The scale is .Ras Laffan, QatarThe new LTFT facility scheduled to commission in 2011 at Laffan, Qatar uses cobalt catalysts at 230 C,  converting natural gas to petroleum liquids at a rate of , with additional production of  of oil equivalent in gas liquids and ethane.UPM (Finland)In October 2006, Finnish paper and pulp manufacturer UPM announced its plans to produce biodiesel by the FischerTropsch process alongside the manufacturing processes at its European paper and pulp plants, using waste biomass resulting from paper and pulp manufacturing processes as source material.(UPM-Kymmene says to establish beachhead in biodiesel market, NewsRoom Finland)Rentech (Colorado, USA)A demonstration scale F-T plant is owned and operated by Rentech Inc in partnership with ClearFuels, a company specializing in biomass gasification.  Located in Commerce City, Colorado (U.S.), the facility produces about  of fuels from natural gas. Commercial scale facilities are planned for California, Mississippi, St. Joe, Florida, and River, Ontario.(http://www.rentechinc.com/ (official site))OtherIn the US, some coal-producing states have invested in F-T plants.  In Pennsylvania, Waste Management and Processors Inc. was funded by the state to implement F-T technology licensed from Shell and Sasol to convert so-called waste coal (leftovers from the mining process) into low-sulfur diesel fuel.(Governor Rendell leads with innovative solution to help address PA energy needs, State of Pennsylvania)(Schweitzer wants to convert Otter Creek coal into liquid fuel, Billings Gazette, August 2, 2005, accessed August 13, 2007)Research developmentsChoren Industries has built an FT plant in Germany that converts biomass to syngas and fuels using the Shell F-T process.(Choren official web site)(Fairley, Peter. Growing Biofuels - New production methods could transform the niche technology. MIT Technology Review November 23, 2005) U.S. Air Force certificationSyntroleum, a publicly traded US company (Nasdaq: SYNM) has produced over  of diesel and jet fuel from the FischerTropsch process using natural gas and coal at its demonstration plant near Tulsa, Oklahoma. Syntroleum is working to commercialize its licensed Fischer-Tropsch technology via coal-to-liquid plants in the US, China, and Germany, as well as gas-to-liquid plants internationally. Using natural gas as a feedstock, the ultra-clean, low sulfur fuel has been tested extensively by the Department of Energy and the Department of Transportation.  Most recently, Syntroleum has been working with the Air Force to develop a synthetic jet fuel blend that will help the Air Force to reduce its dependence on imported petroleum. The Air Force, which is the U.S. militarys largest user of fuel, began exploring alternative fuel sources in 1999. On December 15, 2006, a B-52 took off from AFB, California for the first time powered solely by a 50-50 blend of JP-8 and Syntroleums FT fuel. The seven-hour flight test was considered a success. The goal of the flight test program is to qualify the fuel blend for fleet use on the services B-52s, and then flight test and qualification on other aircraft. The test program concluded in 2007.  This program is part of the Department of Defense Assured Fuel Initiative, an effort to develop secure domestic sources for the military energy needs. The Pentagon hopes to reduce its use of crude oil from foreign producers and obtain about half of its aviation fuel from alternative sources by 2016.() With the B-52 now approved to use the FT blend, the Globemaster III, the B-1B, and eventually every airframe in its inventory to use the fuel by 2011.(()Carbon dioxide reuseIn 2009, chemists working for the U.S. Navy investigated Fischer-Tropsch for generating fuels, obtaining hydrogen by electrolysis of seawater. When combined with the dissolved carbon dioxide using a cobalt-based catalyst, this study produced mostly methane gas. However, when using an iron-based catalyst, it was possible to reduce the methane produced to 30 per cent with the rest being predominantly short-chain hydrocarbons. Further refining of the hydrocarbons produced applying solid acid catalysts, such as zeolites, can potentially lead to the production of kerosene-based jet fuel.()The abundance of  makes seawater an attractive alternative fuel source. Scientists at the U.S. Research Laboratory stated that, although the gas forms only a small proportion of air  around 0.04 per cent  ocean water contains about 140 times that concentration.( Robert Dorner presented the findings of his work to the Chemical Society on 16 August 2009, in DC.()  Of course, such a method requires an energy source - since  is a major product of combustion, converting it back into combustible material is a highly endothermic (energy-absorbing) process.  In practice this would probably come from power, which is in abundant supply aboard nuclear powered ships. Process Efficiency The process ranges in efficiency from 25 to 50 percent.(http://pubs.acs.org/doi/abs/10.1021/ef9009185) See also * fuel* process* Biogasoline* to liquid* Assay* energy development* Hydrogenation, a generic term for this type of process* peak* process* Liquid Fuels Program* oil* gasReferencesExternal links* Fischer-Tropsch Archive* Abiogenic Gas Debate 11:2002 (EXPLORER)* Unconventional Ideas About Unconventional Gas (Society of Petroleum Engineers)* Process of synthesis of liquid hydrocarbons - Great Britain patent GB309002 - Plauson* Clean Diesel from Coal by Kevin Bullis* Implementing the Hydrogen Economy with Synfuels (pdf)* Carbon-to-Liquids Research* Effect of alkali metals on cobalt catalystsFischer-Tropschsyntzaprocesde:Fischer-Tropsch-SyntheseFischer-Tropschde Fier-TropFischer-TropschFischer-Tropschlb:Fischer-Tropsch-Syntheshu:FischerTropsch-eljrsnl:Fischer-Tropschbrandstoffenja:no:Fischer-Tropsch-prosessenFischera-Tropschade Fischer-Tropsch  processprocesfi:FischerTropsch-menetelmsv:Fischer-Tropsch-processen-zh:
1287778
Thompson_(electoral_district)
Thompson is a provincial electoral division in the Canadian province of Manitoba.  It was created by redistribution in 1968, and has formally existed since the provincial election of 1969.Thompson is located in the north of the province.  It is bordered by Rupertsland to the north and east, Flin Flon to the north and west, and The Pas to the south.  The city of Thompson was incorporated shortly before the ridings creation, and is its only major urban centre.  Almost half of the ridings residents live in that community.The ridings population in 1996 was 19,349.  As of 1999, the average family income was $56,402, and the unemployment rate was 12.60%.  The ridings character is primarily working-class, with 17% of its economy coming from the mining sector.Forty-two per cent of the ridings residents are aboriginal, the third highest rate in the province.Thompson is considered safe for the New Democratic Party, which has represented the riding almost continually since its creation.  The current MLA, Ashton, is the longest-serving member of the legislature, having been first elected in 1981.  In 2003, he was re-elected with almost 83% of the popular vote.List of provincial representatives Name  Party Took Office Left OfficeBorowskiNDP19691972Independent NDP19721973DillenNDP19731977MacMasterPC19771981AshtonNDP1981presentElectoral results(http://www.electionsmanitoba.ca/en/Results/39_division_results/39_thompson_summary_results.html - 2007 results)June 2003(http://www.elections.mb.ca/en/Results/38_division_results/38_thompson_summary_results.html):*(x)Ashton (NDP) 3291*Bill Archer (PC) 532*Traverse (L) 155(http://www.electionsmanitoba.ca/apps/results/37gen/pbp.asp?ED52 - 1999 Results)Previous boundariesReferences(circonscription lectorale)
1291347
History_of_Herefordshire
The History of Herefordshire starts with a shire in the time of Aethelstan (895 - 939), and is mentioned in the Chronicle in 1051. In the Domesday Survey some border areas of south-east Wales (in the modern counties of Powys and Monmouthshire) are assessed under Herefordshire, and the western and southern borders remained debatable ground (Archenfield) until with the incorporation of the Marches in 1535 considerable territory was annexed to Herefordshire and formed into the hundreds of Wigmore, Lacy and Huntington, while Harold was united to Webtree. At the time of the Domesday Survey the divisions of the county were very unsettled. As many as nineteen hundreds are mentioned, but these were of varying extent, some containing only one manor, some from twenty to thirty. Of the twelve modern hundreds, only Greytree, Radlow, Stretford, Wolphy and Wormelow retain Domesday names.  The others being Broxash, Ewyas-Lacy, Grimsworth, Huntington, Webtree and Wigmore.Historical settingAnglo-Saxon controlAt some time in the 7th century the West Saxons pushed their way across the Severn and established themselves in the territory between Wales and Mercia, and established the minor kingdom of Magonset, which was later absorbed into Mercia. The district which is now Herefordshire was occupied by a tribe the Hecanas, who congregated chiefly in the fertile area about Hereford and in the mining districts round Ross-on-Wye. In the 8th century Offa extended the Mercian frontier to the Wye, securing it by the earthwork known as Dyke.Danish and Norman controlIn 915 the Danes made their way up the Severn to the district of Archenfield, where they took prisoner Cyfeiliawg, of Llandaff, and in 921 they besieged Wigmore, which had been rebuilt in that year by Edward. From the time of its first settlement the district was the scene of constant border warfare with the Welsh, and Harold, whose Earldom included this county, ordered that any Welshman caught trespassing over the border should lose his right hand. In the period preceding the Conquest much disturbance was caused by the outrages of the Norman colony planted in this county by the Confessor. Richards castle in the north of the county was the first Norman fortress erected on English soil, and Wigmore, Harold, Clifford, Weobley, Hereford, Donnington and Caldicot were all the sites of Norman strongholds. The William the Conqueror entrusted the subjugation of Herefordshire to William FitzOsbern, but the Wild in conjunction with the Welsh prolonged violent resistance against him for two years.Return to English controlDuring Anarchy - the prolonged civil war of Stephens reign - Castle and Weobley castle were held against the King, but were captured in 1138. Edward, afterwards Edward I, was imprisoned in Hereford Castle, and made his famous escape thence in 1265. In 1326 the parliament assembled at Hereford which deposed Edward II. In the 14th and 15th centuries the forest of Deerfold gave refuge to some of the most noted followers of Wycliffe. During the of the Roses the influence of the Mortimers led the county to support the Yorkist cause, and Edward, afterwards Edward IV, raised 23,000 men in this neighbourhood. The of Mortimers Cross was fought in 1461 near Wigmore. Before the outbreak of the civil war of the 17th century, complaints of illegal taxation were rife in Herefordshire, but a strong anti-puritan feeling induced the county to favour the royalist cause. Hereford, Goodrich and Ledbury all endured sieges. Earls of Hereford The earldom of Hereford was granted by William I to William FitzOsbern, about 1067, but on the outlawry of his son Roger in 1074 the title lapsed until conferred on Henry de Bohun about 1199. It remained in the possession of the de Bohuns until the death of de Bohun, 7th Earl of Hereford in 1373; in 1397 Henry, of Derby, afterwards King Henry IV, who had married de Bohun, was created of Hereford. Edward VI created Walter Devereux, a descendant of the de Bohun family, Viscount Hereford, in 1550, and his grandson, the famous of Essex, was born in this county. Since this date the viscounty has been held by the Devereux family, and the holder ranks as the premier viscount of England. The families of Clifford, Giffard and Mortimer figured prominently in the warfare on the Welsh border, and the Talbots, Lacys, Crofts and Scudamores all had important seats in the county, James Scudamore of Lacy being the original of the Sir Scudamore of Spensers Faerie Queene. Sir Oldcastle, the leader of the Lollards, was sheriff of Herefordshire in 1406.DioceseHerefordshire has been included in the of Hereford since its foundation in 676. In 1291 it comprised the Deaneries of Hereford, Weston, Leominster, Weobley, Frome, Archenfield and Ross in the of Hereford, and the Deaneries of Burford, Stottesdon, Ludlow, Pontesbury, Clun and Wenlock, in the archdeaconry of Shropshire. In 1877 the name of the Archdeaconry of Shropshire was changed to Ludlow, and in 1899 the Deaneries of Dore, Bromyard, Kingsland, Kington and Ledbury were created in the Archdeaconry of Hereford.PoliticsHerefordshire was governed by a sheriff as early as the reign of the Confessor, the court meeting at Hereford where later the assizes and quarter sessions were also held. In 1606 an act was passed declaring Hereford free from the jurisdiction of the Council of Wales, but the county was not finally relieved from the interference of the Lords until the reign of and Mary. Herefordshire was first represented in parliament in 1295, when it returned two members, the boroughs of Ledbury, Hereford, Leominster and Weobley being also represented. Hereford was again represented in 1299, and Bromyard and Ross in 1304, but the boroughs made very irregular returns, and from 1306 until Weobley regained representation in 1627, only Hereford and Leominster were represented. Under the act of 1832 the county returned three members and Weobley was disfranchised. The act of 1868 deprived Leominster of one member, and under the act of 1885 Leominster was disfranchised, and Hereford lost one member.EconomyHerefordshire has always been esteemed an exceptionally rich agricultural area, the manufactures being unimportant, with the sole exception of the woollen and the cloth trade which flourished soon after the Conquest. Iron was worked in Wormelow hundred in Roman times, and the Domesday Survey mentions iron workers in Marcle. At the time of Henry VIII the towns had become much impoverished, and Elizabeth in order to encourage local industries, insisted on her subjects wearing English-made caps from the factory of Hereford. Hops were grown in the county soon after their introduction into England in 1524. In 1580 and again in 1637 the county was severely visited by the plague, but in the 17th century it had a flourishing timber trade, and was also noted for its orchards and cider.References
1297886
Morristown_and_Erie_Railway
The Morristown and Erie Railway  is a freight line railroad based in New Jersey. It operates freight rail service five days a week in County, New Jersey and surrounding areas. It owns its main line between Morristown and Roseland and maintains and operates three other lines in Morris County (Dover & Rockaway Branch, Chester Branch and High Bridge Branch) under a $1-a-year contract with the county.Freight is interchanged with Southern at Lake Junction (the north end of the Chester Branch). The Morristown & Erie Railway (M&E) has in recent years expanded its system, now operating private trackage at the Refinery in Linden. In November 2003, M&E won a contract to operate a rail line in Maine known as the Rockland Branch. M&E formed a subsidiary company, Eastern Railroad, to operate that line.  The M&E is working with Union County to revive freight service along the northern portion of the former Valley Railroad trackage between Summit and Cranford. Inclusion of the former Rahway Valley Railroad trackage in the M&E system would allow the M&E to access its Bayway Refinery operations via its own track, and to interchange with the recently reactivated Island Railway freight connection to New Jersey.To get between its lines, the M&E has rights on Jersey Transits Line and Line west of West End (the junction west of The Palisades with NJTs Main Line); it uses the Main Line and the County Line to interchange with the York, Susquehanna and Western Railway at Junction.In early 2009, the M&E took over contract operations of the Railroad (former Lackawaxen & Stourbridge) in Pennsylvania.In addition to freight service, M&E operates charter passenger (excursion) service and rents railcars. It also allows film production companies to rent trains for filming. Recent films including from Heaven, Lisa Smile and the independent film Station Agent, as well as the reality television series Next Food Network Star, have used Morristown & Erie equipment.HistoryThe Morristown & Erie Railway was incorporated on August 28, 1903 as a consolidation of the Whippany River Railroad and the Whippany and Passaic River Railroad, both owned by the same people, the McEwan brothers. The former company built a line from Morristown (on the Lackawanna and Western Railroads main line) to Whippany, and the latter built trackage from Whippany to Essex Fells to connect with a branch of the Railroad (hence the Erie in the M&Es name). Freight and passenger service ran from Morristown to Jersey City, with seven daily round trips by 1923.  Rail buses were sometimes used and there were many flag stops. Competition from the automobile, however, caused ridership to fall rapidly, and by April 1928 the M&E had discontinued all passenger service.    Throughout the years, the M&E would remain a well-run and profitable railroad, but following War I, and into the 1920s, railroads all over the US had started to suffer the effects of trucking competition.  The tremendous economic downturn during the Depression of the 1930s only made matters worse. Even so, the M & E would be the only US railroad to rid itself of all debt during the era leading up to War II.   In 1952, the line received its first diesel, an S-4 from Alco. The 1970s were slow times for the railroad, as the paper mills in Whippany shut down and railroad car shipments dropped precipitously. By 1978, despite a locomotive rebuilding business, the railroad was down to hauling fewer than a dozen cars in a single week and the once proud railroad was forced to file for bankruptcy.   New managementIn 1982, Benjamin J. Friedland became president of a group of investors who took over operation of the ailing Morristown & Erie Railway. During his tenure, Ben Friedland would become a spokesman for line railroads in the US. At the same time, he would become a spokesman for his own railroad, and using his public relations skills he oversaw the rebuilding and expansion of the railroads customer base that had been eroding over the previous 30 years. He also spearheaded the rebuilding and refurbishment of the railroads locomotive roster; new units would eventually also be purchased. Friedland is also credited with the opening of the Railway Museum in 1985. But most important to the railroads viability, Ben Friedland ushered in an era of expansion to the railroad itself: freight service on the Chester Branch began December 21, 1983; in 1986, contracts were signed with Morris County to maintain and operate the High Bridge Branch and the Dover & Rockaway Branch, operation of the Hope & Ivyland Railroad for two years in 1989-90; and in what might be considered Friedlands master stroke as president, the M&E became the contract in-plant switcher at the Bayway Refinery, Infineum, and Conoco Philips, in NJ in 1995.  Ben Friedlands death in 1998 shocked and saddened the railroad and railfan communities who had seen Ben, in his 16 years at the helm of the M&E, ascend from an obscure railroader to an industry icon.The expansion of the M&E operations continued after Friedlands death. The M&E would operate the SEPTA owned Railroad in County, Pennsylvania from July 1, 2003 to November 18, 2004 (the line is currently operated by the Penn Railroad.)On November 1, 2003, M&E took over operation of the Rockland Branch, a former Central Railroad line now owned by the state of Maine.(Employer Status Determination) M&E created a subsidiary, Eastern Railroad, for its Maine operations.BranchesM&E Main LineAlso known as the Whippany Branch, this is the Morristown & Erie Railways original main line, in use since 1903 and with some portions dating back to 1895. The 9 mile (14.48 km) line runs between Baker Interlocking (connection with NJ Transits Line in Morristown, where M&Es main office, yard and shop are located) northeast to Roseland in Essex County. The line is single track and has many grade crossings. It serves Cedar Knolls in Hanover Township, Whippany in Hanover Township and East Hanover and Roseland. The line currently ends at Interstate 280 in Roseland.  The 1/2 mile or so of line remaining had ceased to be used by the last stop in the line at Bobst Group Inc., and has been subject to being removed or overgrown with weeds and trees at a local golf course and at housing projects which have stood in its way.New Jersey Transit has expressed interest in the line, and in 2000 listed the Morristown/Roseland right of way under projects to be defined/studied for the year 2020.(New Jersey Association of Railroad Passengers, The 2020 Transit Map (Jersey Transit, October 2000))May, 1936 station list(Official Guide of the Railways; August, 1936: National Railway Publication Company.)Customers(products/shipments listed in parentheses)*Standard Roofings, Cedar Knolls (Building materials)*Ultra Green Energy Services, LLC. (Bio-Diesel transload, waste cooking oil)*Whippany Railway Museum, Whippany *Suburban Propane, Whippany (Fuel oil)*Royal Lubricants, East Hanover (Oils, Lubricants)*Givaudan, East Hanover (Food, products)*Service Electric and Gas Company (PSE&G), Roseland (Fuel)*ACE Lumber, Roseland (Building materials)*B&G Foods, Roseland (Food)Chester BranchThe Chester Branch was a former Lackawanna and Western Railroad branch line that was extended in 1869 to New Jersey to serve the local mining industry. In 1983  Conrail planned to abandon the branch line, but Manufacturing and another local business that used the line purchased it to continue rail services to their facilities.  In the fall of 2009, County, New Jersey purchased the line and leased rail operations to the M&E. The part of the branch that is still operated is located entirely within Roxbury Township. Branching off from Lake (Chester) Junction, it ends in Succasunna. High Bridge Branch service uses this line to access the High Bridge Branch at Junction. The line was rehabilitated in 2010 with the use of federal stimulus funds obtained by the lines new owner, Morris County DOT. The M&E offers weekday service on the line to two businesses, and hopes to attract new customers upon completion of the track rehabilitation project. Customers(products/shipments listed in parentheses)*Holland Manufacturing, Succasunna (Miscellaneous)*Kuikens Lumber, Succasunna (Lumber)High Bridge BranchThis is one of two branch lines M&E began operating in 1986. The High Bridge Branch is owned by County, New Jersey and is leased to the M&E. A former Railroad of New Jersey line called the Bridge Branch, it splits from the Chester Branch at Junction and heads southwest through Succasunna and Flanders.The line ends in a rural area west of Route 206 in Flanders. Orignally excluded from the Conrail system in 1976, the Branch remained in service under a subsidy agreement by local authorities until 1981. Morris County purchased the line from the state in 1982, with the line south of Flanders removed.The right-of-way south of where the line ends was changed into a recreational trail known as the Trail, which runs along the former rail line route to High Bridge. The trail ends in High Bridge, NJ where there is still active passenger rail service by the Jersey Transit Valley Line.Customers(products/shipments listed in parentheses)*R.P. Smith, Succasunna (Concrete)*Target Industries, Flanders (Plastic)*R Us, Flanders (Packaged Goods)Dover & Rockaway BranchOriginally the and Rockaway Railroad, the second of two ex-Jersey Central lines taken over by M&E in 1986, the Dover & Rockaway branch operates from D&R Junction (where it meets the NJ Transit Morristown Line) in Wharton through downtown Dover northeast to Rockaway. The line ends along Green Pond Road in Rockaway Township, north of 80. This line passes through downtown Dover and Rockaway with many street crossings. All the customers on this branch are located in an industrial park along Green Pond Road, at the north end of the branch.Customers(products/shipments listed in parentheses)*Polyfil, Rockaway (Plastics-Polyethylene)*Endot, Rockaway (Plastics-Piping)*NexPak, Rockaway (Plastics-Packaging)*Action Technologies, Rockaway (Plastics-Extruding)*Lumber, Rockaway (Building materials)Rahway Valley Railroad operationsIn 2001 the M&E was selected to repair and operate a rail line consisting of the New Jersey portion of the Staten Island Railroad between Linden and Cranford, and the former Rahway Valley Railroad between Cranford and Summit. Both sections are now known as the Rahway Valley Railroad. The New Jersey Department of Transportation owns the lines, and the County of Union administers the contract.(Rahway Valley Railroad)  As of late 2006, only the southern portion of the Rahway Valley Railroad has been restored, as the restoration of the northern portion from Summit to Cranford is being challenged in court and lacks sufficient county funding. The first M&E train ran on the southern portion of the line on July 13, 2005.(Morristown & Erie Railway Inc.)  As of late 2006, Union County is working to revive freight service on the former Valley Railroad route from Summit to a connection with the former Island Railway and Conrail at New Jersey. The M&E would be the likely operator of any reactivated Rahway Valley line service from Summit to Cranford.  Operation of the Rahway Valley line from Summit to Cranford would allow the M&E to access their operations at the Bayway Refinery in Linden via a more direct connection using trackage rights over the Morris and Essex lines and would provide freight service to customers along the Rahway Valley line, which was abandoned in 1992. The Rahway Valley line could also be used as an alternative for long distance freight services, as needed. Morristown & Erie Locomotive Roster ReferencesExternal links*Morristown & Erie Railway (official site)
1301540
Museum_fr_Naturkunde
website        http://www.naturkundemuseum-berlin.de/index_english.htmlThe Museum fr Naturkunde, officially  the  (Museum fr Naturkunde  Leibniz Research Institute for Evolution and Biodiversity at the Humboldt University Berlin) or Naturkundemuseum (Natural History Museum), occasionally known as the Humboldt Museum, is a natural history museum in Berlin, Germany. Usually the museums name is abbreviated MFN, but other shorts are common in the older literature, too. The museum houses a massive collection of more than 30 million zoological, paleontological, and mineralogical specimens, including more than ten thousand specimens. It is most famous for two spectacular exhibits: the largest mounted dinosaur in the world, and the most exquisitely preserved specimen of the earliest known bird, Archaeopteryx.This is the largest museum of natural history in Germany, and was established in 1810. Its collections contain objects from three major fields, paleontology, mineralogy, and zoology. The museums mineral collections date back as early as to the Academy in 1700. Significant zoological specimens were recovered for example by the German deep-sea Valdiva expedition (189899), by the German Southpolar Expedition (190103), and by the German Sunda Expedition (192931). Expeditions to fossil beds in Tendaguru in former Deutsch Ostafrika (today Tanzania) unearthed rich paleontological treasures. The collections are so extensive that less than 1 in 5000 specimens is actually exhibited, and they attract researchers from around the world.Additional exhibits include a mineral collection representing 75% of the minerals in the world, a large meteor collection, the largest piece of amber in the world; exhibits of the now-extinct quagga and tasmanian tiger, and Bobby the gorilla, a Zoo celebrity from the 1920s and 1930s. Exhibitions File:Naturkundemuseum Brachiosaurus brancai.jpg|left|thumb|The Dinosaur Hall seen from the entrance, with the skeleton of Giraffatitan (formerly Brachiosaurus) brancai in the centerFile:Naturkundemuseum Berlin - Archaeopteryx - Eichsttt.jpg|left|thumb| The Berlin Specimen of ArchaeopteryxThe exhibition at the MFN covers all aspects of natural history, including displays of mineralogical, paleontological and zoological specimens. Since the museum renovation in 2007, a large hall explains biodiversity and the processes of evolution, while several rooms feature regularly changing special exhibitions. Dinosaur Hall The specimen of Giraffatitan brancai(S. Paul formally moved the Brachiosaurus brancai species to a new subgenus (Giraffatitan) in 1988, and Olshevsky promoted the new taxa to genus in 1991. Although the change has been generally accepted among scientists, as of 2011 the museums labels still use the old genus name.) in the central exhibit hall is the largest mounted dinosaur skeleton in the world.It is composed of fossilized bones recovered by the German paleontologist Janensch from the fossil-rich Tendaguru beds of Tanzania between 1909 and 1913. The remains are primarily from one gigantic animal, except for a few tail bones (caudal vertebrae) which belong to another animal of the same size and species.The mount is 12.72 m (41 ft 5 in) tall, and 22.25 m (73 ft) long (as of 2005). When living, the long-tailed, long-necked herbivore probably weighed 50 t (55 tons). While the carnegiei mounted next to it (a copy of an original from the Museum of Natural History in Pittsburgh, States) actually exceeds it in length (27 m, or 90 ft), the Berlin specimen is taller, and far more massive.File:Naturkundemuseum_berlin_apr2009.jpg|right|thumb|The Dinosaur hall, reverse view. Kentrosaurus in the foreground, Diplodocus, Giraffatitan and Dicraeosaurus from left to right in the back. Archaeopterxy The Berlin Specimen of Archaeopteryx lithographica (HMN 1880), is also displayed in the central exhibit hall. The dinosaur-like body with an attached tooth-filled head, wings, claws, long lizard-like tail, and the clear impression of feathers in the surrounding stone is strong evidence of the link between reptiles and birds. The Archaeopteryx is a fossil; and the time of its discovery was apt: coming on the heels of Darwins 1859 magnum opus, Origin of Species, made it quite possibly the most famous fossil in the world.Recovered from the German limestone beds in 1871, it is only the third Archaeopteryx to be discovered and the most complete. The first specimen, a single 150 million year old feather found in 1860, is also in the possession of the museum. Minerals Halls The MFNs collection comprises roughly 250.000 specimens of minerals, of which roughly 4.500 are on exhibit in the Hall of Minerals.(Sddeutsche Zeitung Online Wissenschaft im Paradies - Schner forschen, accessed 9.9.2011)( MFN entry in the database University museums and collections in Germany of the Hermann von Helmholtz-Zentrums fr Kulturtechnik, Humboldt-Universitt zu Berlin, accessed 9.9.2011) Evolution in action A large hall explains various principles of evolution. It was opened in 2007 after a major renovation of parts of the building. History File:Raphus cucullatus -Museum fur Naturkunde, Berlin, Germany -taxidermy-29Aug2009.jpg|upright|right|thumb|A stuffed DodoMinerals in the museum were originally part of the collection of instructors from the Mining Academy. The University of Berlin was founded in 1810, and acquired the first of these collections in 1814, under the aegis of the new Museum of Mineralogy. In 1857, the paleontology department was founded, and 1854 a department of petrography and general geology was added.By 1886 the University was overflowing with collections, so design began on a new building nearby at Invalidenstrae 43, which opened as the Museum of Natural History in 1889. The museum was built on the site of a former ironworks and this is reflected in two spectacular cast iron stairwells within the building.Of particular significance is the contribution of the first director after the move to the new building. In the past the museum simply consisted of the entire collections being open to the public, but Mbius instigated a clear split between a public exhibition space with a few choice specimens, together with explanations of their relevance, and the remainder of the collection held in archives for scientific study. This scheme was adopted by all other natural history museums.The collections were damaged by the Allied bombing of Berlin during War II. The eastern wing was severely damaged, and is only now in the process of being rebuilt. From 2010, is planned to house the entire alcohol collections in the east wing under fully modern conditions of specimen storage.In 1993, after the shake-up caused by the of Germany, the museum split into the three divisions: The Institutes of Mineralogy, Zoology, and Paleontology. Infighting between the institute directors led to important changes in 2006, which saw the appointment of a Director General and the replacement of the former institutes by a division into Collections, Research and Exhibitions. Since January 1st, 2009 the Museum has officially separated from the Humboldt-University and become part of the Wilhelm Leibniz Scientific Community as the Museum fr Naturkunde  Leibniz Institute for Research on Evolution and Biodiversity at the Humboldt University Berlin (). It is legally set up as a foundation. Footnotes  References * * * Maier, Gerhard.  African dinosaurs unearthed : the Tendaguru expeditions.  Bloomington, Indiana : Indiana University Press, 2003.  (Life of the Past Series). External links * Museum fr Naturkunde (home page)* Naturkundemuseum Berlin seeks sponsors for a hoard of world heritage treasures, by Eva-Maria Levermann from Goethe-Institut* History of Humboldt-Universitt zu Berlin* Photo of the Berlin specimen of the Archaeopteryx* History of the mineralogical collections at the Museum of Natural History in Berlin* Time-lapse film of the dismantling of Brachiosaur* History of the mineral collectionfr Naturkundefr Naturkunde (Berlin)fr Naturkunde der Humboldt-Universitt zu Berlin ()Historiae Naturalis (Berolinum)ja:no:HumboldtmuseetHistorii Naturalnej w Berliniefr Naturkunde (Berlin)
1303719
Council_of_Scientific_and_Industrial_Research
Council of Scientific and Industrial Research (CSIR) established in 1942, is an autonomous body and Indias largest Research and Development (R&D) organization, with 39 laboratories and 50 field stations or extension centers spread across the nation, with a collective staff of over 17,000.(About us - 2007) Although CSIR is mainly funded by the Ministry of Science and Technology, it operates as an autonomous body registered under the Registration of Societies Act of 1860.(CSIR Web site)The research and development activities of CSIR includes various fields such as engineering, engineering, ocean sciences, biology, metallurgy, chemicals, mining, food, petroleum, leather, and environment.( In December 2006, Director General of CSIR, Raghunath A. Mashelkar, retired following which M. K. Bhan took over the post, but he was relieved on 7 March 2007. After that Ramasami had the additional charge of Director General of CSIR until Samir K. Brahmachari was appointed as the Director General on 13 November 2007. In late 2007, the Minister of Science and Technology, Sibal admitted, in a Hour session of the Parliament, that CSIR has developed 1,376 technologies/knowledgebase during the last decade of 20th century.(Minster of S&T claims India made 1,300-odd inventions in a decade)CSIR Achievements*Achieved the first breakthrough of flowering of Bamboo within weeks as against twenty years in nature.()*First to analyze genetic diversity of the indigenous tribes of Andaman and to establish their origin out of Africa 60,000 years ago.*Developed the first transgenic Drosophila model for drug screening for cancer in humans.*First to introduce fingerprinting in India.*Helped India to be the first Pioneer Investor under the Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea.*Invented the first ever only once a week non-steroidal family planning pill in the world by the name of Saheli.*Designed Indias first ever parallel processing computer Flosolver.()*Partnered more than 50,000 companies with turnover ranging from Rs 5 lakhs to Rs 500,000 crores.*Rejuvenated Indias one hundred year old refinery at Digboi using the most modern molecular distillation technology.*Provided the critical technology for the NMP Lube Extraction Plant of capacity of 2,50,000 tonnes per year.*Development of a versatile portable PC-based software Bio-Suite for bioinformatics.*Design of 14 seater plane SARAS.()*Established first ever in the world Knowledge Digital Library accessible in in five international languages, English, German, French, Japanese and Spanish.()*Remained in Top 3 in the list of PCT patent applications amongst all developing countries.*Topped list of holders of U.S. patents.*Successfully challenged the grant of patent in the USA for use of haldi (turmeric) for wound healing and neem as insecticide.*In 2009, the Council of Scientific and Industrial Research (CSIR) has completed the Human Genome Sequencing.(http://abclive.in/abclive_health/csir_human_genome_sequencing.html)Shanti Swarup Bhatnagar Prize for Science and TechnologyThe Shanti Swarup Bhatnagar (SSB) Prizes are awarded annually by the Council of Scientific and Industrial Research (CSIR) for notable and outstanding research, applied or fundamental, in Biological, Chemical, Earth, Atmosphere, Ocean and Planetary, Engineering, Mathematical, Medical and Physical Sciences.Research Laboratories under CSIR# Materials and Processes Research Institute# C-MMACS - Centre for Mathematical Modelling and Computer Simulation, Bangalore# CBRI - Building Research Institute, Roorkee# CCMB- for Cellular and Molecular Biology, Hyderabad# CDRI - Drug Research Institute, Lucknow# CECRI- Electro Chemical Research Institute, Karaikudi# CEERI - Electronics Engineering Research Institute, Pilani http://www.ceeri.res.in/# CFRI - Fuel Research Institute, Dhanbad# CFTRI - Food Technological Research Institute, Mysore# CGCRI - Glass and Ceramic Research Institute, Kolkata# CIMAP - Institute of Medicinal and Aromatic Plants, Lucknow# CLRI - Leather Research Institute, Chennai# CMERI - Mechanical Engineering Research Institute, Durgapur# CMRI - Mining Research Institute, Dhanbad# CRRI - Road Research Institute, Delhi# CSIO - Scientific Instruments Organisation, Chandigarh# CSMCRI - Salt and Marine Chemicals Research Institute, Bhavnagar http://www.csmcri.org# IGIB - of Genomics and Integrative Biology, Delhi http://www.igib.res.in# IHBT - of Himalayan Bioresource Technology, Palampur# IICB - Institute of Chemical Biology, Kolkata# IICT - Indian Institute of Chemical Technology, Hyderabad# IIP - Institute of Petroleum, Dehradun# IMT - of Microbial Technology, Chandigarh# IITR - Institute of Toxicology Research, Lucknow (Formerly known as Toxicology Research Centre)# NAL - Aerospace Laboratories, Bangalore# NBRI - Botanical Research Institute, Lucknow# NCL - Chemical Laboratory, Pune# NEERI - Environmental Engineering Research Institute, Nagpur# NGRI - Geophysical Research Institute, Hyderabad# NIO - National Institute of Oceanography, Paula# NISCAIR - Institute of Science Communication and Information Resources, New Delhi# NISTADS - Institute of Science, Technology and Development Studies, New Delhi# NML - Metallurgical Laboratory, Jamshedpur# NPL - National Physical Laboratory, New Delhi# RRL, Bhubaneshwar - Regional Research Laboratory, Bhubaneshwar http://www.rrlbhu.res.in/ (Now known as Institute of Minerals and Materials Technology-www.immt.res.in)# RRL, Jammu - Regional Research Laboratory, Jammu http://www.rrljammu.org/index1.htm# NEIST (RRL), Jorhat - East Institute of Science and Technology, Jorhat , Jorhat http://jorhat.nic.in/rrl.htm# National Institute for Interdisciplinary Science and Technology - Thiruvananthapuram# SERC, M - Engineering Research Centre, ChennaiSee also* Swarup Bhatnagar Prize for Science and Technology*for Cellular and Molecular Biology, Hyderabad*Central Electro Chemical Research Institute (CECRI), Karaikudi*Food Technological Research Institute, Mysore*Research Institute, Dehradun*Centre for Biological Sciences, Bangalore*National Physical Laboratory (NPL), New Delhi*Regional Research Laboratory, Thiruvananthapuram*Engineering Center, New Delhi*IISERReferences(External links* Official website* Major Achievements of CSIR       
1309754
Crowsnest_Pass,_Alberta
footnotes                The Municipality of Crowsnest Pass is a specialized municipality located in the Pass of the Rocky Mountains in southwest Alberta, Canada. The municipality formed as a result of the amalgamation of five municipalities  the Village of Bellevue, the Town of Blairmore, Town of Coleman, the Village of Frank and Improvement District No. 5 (which included the Hamlet of Hillcrest)  on January 1, 1979. Today, Blairmore and Coleman remain the two largest communities while Frank is the smallest. Crowsnest, Passburg and Sentinel (Sentry) are other former communities (abandoned, or much reduced) within the municipalitys boundaries. History The municipality owes its existence to coal mining, the areas primary industry since the first mine opened in 1900. Its ethnic and cultural diversity comes from the many European and other immigrants attracted to the area by the mines. Through the years coal mining suffered from fluctuating coal prices, bitter strikes, and underground accidents, and all the mines on the Alberta side closed throughout the 20th century as cheaper, safer open-pit mines opened on the British Columbia side of the pass. There is an operating coal mine just across the B.C. border in Sparwood which continues to provide significant employment for the Municipality of Crowsnest Pass.Crowsnest Pass is known for tragedy. In 1903 the tip of Turtle Mountain broke loose and decimated part of the Village of Frank (the Frank Slide). In 1914, the mine disaster occurred in the Hillcrest Mine, killing 189 men. Serious spring floods occurred in 1923 and 1942. Periodic forest fires have swept the valley, including one in the summer of 2003 that threatened the entire municipality.The area was a centre for rum-running during the prohibition of 1916 - 1923, when liquor was illegally brought across the provincial border from British Columbia. This legacy is celebrated each July during Rum-Runner Days, which includes a parade, many civic and sporting events, and a fireworks display called Thunder In the Valley that attracts tens of thousands of visitors from nearby communities.Today, the Municipality of Crowsnest Pass has much to offer visitors. In addition to its spectacular natural setting, the municipality is rich in human history, and tourism promises to become a significant industry. Points of interest Within the Municipality of Crowsnest Pass one can find the Slide Interpretive Centre, an interpretive display at Leitch Collieries Provincial Historic Site, underground tours of the Bellevue Mine Provincial Historic Site, and the Crowsnest Museum in downtown Coleman where pamphlets for self-guided historical driving tours of the municipality are also available. The area offers hiking and fishing in the summer, and in winter snowmobiling, a downhill ski hill, and a groomed cross-country ski area, and is about  from major ski hills at both Alpine Resort and Mountain Resort. Demographics In 2006, Crowsnest Pass had a population of 5,749 living in 3,004 dwellings, an 8.2% decrease from 2001. The municipality has a land area of  and a density of .()In 2001, the population of the Municipality of Crowsnest Pass was 6,262.(Crownset Pass Community Profile - Statistics Canada 2001 Census) Trivia *Blairmore elected Canadas first Communist town council under mayor Bill Knight during the Depression.(CBC article - Blairmore elections)(Blairmore the Red - Crowsnest Pass Promoter, Nov. 9 2007)  (See Alberta for more information)*Crowsnest Pass was the site of the last train robbery in Canada (1920). *Albertas first female mayor, Clemence Jepson (1914-2010), was elected in Bellevue in November 1963.*The gravy recipe for Colonel Sanders Kentucky Fried Chicken was developed here.(Crowsnest And Its People, Crowsnest Pass Historical Society, 1979)*The frontier town in Disneys 1985 film Journey of Natty Gann was shot here. See also *of communities in Alberta*municipalities of Alberta References  External links *Municipality of Crowsnest Pass*Live in Crowsnest Pass*Crowsnest Pass Chamber of Commerce*Crowsnest Pass Promoter*Crowsnest Pass Golf & Country Club*Nippon Institute of Technology Inter-Cultural CampusPass (citt)Pass
1311907
OGame
OGame is a text-based, resource-management and space-war themed massively multiplayer online game with over two million accounts.(OGame) OGame was created in 2000 and is produced and maintained by Bioware.(www.heise.de article (German))(www.br-online.de article (German)). OGame is available in multiple languages, and different nationalities have their own communities. The game does not differ between the nationality communities except in rare cases. Players are generally informed of news and other things such as changes in rules or new versions through the official forums (Official OGame forum).As of January 19, 2011, OGame.org has a total of 52 universes, including ten universes using the new redesign(http://ogame.wikia.com/wiki/List_of_Universes). More are being added periodically. The Ogame prOgame universe (Universe 35) has been discontinued as an exclusive for paying members, so anyone may now sign up for it. Gameplay All OGame universes consist of three classifications: galaxies, systems, and planet slots then break down to planets, moons, and debris fields. All universes have up to 9 galaxies, each with 499 (1-499) systems, which have 15 planet slots.  Sending fleets between different galaxies takes the longest time, whereas sending a fleet within the same planet slot takes the least time. distance of 5 between moon-planet-debris field --- 1,005 to the next planet +5 per planet past --- 2,795 for 1 solar system then + 95 per solar system past(planet has no factor), then 20,000 to the next galaxy +20,000 per galaxy past(no matter the planet or solar system) one unique thing is that it might be farther to a planet in the same galaxy 174 solar systems or more.Each player starts with one planet at a randomly assigned coordinates in slots 4,6,8,10,12, in a random system and galaxy. The first planet always consists of 163 fields, which determine how many building upgrades can be built on the planet, regardless of the slot in the players system.  Originally, the players empire could consist of up to 9 planets in any unoccupied planet slot. However, with the redesign, that cap was lifted, albeit with the requirement that each planet required two additional levels of a research whose progressive cost makes more than eleven colonies virtually unfeasible. All construction, research, and missions are performed and launched from a planet or moon. Development is done through using three resources: metal, crystal, and deuterium, and also energy and dark matter. There are different ways to obtain these resources, including mining, trading, and raiding (see Combat below). Players are ranked according to their points, with one point awarded for every one thousand resource units invested in a construction, research, ships, or defense. No points are given for unspent resources. Combat Unlike many other strategy games, OGame does not give the player constant control of his or her spacecraft. Instead, the player sends the ship(s) to a location (using the games coordinate system) and what happens when the fleet arrives is beyond the players control; in OGame, combat is resolved when fleets and/or defenses meet. The combat takes place instantly and consists of 1 to 6 rounds. Fleet attacks are usually aimed to obtain other players resources, which is called raiding, although fleet attacks can also be done to destroy an opponents fleet and collect the debris field created from the battle. Defenses are built to defend a planet against an attacking enemy fleet. Alliances An alliance is a group of players who have banded together and is mostly used for solidarity purposes. Alliances are created for players to protect each other from attacks, join together to raid other planets, or to promote free trade amongst members. Members of an alliance can use the  Alliance Combat System, available in some universes, to synchronize fleet movements and missions with members of the same alliance and temporarily deploy a fleet on an allys planet. Merchants Players can hire a merchant using dark matter to trade one resource type for another. The amount of resources traded is limited to the amount of free space in ones storage buildings and the amount of dark matter the player has. Officers OGame offers 4 different Officers and a Commander, each costs a set amount of Dark Matter, obtained with in-game exploration or microtransactions to hire for either 1 week or 3 months. The names of the four different officers are the Engineer, the Geologist, the Technocrat and the Fleet Admiral. Each one improves certain elements of chance or resource production.The Commander officer gives the user extra benefits such as an ad-free interface, a building queue, an improved galaxy view with added information, a message filter, extra shortcuts to enhance play and an Empire view.  Empire view gives the player an interface which shows information about all planets, including mine and power plant levels and ships currently docked.  Upgrades to buildings can be performed via the Empire view. Resources There are three main resources: Metal, Crystal and Deuterium. The three main resources (Metal, Crystal, Deuterium) can be created via mines. There are separate mines for each resource which can be upgraded to produce the resources faster. These resources are used for making buildings, ships, defenses and for researching technology. To run the mines, energy is needed. Energy is produced by creating the following: solar plant, solar satellites (available via shipyard), and fusion reactor (converts a specified amount of deuterium into energy). These buildings can also be upgraded to produce more energy.Dark Matter, however, cannot be created. Fleets can be sent out on on expeditions to search for it. It can also be bought with real money. Dark Matter is used to call a trader who trades the main three resources, or to buy an officer. Expeditions Expeditions are fleets that go outside the system but not to another. Astrophysics is needed for expeditions. Awards OGame won the bronze Superbrowsergame Award in 2006.( ) References  External links * Official English OGame website* Gameforge* OgameBlog* OGame US website* OGame wiki* ar:bs:OGameca:OGamecs:OGameda:OGamede:OGameel:OGamees:OGamefr:OGamegl:OGameko:it:OGamenl:OGameja:OGameno:OGamepl:OGamept:OGamero:OGameru:OGamesimple:OGamemk:OGamesk:OGamesh:Ogamefi:OGamesv:OGametr:OGameuk:Ogamevi:OGamezh:OGame
1314135
Bruntl
__NOTOC__Bruntl (; , , Latin: Vallis Gaudiorum, Vrudental) is a town located near the western boundary of Region, in Silesia. A suitable position in the middle of the Mountains provides an ample number of touristic opportunities to the town. The cultural importance of Bruntl lies in its possession of a Baroque castle and many historical buildings. Geography Bruntl is situated between the Hrub Jesenk mountains and the rolling hills of the Nzk Jesenk mountains. The town lies in a valley surrounded by several hills (Uhlsk vrch, 672 m; Vodrensk vrch, 599 m; Zadn Zelen vrch, 563 m; Kozinec, 639 m). The Black Creek (ern potok) with its tributaries, the Oak Creek (Bukov potok), the Mare Creek (Kobyl potok), and the Waterworks Creek (Vodrensk potok), run through Bruntl. The Mare Pond (Kobyl rybnk) is located in the middle of the town. The Oak Pond (Bukov rybnk), with a surface area of 5 ha,(Czech Fishing Union. 2006. Fishing Waters, Non-Salmonid Waters, Bukov rybnk 1 A - MO Bruntl 5 ha http://crs-ova.fishnet.cz/index.php?pathreviry/view.php&typm&revir471169. Retrieved June 28, 2009.) lies almost 1 km northwest of the town. A dam reservoir the Slezsk Harta, 870 ha of sheet in size,(Povod Odry, the State Public Enterprise. 1998. The Waterwork of Slezsk Harta. http://www.pod.cz/harta.html. Retrieved June 28, 2009.) is located approximately 5 km southeast of the town. There are many residues resembling volcanic activity which took place in the Quaternary era. Uhlsk vrch (672 m), Venuina sopka (655 m), Velk Roudn (780 m), Mal Roudn (770) and others belong among extinct volcanos. These volcanoes are a part of the Slunen Highlands (Slunen vrchovina). The Slunen Highlands is 16 km long and it lies southwards from Bruntl to Moravsk Beroun, it includes the highest mountain of the Nzk Jesenk mountains, Mount Slunen (800 m). Geology Bruntl belongs to the Czech Massif which is the main geologic structure in the Czech Republic. Bruntl lies in the Moravian-Silesian Unit which is a preplatform unit formed until the end of the orogeny (Hercynian orogeny). Bruntl is a part of the region consisting foremost of sedimentary rocks formed during the Mississippian Epoch of the Carboniferous period. In terms of Czech geology, this geologic period is called kulm. The mentioned region stretches from Brno to Krnov.The main geologic formations distributed across the town and its surroundings are turbidites. The most common rock in the area is slate. In the west of the town slate enriched by apatite and zircon can be found. In the east of the town lighter forms of slate occur. Fluvial sands and rubble together with deluvial sediments of clay and sand origin lie along the rivers and creeks. Eluvial sediments prevail in the west part of the town.The most remarkable geologic site in the surroundings of the town is Uhlsk vrch. Originally, Uhlsk vrch was a stratovolcano (compositive volcano) formed by both explosive and effusive eruptions, thus it is composed of pyroclastic rocks. 40-80% of the mentioned pyroclastic rocks consist of lapilli, 10-50% consist of bombs, the rest is made from ash.(Zapletal, Jan. 1995. 38 - Uhlsk vrch u Bruntlu. In: Ji Zimk, Jaromr Demek, Ilja Pek, and Jan Zapletal, The Guide for Geologic Excursions. Middle and Northern Moravia and Silesia ke geologickm exkurzm. Stedn a severn Morava a Slezsko. Olomouc: Vydavatelstv Univerzity Palackho, s. 39. ISBN 80-7067-537-3.) In addition, it is possible to perceive a frequent occurrence of metamorphic xenoliths dated back to the Mississippian Epoch of the Carboniferous period. The colors of the pyroclastic rocks vary from brown to yellow. The older effusive eruptions resulted in an occurrence of nepheline basalt and nephelinite. The effusive phase is approximately 2.4  0.5 million years old( and therefore it dates back to the Pliocene (also called Pleiocene) and Pleistocene Epoch. History The only source referring to the founding of the town is the Uniov Charter issued by Czech king Pemysl I Otakar (11551230) in 1223. There it is stated that the town of Bruntl was the first town in Bohemia that had been granted Rights ten years before the issue of the charter. Possession of these rights shows the importance of the town because Rights are considered as one of the most remarkable set of Germanic medieval laws. The reasons leading the king Pemysl I Otakar to pursuit a founding of a new town were twofold. The northern border of Moravia had faced many attempts of colonization under auspices of the Bishops of Breslau (Wrocaw) so the necessity to prevent these actions was obvious. Also a discovery of ore deposits in the surroundings of Bruntl contributed to establishing the town. These facts have made historians assume Bruntl was founded by Vladislav Jindich, the Margrave of Moravia, in 1213.The mining of metals contributed to emerging of the town significantly, which was reflected by the first appearance of Bruntl coat of arms dated back to 1287. The town became a center of local crafts and trade. In addition, endowing with Rights Bruntl was the highest appellate jurisdiction for even Olomouc until 1352. Originally, Bruntl belonged to the domain of Moravian Margraves but in 1269 Bruntl was in part transferred into the possession of the Dukes of Opava and finally they took control over the whole Bruntl territory in 1318. Between 1385 and 1467 (1473) Bruntl was severally mortgaged and sold. Finally, the Lords of Vrbno gained Bruntl into their domain.The first person of the House of Vrbno was John of Bruntl and Vrbno, reigning from 1576 to 1577. His heirs, who had not reached their legal age at the time of the death of their father, were given the domain of Bruntl in 1506 by the Princess Barbara of Opava, Ratibo, and Krnov upon a condition of being a close ally to the Principality of Krnov. But the Lords of Vrbno preferred ties with the Principality of Opava and therefore they managed to gain an approval from II of Hungary and Bohemia in 1523 which granted an embodying of Bruntl domain into the Principality of Opava. The most important owner of Bruntl domain was Hynek The Older of Vrbno reigning from 1582 to 1596 who enjoyed a respect from the emperors Ferdinand I (15261564), Maximilian II (15641576), and Rudolf II (15761612). The last Lord of Vrbno was Hynek The Younger of Vrbno reigning from 1613 to 1614.Intensive mining backed by the Lords of Wrbenthal led to a founding of several neighbouring towns (e.g. Andlsk Hora about 1550, pod Praddem in 1611). In addition, many kinds of industry took place at these times (e.g. smithery at Rudn in 1405 and Mezina in 1567, 7 timber mills in 1579). In May 1617 Bruntl was bought by the last Lord of Vrbno John IV of Vrbno, who joined the Uprising of the Estates and gained a rank of the Director in 1619. His close ties to the Winter King V, Elector Palatine, who was Johns guest in February 1620, posed him into a very dangerous circumstances after the of White Mountain in1620. He was forced to leave his Freudenthal possessions and escape from the country in 1620. The emperor Ferdinand II (16191637) confiscated the Bruntl domain and gave it to his brother Karl I of Austria (16191624) who was the Grand Master (Hochmeister) of the Teutonic Order.The Freudenthal domain together with other properties of the Teutonic Order was under the direct administration of the Grand Master and therefore a lieutenancy was established in 1625. The Years War damaged the town significantly and after that conflict, Freudenthal has never achieved its previous importance again. During the 18th century many disasters challenged the town (e.g. the plague in 1714 and 1739, the great fire in 1748 and 1764). Neverthenless, many new baroque buildings were built during this period. Other improvements took place in Freudenthal, a new office was established in 1748. Development of industry could be perceived in Freudenthal during the 19th century. In terms of textile industry, Bruntl belonged to the most important towns in Silesia. In 1885, a public hospital was opened as the first in Silesia. In addition, many new high schools were established during the second half of the 19th century. During War in 1866, Freudenthal was occupied by the Prussian Army and the Freudenthal Castle served as a hospital for soldiers.According to the Austrian census of 1910 the town had 8,066 inhabitants, 7,965 of whom had permanent residence there. Census asked people for their native language, 7,939 (99.7%) were German-speaking. Jews were not allowed to declare Yiddish, most of them thus declared the German language as their native. Most populous religious groups were Catholics with 7,725 (95.8%), followed by Protestants with 229 (2.8%) and the Jews with 97 (1.2%).(Ludwig Patryn (ed): Die Ergebnisse der Volkszhlung vom 31. Dezember 1910 in Schlesien, Troppau 1912.)After the War I, a German-led uprising took place in Bruntl but it was suppressed by the Czech Army in December 1918. Between 1919 and 1924, the possessions of the Teutonic Order in Bruntl were put under the state administration. Within the Republic of Czechoslovakia, Bruntl belonged to the towns with significant preponderance of German inhabitants, only a very small Czech minority lived in Bruntl at that times. Not surprisingly, German nationalism gained many sympathizers among German inhabitants of Bruntl, which was reflected in an attempt for uprising in September 1938. After signing the Agreement on September 29, 1938, Bruntl was occupied by German troops. Bruntl was liberated by the Soviet army (Red Army) on May 7, 1945. In 1946 the possessions of the Teutonic Order were confiscated in accordance with the Decree of the President Bene and transferred to the Czechoslovak Republic. As was the case in most of the former Czechoslovakia, the German population was forcefully expelled. Education A wide arrange of educational facilities is available in Bruntl. Czech educational system distinguishes four basic levels of schools. A school is an educational facility aimed at providing a care for children, who has turn at least 2 years, throughout a day. The second level of education (which is perceived as education) is represented by schools, where attendance is compulsory for children from their 6 (in certain cases 7) years until they turn 15 years. Various sorts of schools present the third level of Czech educational system (which is perceived as education). Individual schools placed in the mentioned category differs in their specialization one another. The supreme level of school system is a university (which is perceived as education).According to the mentioned scheme, it is possible to distinguish schools located in Bruntl as follows. There are 6 nursery schools, 5 primary schools, and 6 high schools. In addition, the Business School Ostrava (a private-owned university style institution) has placed its consultation center into Bruntl. Therefore Bruntl inhabitants were given a chance to study a university in their own town. Moreover, a special school (in Czech terminology called Speciln kola) provides an education for Bruntl children with specific health difficulties (e.g. mentally affected children). There is also an art school in Bruntl. However, the Czech term Art School refers to a facility operating mostly on the levels of primary and education, which is independent of both primary and high schools.Another notable educational facility is the House of Children and Youth (in Czech terminology Dm dt a mldee). This facility is aimed at providing various leisure activities for children (615 years), young people (15-18), and adults of all ages. Understandably, attendance to this type of educational facility is entirely optional. The current sorts of activities offered by the House of Children and Youth vary from sports (dancing, volleyball, gymnastics, etc.) to arts (pottery, playing various musical instruments).The data included in both tables are valid as of the school year 2005/2006. The mentioned data were retrieved from the websites of the respected schools. The official English names of the schools were deliberately created by author, because any official English names of the mentioned educational facilities were not found. People thumb|right|plate of Therese Krones* Adam ()()* Irena Anders (ne Jarosiewicz) (born 1920, here), a Polish-Czech actress* Bitto** Ida Kelarov (ne Bittov) (1956, here), singer** Bittov (born 1958, here), a Roma-origin avant-garde violinist, singer, composer* Gudas (born 1965, here), a Czech hockey player* Heeger ()(* Sigfried Siggi Held (born 1942, here), a football player, acted in Germany* Konrad Hoensch (1935, here - 2001) (de)* Jahn (1835, u Bruntlu, near here - 1900), an Austro-Hungarian conductor* Koppitz (1884, Schreiberseifen, near here - 1936), a photographer* Franz Krones (17971832), actor(** Krones (, 1801, here - 1830), actress, acted in Austria* Luke (born 1978, here), a Czech football player* Machov (born 1979, here), a Czech female basketball player* Machala (born 1963, here), a Czech football coach, player* Machold ()(* Nather (1924, here - 2009, Oberstaufen), engineer (de)* Niesner (19251994), graphic artist* Scholz-Peschke (born 1929)* Templer ()(* Hanns Wittek (18951935), lyricist, author* Peter Woseipka (born 1939), artist Residents * Anton Gebauer (1872, Bennisch - 1942) (cs)* Gotschke (1912, Bennisch - 2000, Rangendingen) (de)* Christoph Handke (), livd here Twin Cities {|classnone border2 styletext-align:left; border-collapse:collapse; bordercolor:#fff; margin:1em auto 1em auto;|colspan5 styletext-align:center; background:#bdb76b;|Twin towns|- styletext-align:center; background:khaki;|stylebackground:khaki;|City||colspan2 styletext-align:center; background:khaki;|Region/Country||styletext-align:center; background:khaki;|Beginning of Cooperation||styletext-align:center; background:khaki;|External link|- stylebackground:#eee8aa; ||Bdingen||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|25px||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|Hesse/Germany||stylebackground:#eee8aa; text-align:center;|1999||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|http://www.buedingen24.net|- stylebackground:#eee8aa; ||Castellarano||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|25px||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|RE/Italy||stylebackground:#eee8aa; text-align:center;|2002||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|http://www.comune.castellarano.re.it/|- stylebackground:#eee8aa; ||Opole()  2007-2009 Urzd Miasta Opola}})||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|25px||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|Voivodship/Poland||stylebackground:#eee8aa; text-align:center;|1992||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|http://www.opole.pl|- stylebackground:#eee8aa; ||Plung||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|25px||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|Samogitia/Lithuania||stylebackground:#eee8aa; text-align:center;|2005||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|http://www.plunge.lt/|- stylebackground:#eee8aa; ||trovo||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|25px||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|region/Slovakia||stylebackground:#eee8aa; text-align:center;|2002||stylebackground:#eee8aa;|http://www.sturovo.sk/|} See also * symbols Footnotes  References * Czech Fishing Union. 2006. Fishing Waters, Non-Salmonid Waters, Bukov rybnk 1 A - MO Bruntl 5 ha. http://crs-ova.fishnet.cz/index.php?pathreviry/view.php&typm&revir471169 (accessed July 27, 2006)* Niesner, Tom. 2003. On History of Bruntl historie msta Bruntlu. The Official Website of Bruntl Municipal Office, August 11, 2003 July 23, 2006. http://www.mubruntal.cz/vismo/dokumenty2.asp?u1316&id_org1316&id93580&p1&p2&p3 (accessed July 26, 2006)* Povod Odry, the State Public Enterprise. 1998. The Waterwork of Slezsk Harta. http://web.archive.org/web/20071209084004/http://www.pod.cz/fr_prehrady.html (accessed July 27, 2006)* Venclek, Jaroslav et al. 1995. The Northern Moravia and the Czech Silesia Morava a esk Slezsko. esk Tn: Olza.* Zapletal, Jan. 1995. 38 - Uhlsk vrch u Bruntlu. In: Zimk, Demek, Pek, and Jan Zapletal, The Guide for Geologic Excursions. Middle and Northern Moravia and Silesia ke geologickm exkurzm. Stedn a severn Morava a Slezsko. Olomouc: Vydavatelstv Univerzity Palackho, s. 39. ISBN 80-7067-537-3. External links * Official website of Bruntal Municipal Office* Bruntl Castle * Detailed history of the town * Czech Office for Surveing, Mapping and Cadastre (esk ad zemmick a katastrln)cs:Bruntlde:Bruntles:Bruntleo:Bruntlfr:Bruntlit:Bruntlnl:Bruntlpl:Bruntlpt:Bruntl()simple:Bruntlsk:Bruntlsr:war:Bruntl
1322198
General_Pershing_Zephyr
Image:General Pershing Zephyr.jpg|thumb|The General Pershing Zephyr in 1939 near Colorado.Image:Silver Charger.jpg|thumb|9908 Silver Charger hauling a regular train in 1946.The General Pershing Zephyr was the ninth of the Burlington and Quincy Railroads Zephyr streamliners, and the last built as an integrated streamliner rather than a train hauled by an E-unit locomotive. It was constructed in 1939 with bodywork and passenger cars by Company and engine, electric transmission, power truck, and other locomotive equipment by General Motors Electro-Motive Corporation. Because its intended City, Missouri to Louis, Missouri route passed near the birthplace and boyhood home of famous War I General J. Pershing, the train was named after him. The power car was named Silver Charger, after Pershings horse Charger, while the passenger cars were named after Army badges of rankSilver Leaf, Silver Eagle, and Silver Star.Unlike previous Zephyrs, the General Pershing Zephyr was completely non-articulated; each car was self-contained and joined to the next by couplers, rather than shared trucks. The inflexibility of the articulated layout had been recognised; it was hard to lengthen, shorten, or replace parts of the train. The route did not require a high-capacity train nor a powerful locomotive, so the General Pershing Zephyr returned to the pattern of the first Zephyr, being a power/baggage car and three trailers. The power car, 9908 Silver Charger, was unique. It utilised a single new EMC 567 V-12 engine developing 1,000 hp, rather than the pair used in the contemporary E3. It had one Blomberg-designed E-unit A1A passenger truck at the front, with powered outer axles and a center idler axle, and an unpowered trailing truck, giving it the unusual arrangement of A1A-2. The back half of the power car was a baggage area.The train ran its assigned route until the United States entered War II, during which time the trainset ran on many different routes. As 9908 Silver Charger could be detached from its trainset, it continued in service hauling other trains after the rest of the streamlined trainset was withdrawn. In this form it lasted in service until 1966, following which it was donated to the of Transportation in Louis, Missouri.Traveling between Kansas City and St. Louis, Missouri required the General Pershing Zephyr to operate on tracks owned by the Railroad, officially making them an operating partner. To symbolize this joint administration, the General Pershing Zephyr often sported an Alton Burlington nose herald instead of the standard Burlington Route seen on most Burlington locomotives.   The diner-lounge-observation car Silver Star was sold to Iron Ore Corporation in 1974 and given to Newman Mining (now part of Billiton) in Australia and renamed Sundowner. It was used for many years as passenger accommodation on the fortnightly supply train to the mines. As at 2006, it is still used for VIP and inspection trains. References * * Lotz, David. General Pershing Zephyr. Downloaded on December 24, 2004.* 
1327436
Maspeth,_Queens
thumb|Flushing Avenue and Grand Avenue in Maspeth, Queens NYImage:Masbcreek.jpg|thumb|Maspeth Creek, looking west towards CreekMaspeth is a small community in the borough of Queens in York City. Neighborhoods sharing borders with Maspeth are Woodside and Sunnyside to the north, Long Island City to the northwest, Greenpoint to the west, East Williamsburg to the southwest, Fresh Pond and Ridgewood to the south, and Middle Village and Elmhurst to the east. HistoryThe area known today as Maspeth was chartered by Dutch and English settlers in the mid-17th century.  The Dutch had purchased land in the area known today as Queens in 1635, and within a few years began chartering towns. In 1642 they settled Maspat, under a charter granted to Rev. Francis Doughty.(http://www.nnp.org/vtour/regions/Long_Island/mespath.html) Maspat became the first European settlement in Queens.(http://www.rootsweb.com/~nyqueen2/Maspeth/) The settlement was leveled the following year in an attack by Native Indians, and the surviving settlers returned to Manhattan.  It wasnt until nine years later, in 1652, that settlers ventured back to the area, settling an area slightly inland from the previous Maspat location.  This new area was called Middleburg, and eventually developed into what is now the town of Elmhurst, bordering Maspeth.  Following the immigration waves of the 19th century, Maspeth was home to a town of Boyash (Ludar) Gypsies between 1925 and 1939, though this was eventually bulldozed.(http://www.smithsonianeducation.org/migrations/gyp/lud.html)The name Maspeth is derived from the name of Mespeatches Indians, one of the 13 main Indian tribes that inhabited Long Island. It is translated to mean at the bad waterplace relating to the many stagnant swamps that existed in the area.(http://www.queensnewyork.com/maspeth/chamberof/history.html)ColumbusvilleColumbusville was the name formerly applied to a section of Maspeth. It was a development of   Edward Dunn that took place on 69th Place (Originally known as Firth Avenue) between Avenue and Caldwell Avenue during 1854-55, and was subsequently absorbed into Maspeth. The name fell into disuse in the 1890s.()CommunityThe Metropolitan Avenue Bridge carries Street (Brooklyn) eastward across Kills from Williamsburg where it becomes Grand Avenue, Maspeths street for dining and business.  Grand Avenue continues eastward to end in Elmhurst.  Cemeteries take up a large part of this small neighborhood although they are separated from residential areas for the most part. Single home houses and multiple dwelling homes make up most of Maspeth and there are hardly any apartment buildings, except for the co-ops on 65th Place, also known as The Plateau.Forty-Third Street through 58th Street, including the former Furman Island, is industrial lowlands, and from 60th Street to 72nd Street is residential. The Dodge Corporation was present from 19201983. The Phelps Dodge mining company heavily contaminated Creek, which separates northern Brooklyn from western Queens and serves barge traffic.  Other freight moves on the Island Railroad Branch and the lightly used Branch.  A new West Maspeth rail freight station has been proposed in connection with a Rail Tunnel to diminish truck traffic across New York City.  It is opposed by residents who dont want more trucks in Maspeth.File:Maspeth Industrial Center Bushw LIRR jeh.JPG|thumb|Maspeth Industrial Center and BranchThere is access to the Expressway and the Long Island Expressway.  The former road crosses Newtown Creek on the Kosciuszko Bridge. These expressways are accessible at 69th and Grand Street, and also at 48th Street, where the two expressways cross.For many years a well known landmark in Maspeth was a pair of cylindrical natural gas tanks.  These tanks were considered sister tanks to similar (but differently operating) gas holders at the Newtown Holder Station in Elmhurst (Queens) NY.  There were many similarities: both were visible from major roadways, both were painted in an FAA-required red/white checkered color scheme, and both pairs of tanks have since been demolished.  However, The Maspeth holders were fixed above-ground structures, whereas the Elmhurst ones were rising/falling gasometers.Maspeth was the first English settlement in Queens County.  However, conflicts with the Mespet tribe forced many settlers to move to what is now Elmhurst in 1643.Most people who live in Maspeth are of Polish, Slavic, Italian, Irish, German, Hispanic or Chinese descent. Holy Cross R.C. Church, is the focal point of the three parishes in Maspeth. It has weekly masses, in English and Polish. It also conducts the yearly of the Cross, which the procession on the streets every Good Friday, starts from Holy Cross, go to St. Stans., and than finally ends at Transfiguration. These three parishes are only 2 blocks apart from each other. The Polish go to Holy Cross, the Irish & Spanish go to St. Stans., and Lithuanians go to Transfiguration. Only the parish of St. Stans is currently running a Catholic school for the city of Maspeth. The Catholic school for Holy Cross, has closed its doors in June of 2005, as to a lack of funding. But, Holy Cross still runs its weekend Polish School along with CCD classes.Maspeth is also home to the Oval.The unofficial mayor of Maspeth is Queens resident and local Stop and Shop manager Joe Kilcoyne, a favorite amongst the residents in the area.EducationSchools in the area include:*Holy Cross R.C. Church - Maspeth : Polish School and CCD classes on the weekends.*IS 73 The Frank Sansivieri Intermediate School in Maspeth is where most of the communitys children attend grades 6 through 8.*PS 58, The School of Heroes, was dedicated in 2002 in honor of the 9/11 victims on Grand Avenue at the site of the original Finast supermarket.It is named one of the best schools in the Maspeth community.*PS 153, Maspeth Elementary School*Saint Stanislaus Kostka School (Nursery - 8 Catholic School under the auspices of the Catholic Diocese of Brooklyn)*Martin Luther High School (9-12 private school)*Maspeth High School (Temporarily located at the campus of Metropolitan High School) is the first public high school in Maspeth. It is expected to open on September 2012.TransportAlthough there is no subway station in Maspeth, several bus routes make subway connections, including:*B57 to Flushing Avenue ( trains), Flushing Avenue ( train), Jay Street  MetroTech (  trains)*Q18 bus to Woodside  61st Street ( trains), Northern Boulevard ( trains), or 30th Avenue ( trains)*Q39 bus to Forest Avenue ( train), Queensboro Plaza ( trains), 23rd Street  Ely Avenue ( trains), or Long Island City  Court Square ( train)*Q47 bus to 69th Street or 74th Street  Broadway  ( train), Roosevelt Avenue  Jackson Heights ( trains), or Airport*Q58 bus to Grand Avenue  Newtown ( trains), Flushing  Main Street ( trains), Fresh Pond Road ( train), Forest Avenue ( train), MyrtleWyckoff Avenues ( trains)*Q59 bus to Grand Avenue  Newtown ( trains), Woodhaven Boulevard ( trains), 63rd Drive  Rego Park ( trains), or Grand Street ( train)*Q67 bus to Middle Village  Metropolitan Avenue ( train), Hunters Point Avenue ( trains), 21st Street  Van Alst ( train), Queensboro Plaza ( trains), Queens Plaza ( trains), 23rd Street  Ely Avenue ( trains), or Long Island City  Court Square ( train)ReferencesExternal links*Picture Tour of Maspeth
1330190
Lake_Superior_State_University
 designated_other1_color  CornflowerBlue}}Lake Superior State University (colloquially referred to as Lake State, Lake Superior State and LSSU) is a small university in Ste. Marie, Michigan.  It is Michigans smallest public university with an enrollment around 3,000 students.  Due to its proximity to the border, notably the twin city of Ste. Marie, Ontario, LSSU has many Canadian students and maintains a close relationship with its international neighbor.  In a sign of its unique situation, LSSU has both the Canadian and United States flags on its campus, and both Canadian and American national anthems are sung at athletic events. LSSU is known for its academic programs such as fisheries and wildlife management, engineering, chemistry and the environmental sciences, teacher education, nursing, geology, business management, fire science and criminal justice.  It offers Michigans only accredited undergraduate degree program in environmental health.  In addition, students attend for LSSUs degrees in forensic sciences, recreation management, and legal studies.  Lake Superior State University offers primarily bachelors and associates degrees, but also grants a master of arts in curriculum and instruction and many certificates.  The university also offers joint programs with College and University in Ste. Marie, Ontario.  LSSU also has regional centers located in northern Michigan in the cities of Gaylord, Escanaba, and Petoskey. Recently a center opened in southeast Michigan in the city of Dearborn.  It is one of three Michigan public universities that function as both a university and a college(http://www.michigancc.net/cci/cclinks/). History File:2009-0618-LSSU-Admin.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The Administration Building was originally the Quartermasters building in Fort Brady.The area that currently makes up the campus of Lake Superior State University served as Brady from 1894 to 1944; it is listed as New Fort Brady on the National Register of Historic Places, as the earlier incarnation the fort was downhill. Lake Superior State University was established in 1946 to address the needs of returning World War II veterans and to provide educational opportunities to the people of the Eastern Upper Peninsula. The  campus includes several buildings which are listed in the Register of Historic Places.Much of the universitys upbringings can be credited to Michigan College of Mining & Technology, which is now known as Technological University. The mining and technology college opened the Sault Ste. Marie Residence Center of the Michigan College of Mining & Technology, which was commonly shortened to Soo Tech.  The original class consisted of 272 students.  The institution was later renamed Lake Superior State College of Michigan Technological University in 1966.  The college received autonomy from Michigan Tech. in 1970 and was known as Lake Superior State College until 1987, when the institution was granted university status.(Lake Superior State University :: Admissions :: LSSU History)Lake Superior State University was the first college in the United States to offer an accredited four-year science program, and continues to be one of only three universities to offer such a program.The institution is also one of only three universities in the United States to offer the robotics specialization in the ABET/TAC accredited manufacturing engineering technology, electrical engineering, computer engineering, and mechanical engineering bachelor of science degrees.  LSSU is home to one of the best robotics educational facilities in North America. The robotics laboratory is valued at over $3 million.The universitys radio station is WLSO, and its newspaper is The Compass. Major Buildings Administration Building The Administration Building houses the offices of the President and Provost, as well as human resources and purchasing.CASETThis is the main engineering building on campus, but also provides rooms for many basic general education classes, such as communication and English. CASET also houses the LSSU Robotics Lab and the Prototype Development Center.Cisler CenterThis building is the main food service and student life building on campus. Dining options include the Quarterdeck and Galley, which features the Grill 155 and a convenience store.  It also hosts the Peacock Cove Coffee House, the Student Government offices, the schools newspaper (The Compass), and the University radio station (WLSO).Crawford HallThis building focuses on the many science degrees offered at the university, from nursing to biology and chemistry to fisheries and wildlife.  In 2000, a $23 million dollar renovation and expansion was completed, providing modern laboratory, classroom, and faculty and student research space.  Crawford Hall also houses the LSSU Environmental Analysis Lab.Fine Arts Center The arts center is a $15 million dollar facility which opened in 2005.  The arts center houses a 674 seat auditorium, art studios, classrooms and faculty offices.Fletcher Center The Fletcher Center houses the offices of Business Operations, Financial Aid, the Registrar, and Scheduling.  Norris CenterThis is the main building for recreation, criminal justice, and fire science majors.  It is also the main building for the Athletic Department and includes the main office for the Athletic Director.  Inside the building lies the Cooper Gym, home of the Laker basketball and volleyball teams; Taffy Abel Arena, home of the Laker hockey team; and the Student Activity Center (SAC). The University recently announced a 5 million dollar privately funded addition and renovation to several athletic Norris Center facilities. Shouldice LibraryThis is the Universitys library.  It is also a major office building for professors and has two major lecture halls.  The basement primarily contains the offices that provide academic services.  The library also contains the Cappuccino Corner, a popular deli and coffee shop.South HallThis building was once the major building for business and economics.  A building dating back to Fort Brady, the University determined that the upkeep costs were too great and the school moved to demolish it in favor of a new building.  Local groups enacted swift action to save it, including placing it on the Historic Registry, making it illegal to demolish.Notable FacilitiesAquatic Research LaboratoryThe LSSU ARL is an off campus research and educational facility located in the east end of the Cloverland Electric Coop hydroelectric plant. The ARL houses the Universitys fish hatchery, and conducts research on fisheries and aquatic ecology in the region.Environmental Analysis Lab The EAL is housed in the chemistry department at LSSU, and provides analytical services to LSSU researchers, government agencies, businesses, and private citizens.  The EAL routinely conducts standard environmental testing, as well as trace level analysis of environmental contaminants such as pesticides, persistent organic pollutants, metals, and cyanotoxins. Revenues from the EAL assist the Chemistry Department in purchasing and maintaining state of the art analytical instrumentation, and provide students with employment opportunities and experience working in a professional lab.Prototype Development Center The PDC provides a mechanism by which small businesses and entrepreneurs can access the expertise of the LSSU engineering faculty and students to produce low cost, functional prototypes.  The PDC provides a range of services including rapid prototyping, component design and testing, machining, process optimization, statistical analysis, and documentation services. Robotics Lab The LSSU Robotics Lab is a multi-million dollar facility dedicated to student instruction in robotics and automation technology.TraditionsLake Superior State University has a variety of traditions.* Banished Words List: Each new year brings another installment of the schools List of Words and Phrases Banished from the Queens English for Mis-Use, Over-Use and General Uselessness.  It has been published since New Years Day 1976 and receives significant media coverage.  Word-watchers pull nominations throughout the year from everyday speech, as well as from the news, fields of education, technology, advertising, politics, and more.  A committee gathers the entries and chooses the best in December. The list is released on New Years Day. (Lake Superior State University :: Banished Words List :: Welcome).* Hoholik Victory Bell: The bell, located outside the Norris Center and Abel Arena, is rung after each home victory.  Fans gather around the bell as members of the hockey team make their way outside in the cold temperatures to ring the bell. This tradition was started after the bell was hung in the early 1980s. The original bell was replaced in 1992 after extensive damage from the 1992 NCAA Championship celebration. (Traditions - Lake Superior State University Lakers)* Ships Horn: An authentic ships horn is located within the Taffy Abel Arena, where the Lakers play home hockey games.  The horn is mounted high on the wall behind the goal a visiting team defends for two periods.  The powerful horn, operated on compressed air, blasts after each Laker goal and at the end of each home game. (* Snowman Burning: Each March, on or near the first day of Spring, students, alumni and townsfolk gather around a 10 to  snowman on campus and light it on fire. The snowman burning is derived from a German tradition in which the mayor of the town burns a snowman to declare an end to winter. The snowmen are usually made out of recycled paper and wire. In 1992, the event was canceled due to protests from the Environmental Awareness Club, a student group at Lake Superior State University. This decision upset many in the community, and the tradition was resumed in 1993. (Lake Superior State University :: Snowman Burning)* Snowmobile Race: The city of Sault Ste. Marie puts on the annual I-500 snowmobile race held at a one-mile (1.6 km) oval behind the Norris Center on the campus of Lake State. The event draws a big crowd and is held the first Saturday of February. (http://i-500.com/index.php)* The Unicorn Hunters established the banished words list and snowman burning. They also put on stone-skipping tournaments and started a literary magazine. As their name suggests, they also searched for unicorns. Once an News crew found their way to the campus and filmed students questing for unicorns. (Lake Superior State University :: Banished Words List :: About)AthleticsThe schools official nickname is the Lakers, but in some instances the universitys athletic teams are called the Soo Lakers in reference to the schools hometown. Prior to becoming known as the Lakers, this institutions sports teams were known as the Hornets. The most prominent sport at LSSU is mens ice hockey, which is the schools only NCAA Division I program. The mens ice hockey team is a member of the Collegiate Hockey Association. Other sports at LSSU play at a Division II level in the Lakes Intercollegiate Athletic Conference, of which LSSU is a charter member.(GLIAC History - Great Lakes Intercollegiate Athletic Conference - GLIAC.org) Ice hockeyThe Lakers were once one of the nations top mens collegiate ice hockey programs. They have appeared in the NCAA Division I ice hockey tournament 10 times and have won three national championships (1988, 1992 and 1994) at that level. LSSU also won two mens NAIA national championships in 1972 and 1974 while playing in that association. The Lakers have taken the CCHA regular season title four times (1974, 1988, 1991 and 1996) and have also won the CCHA conference tournament four times (1991, 1992, 1993 and 1995). Many of these teams players have gone on to play professionally in the NHL and other professional leagues. LSSU also has a Division III club hockey team, which plays in the Collegiate Hockey Association.Ice Hockey National ChampionshipsLSSU has also been national runners-up four times on the national stage in ice hockey. LSSU finished second in the 1968, 1969 and 1970 NAIA national championships and lost 5-4 to Maine in the 1993 NCAA ice hockey national championship.(Mens basketballThe LSSU mens basketball team captured the 1976, 1978 and 1996 GLIAC regular season titles. In 1996 they also won the GLIAC tournament championship.  In 2009, the mens team captured the GLIAC North Division Championship along with a NCAA playoff berth.Womens BasketballLSSUs womens basketball team found success in the early part of the decade. They were the 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005 GLIAC North Division regular season champions. The LSSU womens basketball team also took home the GLIAC conference tournament championship in 2003 and 2004.(http://www.gliac.org/archive/2005/womens/basketball/honors/wbasketball_record_book.pdf)RunningLSSU is home to a cross country and track & field program.Football HistoryLSSU briefly fielded a football team from 1948 to 1950 when the university was known as Soo Tech. (Soo Tech had a short, but colorful football past :: Hornets inaugural season was its best)Notable alumniSports*Rolston 1991-1993 Jersey Devils (NHL)*Weight 1989-1991 York Islanders (NHL)*Paul Boyer (equipment manager) 1988-1993 Red Wings (NHL)*Comley Former head hockey coach State University*Battaglia 1994-1997 Maple Leafs/Marlies (NHL/AHL)*Menk  1992-1996, professional basketball player in Denmark (Danish Elite Division) and the Philippines (PBL, PBA)*Grahame, 1994-1997Business*Denker Denker is senior vice president of Penske Corporation. References John Flesch 1972-72 Minnesota North Stars 1974-77 External links * Lake Superior State University* Lakers Athletics* Banished Word List* Lakerpedia* LSSU FishCamSuperior State University
1333268
Gold_Hill
Gold Hill may refer to:;United States* Hill, Alabama* Hill, California**Hill, El Dorado County, California, unincorporated community**Hill, Nevada County, California, former settlement**Hill, Placer County, California, unincorporated community* Hill (Nevada County, California), hill* Hill, Colorado* Gold Hill in Fergus County, Montana* Gold Hill in Lincoln County, Montana* Gold Hill in Silver Bow County, Montana* Gold Hill in Sweet Grass County, Montana* Hill, Nevada, abandoned mining complex* Hill, Utah, former mining complex* Hill, Oregon;United Kingdom* Hill, Shaftesbury, Dorset, a famous streetSee also* Hill Township (disambiguation)HillHillHillHillHillHillHillHill
1336364
Matthews_Ridge
Matthews Ridge is a small town within the Barima-Waini administrative region of Guyana. It is located at .HistoryDuring the 1960s, Matthews Ridge was being considered as a potential area in which to relocate the capital city of Guyana. During that same era, it was the location of a large manganese mining operation, which has since closed down.GeographyMatthews Ridge lies in the North-West district of Guyana. It is located in Region 1 of Guyana, also known as the Barima-Waini region.ClimateThe area experiences a steady shift between dry season in August/September and March, and rainy season in May/June and December/January. Average temperature ranges between 95-100F during the day, to 80-85F at night.DemographicsThe population of Matthews Ridge is approximately 500, and is composed mainly of blacks and Amerindians. Some of these Amerindians speak the Carib language. Individuals of that language group in Matthews Ridge number approximately 50 persons. With the closing of the manganese mining operation in the 1970s, the town went into an economic downturn, which it is still struggling to recover from. There are few job opportunities aside from small scale mining. Nearby mining camps include Eyelash, Big Creek, Five Star, Perseverance, Butterfly, 6-Mile, 14-Mile, Botway, and Black Banana.EducationThe local nursery and primary schools can accommodate students through Grade 9. Children who display skill and determination may be sent to the secondary school in Kaituma if affordable for further educational opportunities.InfrastructureThe infrastructure of the town is elementary. A phone and internet connection is available by means of a small shop offering this by means of satellite. Digicel service is available. Electric current is not provided by the government in Matthews Ridge, but a number of the residents own generators which provide them with electricity.  Goods are brought into Matthews Ridge via planes from Georgetown, and trucks from Port Kaituma.Ridge
1340625
Jay_K._Katzen
 website  Jay Kenneth Katzen (born August 23, 1936 in New York) is a retired diplomat, business consultant, state legislator, and government agency administrator, and the current President of the of Communism Memorial Foundation. He is a graduate of University (1958) and University (1959) and served presidents D. Eisenhower through H.W. Bush. His positions have included House translator and U.S. representative to the Nations. He became active in Virginia politics when elected in 1993 to represent the 31st legislative district of the House of Delegates.(Foreign service journal American Foreign Service Association - 1996, Volume 73 - Page 30) He received his B.A. (magna cum laude) in Political Science from Princeton University in 1958 and his M.A. in International Relations from Yale University the following year.  He attended the National War College in 1977, was a visiting Professor at the College Graduate School of Management 1978-79, and was a member of advisory boards at the Duke University Primate Center in 1986 and the University of Kentuckys School of Diplomacy and International Commerce in 1989.U.S. GovernmentFrom February 2004 to January 2009, Jay Katzen served as the U.S. Corps Regional Director overseeing 19 programs in Europe, the Mediterranean area, and Asia. From August 2005 to May 2006, Katzen served concurrently as Acting Chief of Staff/Chief of Operations of the Peace Corps.  From 1959 to 1979, Katzen served as a career Foreign Service Officer with the U.S. Department of State. His posts included Australia, Burundi, Congo (Kinshasa), communist Romania, Mali, the U.S. Mission to the United Nations in New York, and Congo (Brazzaville). He also was assigned to Washington D.C.  at the State Department and the White House.  His responsibilities included consular affairs, promoting American business, political and economic reporting, labor affairs, multilateral negotiation and management. He served as Charge dAffaires at two posts, in one instance, opening an embassy and assuring its sustainability.  Katzen was trained at the U.S. State Departments Foreign Service Institute to speak five languages: French, Romanian, Swahili, Lingala and Kirundi.				In 1990, Katzen was appointed by President Reagan and confirmed by the U.S. Senate as Vice Chairman of the Board of the African Development Foundation, and served in that capacity for two years.Legislative ExperienceKatzen was elected in 1993 to represent the 31st legislative district of Fauquier, Rappahannock, and Warren counties in Virginias House of Delegates. He was chosen freshman class president, a party whip, and co-patroned over 2,500 bills, including landmark legislation improving the quality of Virginias education, and reforming welfare and law enforcement.  He served on the Finance, Education, and Agriculture Committees, and on the Governors Blue Ribbon Commission on Champion Schools.  He was re-elected three times.()Katzen was the Republican Partys nominee for Governor in 2001 and for Congress in Virginias Ninth District in 2002.Private SectorIn 2003, Katzen was chosen in a national search to become CEO and President of the of Communism Memorial Foundation, charged by Congress and the White Housewith bipartisan supportto erect a memorial in Washington to the 100 million victims of communism. The monument was unveiled and dedicated by the Foundations Honorary Chairman, President George W. Bush, in June 2007.()From 1979 to 1991, Katzen served as a senior advisor reporting directly to the chairmen and senior executives of corporations including Bechtel, Consolidated Gold Fields, Fluor, Kennecott, Newmont Mining, and Phelps Dodge, helping to steer those companies to successful investment opportunities abroad.RecognitionKatzen has been recognized by the Federation of Independent Business, the Veterans of America, Virginias Council of Indians, 4-H, the Society for Human Life, the National Vietnam and Gulf War Veterans Coalition, and Virginias Armenian community.  He served as chairman of the Rappahannock River Basin Commission, and as a board member of the Jamestown-Yorktown Foundation.  Katzen was named the Family Foundations Legislator of the Year, and is a recipient of a Martin Luther King Jr. award.  He is past president of his local Club International and was a member of International.References
1344523
Anglo_American_PLC
 intl             Anglo American plc (, ) is a global mining company headquartered in London, Kingdom. It is a major producer of diamonds, copper, nickel, iron ore and metallurgical and thermal coal and the worlds largest producer of platinum, with around 40% of world output.(Annual Report 2009)( It has operations in Africa, Asia, Australasia, Europe, North America and South America.()Anglo American has its primary listing on the Stock Exchange and is a constituent of the 100 Index. It has a secondary listing on the Johannesburg Stock Exchange.(HistoryMilestonesSir Oppenheimer along with American, Morgan, founded the Anglo American Corporation, a gold mining company, in 1917 with 1 million, raised from UK and U.S. sources, and ultimately derived the name of the company.(Forbes.com New Mining Target: Anglo American C.Noon.21 August 2006; Retrieved 27 May 2008.)The AAC became the majority stakeholder in the Beers company in 1926. Two years later, the AAC began mining in the Zambian copper belt.1940s to 1960sIn 1945, the AAC moved into the coal industry by acquiring Coal Estates.  Twelve years later, in 1957, Sir Ernest died in Johannesburg and was succeeded by his son, Oppenheimer, who also became chairman of De Beers.  In the late 1940s and 1950s, the AAC focused on the development of the Free State goldfields (seven major mines simultaneously) and the Vaal Reefs mine. The success of the mines enabled the company to become the worlds largest gold-mining group.(Answers.com Anglo American)1960s to 1980sIn 1961, the AAC expanded outside of southern Africa for the first time and became a major investor in the Hudson Bay Mining and Smelting Company in Canada. In 1967, the company moved into the steel industry by acquiring Scaw Metals.  From 1967 to 1975, it continued to grow and established a number of ventures, including the Group (timber, pulp and paper), Amgold (later Ashanti) and then Amcoal (through the consolidation of several of its mining operations in South Africa and later known as Anglo Coal). In 1982, Harry Oppenheimer retired as chairman of the AAC and was succeeded by Relly. Two years later, Oppenheimer retired from De Beers and passed the chairmanship to Ogilvie Thompson, who in 1990 also became chairman and chief executive of the AAC.1990s to 2000sAnglo American Corporation merged with Minorco on 24 May 1999 to form Anglo American plc with its primary listing on the London Stock Exchange and a secondary listing on the Johannesburg Stock Exchange.(History Angola American PLC) Its gold mining operations were spun off into the separate AngloGold corporation, which in 2004 merged with the Goldfields Corporation to form Ashanti. Anglo American reduced its stake in AngloGold Ashanti to 16.6 percent in 2008(Anglo American website AGM 2008 Chief Executive Speech 15 April 2008) and exited the company completely in 2009.In 2000, Julian Ogilvie Thompson retired as chief executive of Anglo American and was succeeded by Trahar. Ogilvie Thompson also retired as chairman in 2002 and was replaced by Sir Mark Moody-Stuart. In the same year, Anglo American acquired Tarmac, a supplier of building materials,(thisismoney.co.uk Tarmac takeover cleared 1 March 2001. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) and Shell Petroleum Companys Australian coal assets(Asia Times Online Shell to shed coal to Anglo American 2 June 2000. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) In 2001, De Beers was privatized after being a listed company for more than 70 years.(New York Times.$17.6 Billion Deal to Make De Beers Private Company 16 February 2001. Retrieved 27 May 2009.)In 2002, South Africas Mining Charter was approved(South Africa.info Key empowerment charters 29 October 2004. Retrieved 27 May 2009) and Anglo American and other mining companies with operations in the country were mandated to transfer a percentage of their South African production to historically disadvantaged South Africans.(BBC News South African mines charter welcomed 10 October 2002. Retrieved 27 May 2009) Anglo American has since carried out black economic empowerment transactions across all businesses with operations in South Africa totaling R26 billion worth of transactions.(Mining Weekly Employment equity next big transformation challenge for Anglo American South Africa  Baum 8 July 2008. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) Also, in 2002, Anglo Base Metals acquired the Disputada copper operations in Chile from Mobil Corporation(Dallas Business Journal Exxon Mobil completes Chile copper business sale 13 November 2002. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) and opened a representative office in Beijing, China.(Beijing Review.com.cn Getting Down to Business 26 April 2007. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) In 2003, Anglo American acquired a major stake in iron ore producer Resources.(Business Report(South Africa)Anglos stake in Kumba is now 66.6% 9 December 2003. Retrieved 27 May 2009.)In 2007, Carroll succeeded Tony Trahar, becoming the first non-South African and first female chief executive of Anglo American.(Telegraph.co.uk Anglo appoints first female head 24 October 2006. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) The Group, a paper and packaging business, was also spun out in 2007.(Mondi demerger approved by Anglo American shareholders Packaging News, 26 June 2007) During the next two years, Anglo American opened a representative office in New Delhi, India,(Anglo American Plc keen on Indian tie-ups in mining China Mining. 7 November 2008. Retrieved 27 May 2009.) acquired control of the Michiquillay copper project in northern Peru and the MMX Minas-Rio and Amapa iron ore projects in Brazil(Anglo Americans $5.5 Billion Spending Spree Forbes.com 17 January 2008.Retrieved 27 May 2009.) and later acquired stakes in the Pebble copper project in Alaska(Queen Bee Forbes.com 22 May 2008.Retrieved 27 May 2009.) and Foxleigh coal mine in Australia.OperationsThe company focuses on natural resources with five core business units: base metals, coal, diamonds, iron ore (or ferrous metals and industries) and platinum. Its operating footprint includes Africa, Asia, Australia, Europe, North America and South America.(Reuters (2009) Anglo American PLC Accessed 1 June 2009)Wholly owned subsidiaries include Anglo Base Metals, Anglo Ferrous Metals and Industries, Anglo Coal and Anglo Industrial Minerals (Tarmac).(Anglo American corporate website (2009)Anglo American Fact Book 2008/09 Accessed 1 June 2009) Partially owned subsidiaries include Copebras (Brazil), Platinum Ltd (South Africa)(79.6%)and 63.4% of Kumba Iron Ore.( The paper and packaging business Group was spun out in 2007. It also holds 45% of the diamond mining company Beers.(Anglo American (2007)History, Corporate website 21 July 2007)In 2008, the company had 105,000 permanent employees and 39,000 contract employees in its managed operations located in 45 countries.(Anglo American Report to Society 2008 (2009)Anglo American Report to Society 2008 Accessed 1 June 2009)Anglo Americans biggest project is the Minas-Rio iron ore project in Brazil; it has faced delays and high costs, but in December 2010 Anglo American gained a key license from the government that would allow work to start.()() Production is initially expected to be 26.5Mt/y; iron ore would be sent through a 525 km pipeline to a port at Au()ExplorationIn 2008, Anglo American (excluding De Beers) spent $212 million on exploring 21 countries for resources including copper, nickel, niobium phosphates and zinc.(Anglo American Annual Report and Accounts 2008 (2009) Exploration Accessed 1 June 2009) The two main types of exploration for the company are Greenfield and Brownfield with nearly 70% devoted to Greenfield projects.(Anglo American corporate website (2009) What we do/exploration Accessed 1 June 2009)Research and developmentAnglo American, along with De Beers, backed the manufacturing of a Superconducting Quantum Interference Device (SQUID) to help improve the sensitivity of exploration surveys.(African Review of Business and Technology (2007)High definition exploration brings better prospects Accessed 1 June 2009)Anglo American established Boart Products South Africa Limited in 1936 (later named Boart International) to turn the companys stockpile of boart, or low-grade natural diamonds, into drilling products.(Advent International(2005)Advent to acquire Boart Longyear from Anglo American Accessed 1 June 2009) This initiative resulted in the development of the first mechanically set diamond drill bit and later led to additional research into cutting and abrasive tools.(Funding Universe Boart Longyear Company Accessed 1 June 2009)Recently Anglo American has embarked on the partial redesign of two South African underground coal mining operations and the introduction of mining technologies not seen before in South Africa or Australia. Even though these technologies are in use in the USA and UK, the mine design around the technology will likely set the pace for coal mining into the next 20 years and give Anglo American a distinct advantage above competitors in the underground coal mining industry.Sustainable developmentAnglo American is a member of the Business Council for Sustainable Development. Additionally, Anglo American committed to support the Industries Transparency Initiative which strengthens governance by improving transparency and accountability in the extractives sector.A socio economic toolkit originally developed by Anglo American to manage the social aspects of its operational impacts, was released into the public domain for non-profits and other companies to use.(Front Seat Sustainability 17 July 2008. Retrieved 25 August 2009) The program was commended by the World Business Awards program of the United Nations Development Programme(World Business Award winners announced 2 May 2006.)With a significant number of operations and employees in South Africa, Anglo American faces the HIV/AIDS challenge on a large scale.(One Mans Drive... One Companys Courage 19 December 2007. Retrieved 25 August 2009.) In response, it runs a workplace program for HIV/AIDS testing and counseling.(Anglo Americans AIDS Initiative 2 December 2005. Retrieved 25 August 2009) In 2002, it started to provide antiretroviral drugs for employees with AIDS(Mining Company to Offer H.I.V. Drugs to Employees 7 August 2002. Retrieved 25 August 2009)Anglo American is a signatory participant of the Voluntary Principles on Security and Human Rights.CriticismIn 1977, the company demanded the paper it owned, Daily Mail, tone down its equal-rights support after exposing the murder of South African activist Biko amid the subsequent government backlash.In August 2007, the British charity, on Want, published a report accusing Anglo American of profiting from the abuse of people in the developing countries in which the company operates. According to the charity, in the Philippines and South Africa, local communities threatened with Anglo American mines have faced severe repression in their fight to stay on their land, while in Ghana and Mali, local communities see little of the huge profits being made by Ashanti but suffer from fear and intimidation and from the damaging impact of its mines on their environment, health and livelihoods.(Anglo American: The Alternative Report) Anglo American subsequently published a report(to Allegations Made in War on Wants Anglo American  The Alternative Report 9 September 2007. Retrieved 25 August 2009) responding to War on Want and separately disclosed its safety performance in its most recent annual earnings report,(Anglo American Annual Report 2007 Accessed 25 August 2009) along with immediate measures to address safety concerns(The 100 Most Powerful Women Forbes.com 30 August 2007. Retrieved 25 August 2009)Anglo American was also accused in 2007 of damaging environmental practices: in order to complete its planned Alaskan Mine in collaboration with Northern Dynasty Minerals, the global mining giant may build a massive dam at the headwaters of the worlds largest salmon fishery, which it would risk obliterating.() Opponents are also pointing to the use of cyanide, metals, and mine drainage which can all have potentially devastating effects on the pristine environment of the Bay area. Opponents of the Pebble Mine created Ballot Measure 4 to impose additional water quality standards on new large-scale mines in the state. However, in August 2007, Alaskans voted against the initiative.(Alaska voters defeat tougher mining rules MSNBC 28 August 2008. Retrieved 25 August 2009) The Pebble Limited Partnership has not yet put forward a project proposal and is working to prepare a Prefeasibility Study for the project in the second half of 2009.(Alaska voters validate States regulatory framework for mining 4 September 2008. Retrieved 25 August 2009) The mine proposal must still undergo environmental studies and the permitting process, including being subject to state and federal water protections(Alaska Chooses Largest Gold Mine Over Clean Water 29 August 2008. Retrieved 25 August 2009)Nunamta Aulukestai (Caretakers of Our Land) and the Renewable Resources Coalition commissioned a report regarding Anglo American and their current and past subsidiaries. The report is written by Philip Mattera, a corporate reporter. The report, released in July 2008, criticizes Anglo American for community, worker safety, public health, and environmental problems at their mining operations in South Africa, Zimbabwe, Ghana, Mali, Ireland, and the United States (Nevada) and notes the difference between Anglos stated corporate goals and their actual corporate performance.(Anglo Americans Track Record: Rhetoric or Reality?)See also*of mining companies*Earthwatch*Policy Institute*Industries Transparency Initiative*Council on Mining and Metals*Nations Global CompactReferencesExternal links*Official website*D.R. Congo: Gold Fuels Massive Human Rights Atrocities, Leading international corporations established links to warlords, Rights Watch, 2 June 2005*Mining, De Beers, Anglo American Documentary On Google*Anglo American stock prices on the London Stock Exchangelist1AmericanAmericanAmericanAmericanAmericanja:AmericanAmericanAmericanAmerican
1348441
John_S._Lewis
John S. Lewis is a professor of science at the of Arizonas Lunar and Planetary Laboratory. His interests in the chemistry and formation of the system and the economic development of space have made him a leading proponent of turning potentially hazardous objects into attractive space resources.  Prior to joining the University of Arizona, Lewis taught sciences and cosmochemistry at the Institute of Technology.  He received his education at University, College and the of California, San Diego, where he studied under Urey.An expert on the composition and chemistry of asteroids and comets, Lewis has written such popular science books as Rain of Iron and Ice and Mining the Sky. Lewis is also highly respected member of The Council of The Frontier Foundation. He is a member of Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints.See also*Savage - author of Millennial Project: Colonizing the Galaxy in Eight Easy Steps*ONeill - author of High Frontier: Human Colonies in Space*Benson - founder of the SpaceDev company*The Case for Mars: The Plan to Settle the Red Planet and Why We Must by Zubrin*of Creation by Eric Drexler*Asteroid 3554 AmunBibliography*and Asteroid Impact Hazards on a Populated Earth: Computer Modeling by John S. Lewis; Academic Press; (October 7, 1999); ISBN 0-124-46760-1*the Sky: Untold Riches from the Asteroids, Comets, and Planets by John S. Lewis; Perseus Publishing; (September 1997); ISBN 0-201-32819-4*Rain Of Iron And Ice: The Very Real Threat Of Comet And Asteroid Bombardment by John S. Lewis; Helix Books: (April 24, 1997); ISBN 0-201-15494-3ReferencesExternal links*John Lewiss web page at the University of Arizona.S. Lewis
1353627
Hessdalen
longEW EHessdalen is a village and a  long valley in the municipality of Holtlen in Sr-Trndelag county, Norway.  It is located approximately  south of the city of Trondheim, approximately  north of Rros mining town, and about  southwest of len/Renbygda.  About 150 people live in the valley.In the central part of the valley is a village area also called Hessdalen.  It is where Church is located.  The lake yungen lies about  southwest of the village.The Hessdalen area is known for the occasional occurrences of a sometimes ominous luminous phenomena called the lights.  The phenomenon is monitored by the AMS.NameThe first element is the river name Hesja and the last element is the definite form of dal, which means dale or valley.Referencesde:Hessdalenfr:Hessdalenno:Hessdalennn:Hessdalenfi:Hessdalensv:Hessdalen
1357216
Edward_Bernard_Raczyski
 footnotes  Edward Bernard Raczyski (December 19, 1891  July 30, 1993) was a Polish aristocrat, diplomat, writer, politician and of Poland in exile (between 1979 and 1986).He was both longest living (102), and oldest Polish President (took office at 88, left at 95). Biography 200px|thumb|left|Relief of the Raczyski family comital coat of armsImage:Herb Nalecz.jpg|200px|thumb|left|Coat of ArmsImage:Sikorski Kukiel WSC Raczyns 1940s.jpg|thumb|left|200px|From the left: Sikorski with General Kukiel, Clementine, Churchill and the Polish ambassador Count Edward Raczynski, 1940.Count Edward Bernard Maria Raczyski was born December 19, 1891 in Zakopane, to a Polish aristocratic family. His father was Count Aleksander Raczyski of Coat of Arms, and his mother Ra ne Countess Potocka. The Raczyskis were related to the Austro-Hungarian house of Habsburgs. The full name was Raczyski z Mayszyna, as they were a branch of the noble family Nacz-Mayski from Greater Poland (the area of the town of Wielu) and about 1540 took their name from the estate of Raczyn near Wielu. However, the Raczyskis remained relatively unknown until the 18th century, when four of them became Senators of Poland under different reigns. One of the Raczyskis became a Knight of the Order of the White Eagle during the reign of king the Strong, six of them were awarded the Militari order during the time of of Warsaw and three received the same distinction during the Uprising of 1831. The title of Count was awarded to different branches of the family by Prussian Kings Friedrich Wilhelm III (in 1824) and Wilhelm II (in 1905). One of their kin was a Knight of the highest Prussian of the Black Eagle.Raczyski spent most of his childhood in Krakw, in the family palace Baranami and in the family palace in Rogalin in Poland. He studied law in Lipsk, Krakw, and London (the London School of Economics) and was awarded with a doctorate of the University in Krakw in 1915. In November 1918, Raczynski joined the army of the resuscitated Poland, from which he was called to the diplomatic service in May 1919. Until 1925, he was worked in Polish embassies and missions in Bern, Copenhagen and London. Back in Warsaw, he became the head of the department of international agreements. The same year Raczyski married Joyous ne Markham, daughter of a British coal mining mogul. His wife died soon afterwards and on August 25, 1932 he married his second wife, Cecylia Maria ne Jaroszyska, by whom he had three daughters. Earlier the same year Raczyski was appointed Polish ambassador to the of Nations and in 1934 he became the ambassador of the Republic of Poland in the United Kingdom. On behalf of Poland, he signed the Polish-British alliance(http://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Agreement_of_Mutual_Assistance_between_the_United_Kingdom_and_Poland-London_%281939%29) (August 25, 1939) which ultimately led the United Kingdom to declare war on Nazi Germany after its aggression on Poland.Following the Polish Defensive War Raczyski remained in London where he continued to serve as the ambassador of the Government in Exile and one of its prominent members. Between July 22, 1941 and July 14, 1943 he was also the Polish Minister of Foreign Affairs in the cabinet of Sikorski. In this capacity, he provided the Allies with one of the earliest and most accurate accounts of the ongoing Holocaust (The mass extermination of Jews in German occupied Poland, Raczynskis Note addressed to the Governments of the United Nations on December 10, 1942)(The mass extermination of Jews in German occupied Poland, Note addressed to the Governments of the United Nations on December 10, 1942 published later (30 decembre 1942) by the Polish Foreign Ministry as a brochure distributed to politicians and the medias : http://www.projectinposterum.org/docs/mass_extermination.htm) and pleaded for action(Martin Gilbert, Auschwitz and the Allies, 1981 (Pimlico edition, p. 96) Further pressure for action came from the Polish Ambassador, Count Raczynski, who, at a meeting with Anthony Eden on the morning of december 1 (1942) drew attention, as the Foreign Office noted, to the wholesale destruction of Jews in Poland (..) Raczynski had two suggestions : a warning to Laval concerning the deportations from France, and a meeting of representatives of the occupied countries to discuss and publicize the persecution. But the Foreign Office rejected the idea of such a meeting)(Walter Laqueur, The terrible secret, 1980 (Penguin edition, p. 236). On January 18, 1943 Count Raczynski, the Polish Foreign Minister, presented the following demands at the Allied Council : a) The bombing of Germany as a reprisal for the continued extermination of the Polish Jews. b) To press Berlin to let the Jews out of the German-dominated countries, particularly Poland. c) To demand action so as to make the Allied as well as the neutral countries accept the Jews, who had succeeded or would succeed in leaving German-occupied countries.Raczynski did not advance demands for reprisals against German war prisoners and German nationals living in the Allied countries, considering them contrary to the accepted practices of international law. Anthony Eden, acting on behalf of the British Government, rejected the Polish demands and offered instead some vague promises to intervene in certain neutral countries).  After 1945, when the government of the United Kingdom broke the pacts with Poland and withdrew support for the Polish government, Raczyski remained in London, where he acted as one of the most notable members of Polish diaspora there. He was active in various political and social organisations in exile, including the Pomocy Krajowi (Help for the Country Fund) which actively supported the democratic opposition in communist-controlled Poland. Between 1954 and 1972 he was one of the members of the Council of the Three, the collective presidential body of the Polish government in exile. He was also a member of the Committee for Polish Affairs and an advisor of various British governmental agencies and ministries.In 1962, his second wife Cecylia Maria ne Jaroszyska died. In March 1979, Raczyski became President in exile, after being previously chosen by the outgoing President Ostrowski. In turn, he chose as his successor Prime Minister Sabbat.During the Raczyski presidency (19791986) the Solidarity movement was established in Poland. Raczyski played an important role in raising awareness about the events in Poland in Western countries and in establishing closer ties with the opposition movement in Poland.President Raczyski at some point considered naming Bartoszewski as his successor, as he wanted to choose someone from the country and with strong ties to the Polish opposition movement. Bartoszewski, however, declined the offer(Komar, Wadysaw Bartoszewski, Skd pan jest? (a long interview). wiat Ksiki, Warszawa, 2006).After serving a 7-year term he resigned from his post on April 8, 1986. He was the last Polish President-in-Exile who had held an important office during the era of the 2nd Republic: his successors, Sabbat and Kaczorowski were in their twenties at the outset of the Second World War(Prezydenci Rzeczypospolitej Polskiej na Uchodzstwie, 19391990 (The Presidents of the Polish Republic in exile), Ochrony Pamici Walk i Mczestwa, Warszawa 2002). As he left office he received a praise for reuniting the Polish political emigration and reshaping the Government in exile(http://www.primus.com.pl/gim/pliki/udir_1/konkursstrony/Prezydenci-KamilCelinski/uchodzstwo.html).At the age of 97, Raczyski married, his third wife, Aniela Lilpop, thus legalizing a union of many years. Edward Raczyski died July 30, 1993, in London as the last male descendant of his line. His coffin was placed in the mausoleum of his family located at the chapel in Rogalin. In his last will and testament, Count Raczyski bequeathed his familys palace in Rogalin, and his library to the Polish nation. He was the longest living Head of State in Polands history and one of the very few centenarians among European politicians of the 20th century.(See also his obituary and short biography by the historian and writer Adam Zamoyski in an article for The Independent of 31 july 1993 : http://www.independent.co.uk/news/people/obituary-count-edward-raczynski-1488283.html)  Honours * of the White Eagle (Poland)* of Polonia Restituta (Poland)* Grand Cross of the of the British Empire (GBE)* Honoris Causa of the University Abroad, London,1982; Jagellonian University in 1992* citizen of the towns of Krakw and Pozna Bibliography Raczyskis Works* Edward Raczyski, The British-Polish Alliance, Its Origin and Meaning; London 1948* Edward Raczyski, W sojuszniczym Londynie. Dziennik ambasadora Edwarda Raczyskiego 19391945; London 1960. ISBN 0-85065-287-1* Edward Raczynski, In Allied London. The Wartime diaries of the Polish Ambassador, London, Weidenfeld and Nicolson, 1962.* Khayym, Rubayat. Polish translation by Edward Raczyski, London, 1960.* Edward Raczyski, Rogalin i jego mieszkacy. London, 1969. ISBN 83-919577-0-5* Edward Raczyski, Pani Ra (a Biography of his mother), London 1969. ISBN 83-901583-2-9* Edward Raczyski, Od Narcyza Kulikowskiego do Winstona Churchilla. London 1976* Edward Raczynski (with Tadeusz Zenczykowski), Od Genewy do Jalty. Rozmowy radiowe, London, Puls, 1988.* Edward Raczyski, Czas wielkich zmian. Paris 1990. ISBN 2-85316-064-5Family History*Simon Konarski, Armorial de la Noblesse Polonaise titre, Paris 1958See also* of Poland* Government in Exile* Raczyski disambiguation page* Raczyski (17861845) Polish conservative politician, protector of arts, founder of the Library in PoznaReferencesExternal links* Ex Libris of Edward Raczyski* Rogalin palace* rogalin.org  Informations for tourists and citizens.Raczyski (Politiker)Bernard RaczyskiRaczyskiBernard Raczyski 
1360940
Cranberry_Portage,_Manitoba
Cranberry Portage, located in the Rural Municipality of Kelsey, Manitoba, was an important part of the pre-European contact trade routes of the Cree  and Assiniboine peoples. Long before the fur trade with the Bay and during the Trade, this location was used as a campsite and portage between River, at the head of a number of well-used routes from Hudson Bay, and Athapapuskow, which connected to the Saskatchewan River system. Once on the Saskatchewan routes were open through the prairies to the foothills of the Rocky Mountains.In the early 20th century, rich gold, copper, and zinc deposits were discovered nearby in what would soon become the area of Flon, Manitoba. Mining development in the area fueled a great deal of local infrastructure development, beginning with the extension of the rail line and Highway 10 from Pas, Manitoba to Flin Flon, both of which passed through Cranberry Portage, a requirement of having large lakes lying North and South of the traditional portage.Following the conclusion of War II, the Department of National Defence took a decided interest in the location of Cranberry Portage.With the recent memory of the German V-2 Rocket program, the development of the Russian Nuclear Missile Program, and the subsequent development of the Line (Distant Early Warning System) in the high Arctic in the late 1950s/early 1960s, the Department of National Defence felt it prudent to also construct secondary back-up radar stations further south. Cranberry Portage, with its road and rail access being conveniently located 60 kilometers from a perceived Russian military target like Flin Flon Area mines and smelters, was an ideal location to establish such a back-up system in the interests of national defence, and became one of the locations for a Line Installation.In March 1964, the Government of Canada ceased its operations in Cranberry Portage. The entire complex that was Mid Canada Line Sector Control Station 700 was sold to the Government of Manitoba, who in turn sold the facility to the School Division. By the late 1960s, the former Mid Canada Line Installation became Collegiate Institute Campus, Collegiate Residence, and the Area Four Administrative Offices. Most of the base facilities are still in use today although many of their purposes have changed.Today, the former Mess Hall provides all dietary services to high school students who reside on campus. The Officers Club is utilized primarily as a meeting room and location for large group presentations, and though the bar is still present, it has not been used for its intended purpose since the change of ownership. The helicopter hangar is now the home to the Area Four school buses. Officers houses are now homes provided to teachers at subsidized rents, while the three barracks are used only for storage. The facility-wide mechanical systems are also still operational including an underground freshwater storage tank.Cranberry Portage is home to the annual Bombardier Rally, where snow machine enthusiasts gather with their Bombardier vehicles.Portage
1363836
Regions_of_Western_Australia
Regionalisations of Western Australia are systems by which Australia is divided into distinct geographic regions.  The most commonly known regionalisation is the governmental division of the state into regions for economic development purposes.Others regionalisations include those made for purposes of land management, such as agriculture or conservation; information gathering, such as statistical or meteorological. Although most regionalisations were defined for specific purposes and give specific boundaries, many regions will have similar names and extents across different regionalisations. As a result, the names and boundaries of regions can vary in popular usage. There are nine regions.The Regional Development Commissions Act regionalisationthumb|250px|Map of the regionsThe most widely known regionalisation of Western Australia is the one defined by the State Government for purposes of economic development administration. Together, these constitute the whole of mainland Western Australia, with the exception of the Perth metropolitan area which is not contained in a region.These regions were established by the Development Commissions Act 1993, which defined their extents and established Regional Development Commissions to promote their economic development. In defining the regions, an attempt was made to capture distinct socio-economic communities. For example, the Goldfields-Esperance region of Western Australia has an economy based heavily on mining, whereas the Wheatbelt region is economically dependent on agriculture.The regions as determined are:* Gascoyne* Goldfields-Esperance* Great Southern* Kimberley* Mid West* Peel* Pilbara* South West* WheatbeltFor the earlier land administrative divisions of Western Australia - see: - Lands_administrative_divisions_of_Western_Australia#Land_divisionsWeather bureau areasThe same terms used by the RDCA are also used by BOM ( http://www.bom.gov.au/weather/wa/wa-forecast-map.shtml  ) - but do not directly  coincide with the boundaries of the Regional Development defined boundaries above.The BOM designates the forecast areas with finer detail on weather reports into points of the compass - as with the Interior area - southern interior, and western interior.Numbers 7 to 13 are usually known as those forecast areas in the Southwest Land Division, and coastal zones for sea forecasts are dealt with in regions of Western AustraliaPolitical regionalisationsUnder Australias three-tiered system of government, Western Australia is divided into:Federal electoral divisions *(for election to the House of Representatives)State   *electoral districts (for election to the Australian Legislative Assembly)*electoral regions (for election to the Australian Legislative Council)Local*local government areas.Departmental regionalisationsMany government departments maintain systems of regional and district breakdowns of the state for their own internal purposes - a good example would be the Educations Departments school districts:Agriculture Department Western Australia: - see the regional focus page ( http://www.agric.wa.gov.au/PC_93310.html?s2048819175 ):: Northern Agricultural Region:: Rangelands Region:: Southern Agricultural Region:: Central Agricultural Region:: South West Agricultural:Roads Western Australia regionalisations: - see the Road alert page ( http://standards.mainroads.wa.gov.au/NR/mrwa/internet/realtime/TRC/ ):of Water Western Australia - the region page ( http://www.water.wa.gov.au/Water+regions/default.aspx )::Kimberley::Pilbara::Mid West Gascoyne::Goldfields::Swan-Avon::Kwinana Peel::South West::South CoastNatural regionalisationsThere are a number of regionalisations that purport or attempt to provide a regionalisation based on natural features. The best known of these are the IBRA regions, the Wildlife Funds ecoregions, and the natural regions of Stanley Beard, all of which are based on biogeography. Other natural regionalisations included the drainage basins and catchments of river systems, and highly specialised regionalisations dealing with such matters as geology and soil systems.Land management regionalisationsRegionalisations of Western Australia used for land management and conservation purposes include the natural regionalisations such as IBRA, and also some less natural regionalisations such as Districts and the of Agricultures Land-use Zones.  However the Department of Agriculture publications - Technical Bulletins ( http://www.agric.wa.gov.au/PC_93285.html?s1392304539 ) - usually titled An inventory and condition report/survey... of a particular region are very specifically focused upon land systems that are based on natural features.Fisheries management regionalisationsThe Department of Fisheries tends to separate the state into four main regions for the purpose of regulating recreational fishing: - Pilbara Kimberley, Gascoyne, WestCoast and South Coast. See - regions of Western Australia for more detail.Land tenure regionalisationsMuch of Western Australia is divided into approximately 90 land districts for the purposes of identifying land lots.Mining:See article: fields in Western AustraliaUnder the Mining Act - the hierarchy of Administrative Divisions for mining has in the past been divided into -* Inspector of Mines - office and Inspectorate* Mining Registrars - Administrative boundary and office* State Mining Engineers Inspectorate* Gold Field District* Gold or Mineral Field boundarySince the creation of the Department of Industry and Resources some rationalisation of administration has occurred, however the mineral fields and boundaries remain the same as when established.( (1981) Map of Western Australia showing Administrative Divisions and Principal mines and operators )Wine regionsAustralias biggest State extends the western third of the continent, although the winemaking regions are almost entirely situated in the south-western tip of the State. It has nine regions, and five nominated subregions for wine under the indications legislation as determined by the Wine and Brandy Corporation.( T. Stevenson The Sothebys Wine Encyclopedia pg 589 Dorling Kindersley 2005 ISBN 0756613248 )(Australian Wine and Brandy corporation - Western Australia)(winepros.com.au, The Oxford Companion to Wine pg 765 Western Australia) These regions include:*Greater Perth** Hills** Peel** Swan District*South Western Australia** Valley** Geographe** Great Southern*** Albany*** Denmark*** Frankland River*** Mount Barker*** Porongurup** Manjimup** Margaret River** Pemberton()Coastal regions:Western Australia has the longest coastline of any state in Australia, at 10,194 km ( Short, Andrew D (2005)Beaches of the Western Australian Coast: Eucla to Roeback Bay ISBN 0-9586504-3-8. page 1 )  The regions can be determined by the underlying geology, and in the case of the Bureau of Meteorology - features such as points and capes are useful indicators of coastal water forecasts. (Western Australian Forecast Areas Map)CoastsLandgate - the latest name for the Land management body of the Western Australian government is currently marketing touring maps that create coastal zones - such as the:* Batavia Coast  (incorporating the area of Cervantes, Jurien Bay, Dongara, Geraldton, and Kalbarri)(StreetSmart Touring Map - Batavia Coast Western Australia ISBN 0-7309-2935-3 )* Gascoyne Coast (Carnarvon, Coral Bay, Denham, Exmouth and the Coral Coast)* Coral Coast  (at the northern end of the Gascoyne Coast)* Coast (Perth Metropolitan beachside suburbs from Cottesloe to Yanchep)Census and ABSFor the purposes of geography, the Bureau of Statistics uses the Standard Geographical Classification, a hierarchical regionalisation that divides Western Australia into divisions, then subdivisions, local areas, and finally, collection districts.The ABS has  produced Regional profiles for the  nine ABS Statistical Divisions, and the ten Development Commission regions.See also* of regions of Australia* of Western Australia* Regional RivalriesReferencesExternal links*The Regional Development Commissions Act 1993 (as amended)*Fisheries - recreational fishing regionsFurther reading* Regions Western Australia. Perth, W.A. : Dept. of Commerce and Trade. Issue 1 (Mar./June 1998)-issue 11 (February 2002)* Regional futures: challenges and opportunities for Western Australias regions: a discussion paper prepared by the Regional Development Council and the Department of Commerce and Trade. Perth, W.A. : The Council, Rev. June 1996.* Western Australia: a statistical snapshot of the regions prepared by the Department of Commerce and Trade for the Regional Development Council. Perth: The Department., 1995.* Western Australia tomorrow: population projections for the statistical divisions, planning regions and local government areas of Western Australia. Perth, W.A. : Western Australian Planning Commission, 2000. Population report (Western Australian Planning Commission) ; no. 4. ISBN 0730992225Maps* Streetsmart Travellers Atlas of Western Australia  (2006)  Department of Land Information and West Australian Newspapers,9th ed. ISBN 1-921048-13-1* Quality Publishing Australia.(2007) Roads & tracks Western Australia: campsites directory, roads and tracks, all in one  Jolimont, W.A.,Quality Publishing Australia, 5th ed ISBN 1876723351 * UBD Western Australia country road atlas (2005) Macquarie Park, N.S.W.UBD, a division of Universal Publishers, 11th ed ISBN 0-7319-1587-9dAustralie-OccidentaledellAustralia Occidentale ja:
1363880
Random_forest
Random forest (or random forests)  is an ensemble classifier that consists of many decision trees and outputs the class that is the mode of the classs output by individual trees.  The algorithm for inducing a random forest was developed by Breiman() and Cutler, and Random Forests is their trademark. The term came from random decision forests that was first proposed by Kam Ho of Labs in 1995. The method combines Breimans bagging idea and the random selection of features, introduced independently by Ho()() and Amit and Geman() in order to construct a collection of decision trees with controlled variation.  The selection of a random subset of features is an example of the subspace method, which, in Hos formulation, is a way to implement discrimination() proposed by Kleinberg. Learning algorithm Each tree is constructed using the following algorithm:# Let the number of training cases be N, and the number of variables in the classifier be M.# We are told the number m of input variables to be used to determine the decision at a node of the tree; m should be much less than M.# Choose a training set for this tree by choosing n times with replacement from all N available training cases (i.e. take a bootstrap sample).  Use the rest of the cases to estimate the error of the tree, by predicting their classes.# For each node of the tree, randomly choose m variables on which to base the decision at that node.  Calculate the best split based on these m variables in the training set.# Each tree is fully grown and not pruned (as may be done in constructing a normal tree classifier).For prediction a new sample is pushed down the tree. It is assigned the label of the training sample in the terminal node it ends up in. This procedure is iterated over all trees in the  ensemble, and the average vote of all trees is reported as random forest prediction. Features and Advantages The advantages of random forest are:*It is one of the most accurate learning algorithms available. For many data sets, it produces a highly accurate classifier.()*It runs efficiently on large data bases.*It can handle thousands of input variables without variable deletion.*It gives estimates of what variables are important in the classification.*It generates an internal unbiased estimate of the generalization error as the forest building progresses.*It has an effective method for estimating missing data and maintains accuracy when a large proportion of the data are missing.*It has methods for balancing error in class population unbalanced data sets.*Generated forests can be saved for future use on other data.*Prototypes are computed that give information about the relation between the variables and the classification.*It computes proximities between pairs of cases that can be used in clustering, locating outliers, or (by scaling) give interesting views of the data.*The capabilities of the above can be extended to unlabeled data, leading to unsupervised clustering, data views and outlier detection.*It offers an experimental method for detecting variable interactions. Disadvantages * Random forests have been observed to overfit for some datasets with noisy classification/regression tasks.()* For data including categorical variables with different number of levels, random forests are biased in favor of those attributes with more levels. Therefore, the variable importance scores from random forest are not reliable for this type of data.() Visualization thumb|200px|Training data consisting of two Gaussian point clouds.thumb|200px|A visualization of the Random Forest model-space after training on this data.thumb|200px|For comparision, a logistic regression model was also trained on the same data.In order to form an intuitive visualization of the model-space represented by a random forest, a dataset consisting of 200 random points (100 green points and 100 red points) was created. The green points were drawn from a distribution with a centroid at (0,1), and the red points were drawn from a Gaussian distribution with a centroid at (1,0). In both cases, the variance was circular with an average radius of 1.A Random Forest model, consisting of 50 trees, was trained on this data. The purity of the color indicates the portion of the 50 trees that voted in agreement. Significant over-fit can be observed in this visualization.For contrast, a logistic regression model (which is somewhat less-prone to over-fit) was also trained on this same data.(Typically, random forest is best-suited for use with categorical features, but continuous features were used in this illustration because they were easier to visualize.) See also *multinomial logit*naive BayesReferences Commercial implementation * http://www.salford-systems.com Random Forests. Open source implementations * The Original RF by Breiman and Cutler. Written in Fortran 77. May be difficult to configure. GNU General Public License* ALGLIB contains an implementation of a modified random forest algorithm in C#, C++, Pascal, VBA. GPL 2+* orngEnsemble module within Orange data mining software suite. licenses* PARF Written in Fortran 90. Can distribute work over a cluster of computers using MPI.* party An implementation of Breimans random forest based on conditional inference trees for R.* randomForest for R.* Oblique random forests for R based on multivariate decision trees.* TMVA Toolkit for Multivariate Data Analysis implements random forests.* milk for Python implements random forests.* http://code.google.com/p/randomforest-matlab Matlab version. GNU GPL v2* Nimbus A Ruby gem implementing random forest for genomic selection contexts.* Apache Mahout.  Apache license* Stochastic Bosque A Matlab implementation.* The Waffles machine learning toolkit includes an implementation of random forest. External links * Random Forests classifier description (Site of Leo Breiman)* Liaw, Andy & Wiener, Matthew Classification and Regression by randomForest R News (2002) Vol. 2/3 p. 18 (Discussion of the use of the random forest package for R)* Ho, Tin Kam (2002). A Data Complexity Analysis of Comparative Advantages of Decision Forest Constructors. Pattern Analysis and Applications 5, p. 102-112 (Comparison of bagging and random subspace method)* * Forestdarbres dcisionnelsforestforestforestzh:
1365267
The_Corn_Is_Green
The Corn Is Green is a semi-autobiographical play by Williams.At its core is L. C. Moffat, a strong-willed English school teacher working in a small poverty-stricken coal mining town in the late 19th century. After struggling to win the local Welsh miners over to her English ways, an illiterate teenager, by the name of Morgan Evans eventually graduates with honors.The play premiered in London at the Duchess Theatre in 1938 with Williams portraying Morgan Evans.The first Broadway production, directed by Shumlin, opened on November 26, 1940 at the National Theatre and later transferred to the Theatre, running a total of 477 performances. The cast included Barrymore, Rhys Williams, Dunnock, and Waring. On May 3, 1943, a revival with Barrymore again in the lead opened at the Beck Theatre, where it ran for 56 performances.In 1945, a film adaptation was made, with Davis (herself of Welsh descent) as Moffat. In the late 1970s, Davis returned to the role in a musical stage adaptation that proved to be a disaster. The setting was changed to the American South, with the young man transformed into an African-American college student (portrayed by Harewood) ignoring his studies in favor of football. It was Miss Moffats responsibility to help him raise his grades so he can remain on the team. At this point in her life, Davis was far too old for the role and was unable to carry a tune. When the pre-Broadway run opened in Boston, the show was derided by the critics, and it underwent major changes before moving to Philadelphia. There audiences greeted it with catcalls, and it closed before its opening night, never making it to Broadway.  A 1979 made-for-television movie, directed by Cukor and starring Hepburn, was filmed on location in Wales.After 21 previews, another Broadway revival, directed by Matalon, opened on August 22, 1983, at the Theatre. In a case of color-blind casting, Tyson portrayed Miss Moffat, with Gallagher, Redmond, and Dillon in supporting roles. Critics found the play hopelessly dated, and it ran for only 32 performances.  In 1985, however, the play enjoyed a successful revival at the Vic Theatre, London, starring Kerr.External links**complete text of playCorn Is Greenbl est vertCorn Is Green
1369063
Battle_of_Cassinga
casualties2about 150 Cuban(over 600 people including SWAPO and PLAN soldiers and civilians, including many women and children(The Battle of Cassinga, Cassinga Raid or Kassinga Massacre was a controversial() South African airborne attack on a South West Africa Peoples Organization (SWAPO) refugee camp and military base(Lets Review Our National Holidays in Namibian, 27 April 2007) at the former town of Cassinga, Angola on 4 May 1978. Conducted as one of the three major actions of Reindeer during the African Border War, it was the African Armys first major assault.PlanningBy the beginning of 1978 SWAPO had improved its organization and gained strength in Owambo and the Eastern Caprivi, UNITA was under pressure and it became increasingly difficult for the SADF to operate in Southern Angola. According to the South African chief of staff operations it was imperative to deploy the full strength of the SADFs air and land capability against SWAPO, instead of counting on a hearts and minds programme. South Africa also feared the disruption of elections it planned to hold in South West Africa excluding SWAPO.()The attack on Cassinga (codenamed Moscow by SWAPO) grew out of the plan for Bruilof, which had envisaged attacking six SWAPO targets around the town of Chetequera. During the intelligence-gathering portion of the planning for Operation Bruilof, it became clear that the small, previously overlooked, one-time mining town of Cassinga was one of two SWAPOs HQs in the region, the latter being further north at Lubango.,() and the principal medical centre for the guerrillas in the region.(Aerial photo-reconnaissance, the primary role of 12 Squadron at Waterkloof, Pretoria, equipped with Canberra B12s, earlier in Spring of 1978 showed major military infrastructure including miles of zigzag trenches, concrete drive-in AFV emplacements covering road approaches and a star-shaped AA missile command-and-launch facility characteristic of Warsaw Pact SA-2 missile sites. It also - crucially - showed a school bus which had been hijacked from SA-controlled West Africa (Namibia) about 10 days earlier, the local schoolchildren onboard kidnapped. In response to this, the plan for Operation Bruilof was shelved and planning for a new operation, Operation Reindeer, began. Reindeer was composed of three main actions; the airborne assault on Cassinga, a mechanised assault on the Chetaquera complex at  - which also involved SAAF defence-suppression strikes - and an assault on the Dombondola complex at  by a light infantry force.Among the considerations were clear indications that Cuban combat forces were building up their resources-in-theatre and that East German and Soviet military advisers were actively involved.  The South African Defence Force was also concerned over the strategic threat a SA-2 missile-guarded fortress would pose, because it could facilitate the support and development of the SWAPO guerilla war into widespread armed insurgency against South African occupation of Namibia and possibly military confrontation as per the standard Soviet military model of the time.(Low Intensity Operations by General Sir Frank Kitson, and similar.)The planners for the operation were faced with a significant problem. While the Chetequera and Dombondola complexes were only around 35 km from the border with South-West Africa/Namibia (then under South African control), therefore making conventional assault possible, Cassinga was 260 km from the border and deep inside Angola. This meant that any conventional assault force would have to fight its way in and out, and would almost certainly have given advance warning to the PLAN (Peoples Liberation Army of Namibia - SWAPOs armed wing) soldiers in Cassinga, allowing them and leaders like Jerobeum Dimo Amaambo (the PLAN commander-in-chief, then resident in Cassinga) and Greenwell Matongo to escape.  Cassinga furthermore was located on a small hill, flanked by a river on its West side, and open fields in other directions, factors that combined to give any defenders the advantage.However, South African Defence Force (SADF) intelligence reports had ascertained that SWAPO - and probably its advisers - was lulled into a false sense of security due to Cassingas distance from the border.  Intelligence briefings before the event indicated no awareness of any supportive infantry or armoured units to support the base against a ground assault, and although SWAPO was creating a sophisticated and comprehensive defensive network around the base consisting of a system of miles of trenches, AFV concrete revetments, pill-boxes and AAA gun and missile emplacements, they were certainly not prepared for a joint-arms airborne attack. The SADF had not previously demonstrated any such capability, giving military analysts no reason to suspect that such was available to the SA Defence Staff planners. This then gave the SADF planners the possibility of conducting a surprise attack on the base using only an airborne assault, without ground support. Earlier in that year, 12 Squadron had commenced training for a low-level strike role, utilising area defence-suppression weapons. Though a very risky plan it was decided that the element of surprise would outweigh the disadvantage of having no supporting armour.The decision was therefore taken to mount a large airborne assault on Cassinga (by now code-named Alpha), supported by African Air Force (SAAF) fighter-bombers and a fleet of 17 medium-transport helicopters. Using an exercise already underway called Exercise Kwiksilver as a smokescreen, the army initiated a call up of the Citizen Force (reserve units similar to the National Guard) parachute units. The paratroopers were then secretly taken to the Brug Training Range near Bloemfontein, where they embarked on an intensive refresher training course, coupled with rehearsals for the attack on Cassinga.The final hurdle was to be the politicians in the South African cabinet, who were hesitant about authorising such an operation in case it generated adverse international reactions. There were a number of delays because of this, but finally on 2 May 1978 the Prime Minister, Vorster, gave his authority for the operation to commence on 4 May, with the date being specifically chosen as the day after the Nations Security Council debate on West Africa ended. This was to avoid making lives difficult for those countries favourable to South Africa.(Composition of ForcesSouth Africaright|thumb|Airborne forces committed to the battleDue to the secrecy involved in the operation, and the commitment of most of the permanent force conscripts of 1 Parachute Battalion in other operations, it was decided to use 2 and 3 Parachute Battalions, both Citizen Force, in the operation. However, the need for secrecy meant not enough Citizen Force soldiers could be called up to fill both Parachute Battalions. As a result, the three Battalions were temporarily merged into a single Composite Parachute Battalion, which was commanded by Colonel Jan Breytenbach.  The final composition of ground forces for the attack on Cassinga was therefore the following:The entire operation was run by Major General Ian Gleeson, who commanded the SWA Tactical HQ (set up specially for Operation Reindeer). Overall control of the airborne forces was given to Brigadier M.J. du Plessis, who commanded the Parachute Brigade HQ. The units under his command were the Composite Parachute Battalion under Colonel Jan Breytenbach which was composed of A, B, C and D companies (all under-strength), an independent rifle platoon, a mortar platoon and an anti-tank platoon; the Helicopter Administration Area (HAA) protection force under Major James Hills, consisting of two Hawk Groups (10 man sections of rapid-reaction paratroopers) from 1 Parachute Battalion; an Airborne Reserve under Captain Wesley de Beer, consisting of a company from 2 Parachute Battalion airborne in a C.160 to be used in the event of reinforcements being required, and the Mobile Air Operations Team (MAOT) under Commandant James Kriel, which consisted of five SAAF personnel to set up and run the HAA.()  All the paratroopers were equipped with the R1 7.62 mm assault rifle.The South African Air Force contribution consisted of four Hercules and five C.160 Transall transport aircraft. The helicopter component of the operation consisted of 13 Pumas and six Frelons.The air attack component provided by the SAAF consisted of four Canberra B-12 bombers, each carrying 300 Alpha anti-personnel bombs; five Buccaneers carrying eight  bombs each, as well as a sixth carrying seventy-two 68 mm rockets, and lastly four Mirage III fighter aircraft, armed only with Sidewinder air-to-air missiles and their 30 mm cannons fitted with high-explosive fragmentation shells.One crew from the Canberra squadron was tasked with acquiring further photo-reconnaissance imagery,() some to be used in the preparation of photo-strip maps for the Tactical Low Flying (TLF) legs that the various aircraft types would undertake - there being inadequate conventional mapping of much of the region - and additional imagery of the Cassinga environs for the Parabat zone and Buccaneer target planning purposes. It was during this phase that a serious error was made, with potentially disastrous consequences.Air-photo interpreters put the wrong scale on the maps that were used in the planning, despite the altimeter readings being clearly visible in the original reconnaissance photographs.(  Consequently, the paratroop planners overestimated the size of the DZ, thinking it was long and wide enough drop the paratroopers, when in fact it wasnt.  Compounding this error, the pilot of the lead aircraft was momentarily distracted by the effects of the bombing, and issued the jump signal a few seconds late.()  The net effect was that many paratroopers overshot their intended DZs.Playing a supporting role was a single Cessna C-185, which flew in the target area and acted as an observation post as well as a radio relay aircraft. In addition there was a single DC-4 Strikemaster fitted out as an EW and ELINT aircraft flying over the SWA/Namibia border with Angola. The purpose of this latter aircraft was to both intercept all Angolan, Cuban and SWAPO radio transmissions, before jamming their communications networks at the appropriate time. The successful jamming of the SWAPO, Angolan and Cuban communications network is one of the reasons for the late reaction by either of the latter two in responding to the attack.()SWAPOWhat can be ascertained is that Cassinga was a refugee camp as well as headquarters base for PLAN. The Angolan government allocated the abandoned village to SWAPO in 1976 to cope with thousands of refugees coming from South West Africa, at the time of the raid estimated at 3,000 to 4,000 people.( Two days before the raid, UNICEF reported of a well-run and well-organized camp but ill-equipped to cope with the rapid refugee increase in early 1978.(PLAN, the armed wing of SWAPO, was a guerrilla army and therefore did not have a traditional command and control structure. As such, it is impossible to determine a composition of units inside Cassinga. According to TRC-findings, a self-defence unit posted at Cassinga consisted of approximately 300 male and female PLAN cadres( (other source: approximately 300 to 600(). The military section of Cassinga was easily partitioned from the non-military sections. The overall commander of PLAN in town was Amaambo, responsible for the co-ordination of all PLAN actions in Southern Angola, including incursions into South West Africa/Namibia. A headquarters such as Cassinga was second in importance only to Lumbango, which was the overall SWAPO military headquarters in Angola. Aside from the system of trenches and bunkers, defensive equipment included two ZPU-4 14.5 mm anti-aircraft guns, one ZU-23-2 23 mm gun, and around one or two ZSU 12.7 mm guns. These were capable of being used in a ground attack role.CubaThe nearest Cuban presence was 15 km south of Cassinga, at the village of Tetchamutete, located at . It consisted of a reinforced mechanised battalion of at least four T-34 tanks, 17 BTR-152 armoured personnel carriers, seven trucks and four anti-aircraft guns, accompanied by around 400 troops.  This unit was known to SADF intelligence, who had intercepted their radio traffic, and were also aware of their anti-UNITA operations.  Their strength was estimated at 144 in October 1977, and was a major contributing factor in the choice of air rather than a ground assault.()The SADF had been given explicit operational instructions to avoid conflict with the Cubans(), nevertheless the Cuban unit made an no-notice operational deployment within an hour of the first bombs dropping.  Consequently, despite the South Africans planning to complete their operations before any Cuban intervention, delays and the Cubans rapid reaction made conflict inevitable.The Attack04h00 - 09h00The first to move on the morning of the attack were the paratroopers of the Composite Parachute Battalion, who got up at 04h00 and began fitting their weapons, equipment and parachutes.At 05h19, the four Buccaneers bombers took off from Waterkloof, followed at 05h43 by the faster Canberra. The heavily laden Bucs could fly only at medium altitude, so their airspeed (TAS) was considerably lower than that of the Cans, flying over  higher. One of the Buccaneers went to an air force base nearer to the border in order to refuel and act as a Close Air Support (CAS) aircraft, while the fifth aircraft of the Buccaneer strike force was delayed due to a brake problem, leaving four Buccaneers available for the initial strike.At 06h00 the eight transport aircraft carrying the paratroopers became airborne. Two of the C-160s, carrying the reserve company of 116 paratroopers, peeled off and entered a holding pattern just south of the border so as to be available to drop reinforcements during the battle. The remaining six transports continued on towards a holding point some miles east of Cassinga.At about 06h30, the ELINT/EW DC-4 became airborne and settled into a holding pattern just south of the border. At the same time, a flight of two Puma helicopters, under the command of Major John Church, took off from a jungle night-stop to fly to a clearing 22 km east of Cassinga in order to set up a Helicopter Administration Area (HAA), where the helicopters used in the operation could refuel. On board the two helicopters were Commandant James Kriel, the commander of the South African Air Forces Mobile Air Operations Team (MAOT) and his signaller, as well as Major James Hills, commander of Bravo Company, 1 Parachute Battalion, along with one ten-man section from the two Hawk Groups he would be using to protect the HAA. Also in the two helicopters were six 200-litre drums of helicopter fuel, and, to the consternation of Hills, the Chief of the South African Army, Lieutenant-General Viljoen.The MAOT set up their radios and navigational beacons at the HAA, by now code-named Whisky-Three, and signalled the all-clear for the rest of the force, consisting of the rest of the Hawk Group protection element (31 paratroopers), six medical personnel, two more members of the MAOT and eighty-six 200-litre drums of helicopter fuel, all onboard a fleet of five Super Frelon and ten Puma helicopters. The HAA was then completed, and the 17 helicopters refuelled and waited for the call to extract the paratroopers after the completion of the attack.Also at around 07h00 the solitary Cessna C-185 took off and began flying towards Cassinga. Its role in the operation was to be an airborne post, directing the bombers into the target and giving the all-clear for the paratrooper drop, as well as being a radio-relay aircraft (known as Telstar duty in the SAAF). It would later be forced to withdraw due to sustained anti-aircraft fire. At around 07h50 two Mirage III fighter aircraft took off, heading straight for Cassinga.  There was initially no role for air superiority fighters in the plan, but Staff Officer (Fighters) was not to be denied.The defence-suppression bombing attack by the Canberras was two minutes late, occurring at 08h02 instead of 08h00 as originally planned, due to the lead navigator failing to maintain effective timing-adjustment during the 200 nm low-level approach phase. This made no difference to the intended effect. As the bombing had been timed to coincide with SWAPOs daily roll-call on the parade ground, most of the guerrillas in the camp were standing out in the open when the Canberras initiated their low-level fragmentation bomb attack from the north.  Each of the four Canberras - flying in loose line abreast at  and 300 knots (an airshow display profile) - dropped 300 Alpha anti-personnel bombs, which were small 10 kg finless fragmentation bombs like 10-Pin Bowling balls, designed to bounce up to 10 m into the air before detonating. A zone of some 800 metres by 500 metres was carpeted, each aircraft having its own bomb line. These weapons sowed havoc amongst the assembled guerrillas in the open, destroying vehicles, POL (Petroleum Oil Lubricants, military acronym for flammable liquids) storage tanks and soft buildings.Immediately after the Canberras came the Buccaneers, from the west, who flew their dive-bombing runs along a generally east-west axis. Photography from one Buc cockpit, showing the graphic lines of the Alpha bomb strikes, was released to the SA press the following day. Of the total of thirty-two 1000 lb (450 kg) bombs dropped by the four Buccaneers on the identified hard points, 24 scored direct hits, causing an immense amount of damage. Finally, the two Mirage IIIs conducted a strafing run on the base, using their 30 mm high explosive cannon rounds. All the aircraft except for the solitary Buccaneer on CAS duty then flew back to air bases in West Africa (Namibia) to refuel and re-arm to cockpit readiness in case of need - the Mirages to Ondangwa air force base, the Canberras, Buccaneers and C-130/C-160s to Grootfontein air force base, where their support teams and material had been ferried up from Pretoria during the morning. The Canberras and Buccaneers were used for a later strike on the Chetequera complex.After the attack aircraft had finished their bombing runs the six transports, which had been holding in wait to the east, commenced their formation run towards Cassinga at an altitude of 200 feet (60 m). Shortly before reaching the base, the six aircraft climbed to , the drop height, and lined up for the drop. However, required visual tracking and distance co-ordination markers were obscured by smoke from the bombing run, the drop zone (DZ) box scaling and drop point distances were incorrect - due to the reconnaissance scaling errors - and the drop was a shambles with nearly all the paratroopers being dropped off-target, some on the West side of the river and some into tall maize where they had problems linking up. The resultant confusion caused numerous delays, ruining the schedule of the drop-to-contact plan, and much of the advantage of surprise. The disastrous drop also meant that it would be nearly an hour before C-Company was able to move into position on the eastern side of the camp and seal off the escape routes and as a result a number of top PLAN commanders, including Dimo Amaambo and Greenwell Matongo (two principle targets of the attack) escaped (with Amaambo later becoming the first head of the Namibian Defence Force in 1990 ()).The two independent rifle platoons, No.9 and No.11, were dropped quite accurately to the north. They immediately went into action, moving through a tented camp to the north-west of Cassinga, beyond the bombed areas. Resistance was fierce but short-lived, and a total of 54 bodies were counted by the platoons before they took up their position along the northern end of the base to seal off that escape route.Of the four main paratrooper companies, D-Company had experienced the most accurate drop, though they were still 500 m from their intended drop zone. Regrouping quickly, they moved to attack structures which had been identified in the aerial reconnaissance photos as engineering buildings. However, during the assault on these buildings several of them exploded, perhaps due to ammunition stores within, injuring several paratroopers. There was also a brief blue-on-blue engagement as D-Company paratroopers were mistakenly fired upon by their fellow soldiers from B-Company, which by then had reached the base, but there were no casualties. After completing the assault of the engineer complex, D-Company moved south to set up a stop-line and prevent any guerrillas from escaping via that route. It also dispatched the anti-tank platoon to lay a tank ambush on the road to Techamutete.09h00 - 12h00By 09h00, A and B Companies had regrouped and were ready to commence the main assault on Cassinga. Instead of attacking eastwards as initially planned, the two companies attacked the base in a northerly direction. Initially, they encountered very little resistance, though this changed dramatically once the paratroopers neared the centre of the base. Heavy sniper fire was directed at the paratroopers from a number of trees inside the base, they were subjected to recoilless rifle fire, and some SWAPO guerrillas had regrouped, using houses as cover from which to fire at the paratroopers, critically wounding two paratroopers.However, the paratroopers faced their greatest challenge when they were fired upon by a number of ZPU-4 14.5&thinsp;mm anti-aircraft guns used in the ground role. This brought both companies to a complete halt, as they were unable to move under the accurate, and close, fire of the guns, and the Buccaneer on CAS duty could not conduct a strike on the guns for fear of hitting the paratroopers close by.In the end, Colonel Breytenbach ordered the commander of D-Company to take some men and work up towards the guns by attacking the trenches to the west of Cassinga.  He also ordered the mortar platoon to begin attacking the guns.Upon entering the trenches, the men from D-Company were surprised to find a number of civilians, being used as human shields by the guerrillas hiding inside. The guerrillas opened fire on the paratroopers, leading the paratroopers to enter what they described later as a mode of kill or be killed, in which preventing the deaths of the civilians in the trenches was impossible. Though a number of civilians were killed in those trenches, as the paratroopers moved forward they began to encounter less and less civilians until nearer the guns all those in the trenches, male and female, were wearing SWAPOs Cuban-style uniforms. In the meantime, 9 Platoon had entered the trenches from the north, though were making slow progress as they came under the attention of the gunners.After a combination of the attack through the trenches and the mortar fire, the guns were silenced. The toll was an acceptable one for the South Africans; there were at least 95 SWAPO fighters dead inside the trenches and around the guns, and two paratroopers had been killed.After the fall of the guns, all major resistance in Cassinga ended. The odd sniper and corners of light resistance were all that remained, and the mopping up process was soon finished. The paratroopers immediately set up the battalion headquarters and Regimental Aid-Post (RAP) next to the SWAPO hospital, and began treating the worst of the injured. Overall, three paratroopers had been killed, and eleven wounded, two of them critically. In addition, a fourth paratrooper was found to be missing, presumed killed. It was later assumed that he had drowned after being dropped in the river during the parachute jump, or that his parachute had malfunctioned as he was seen exiting the aircraft.()By now the attack was two hours behind schedule, with the first helicopter extractions having been planned for 10h00.12h00 - 15h00Brigadier Du Plessis at this time informed Colonel Jan Breytenbach of a radio interception, indicating that the Cuban force at Techamutete was deploying.  Brigadier Du Plessis insisted on extracting all the troops immediately, however Colonel Breytenbach wanted to secure the LZ first.  A compromise was agreed whereby half the paratroopers would move to the LZ where 12 Puma helicopters would extract them, while the remainder would continue clearing operations, as well as to collect any and all documents of intelligence value.At around 13h00, Colonel Jan Breytenbach was informed by one of the Buccaneers on CAS duty that the Cuban mechanised battalion was moving up the road from Techamutete to Cassinga.The Buccaneer had spotted an advancing column of around 30 assorted AFVs, APCs and other vehicles advancing slowly up the road from Techamutete. It immediately opened fire on the column, destroying three BTR-152 armoured personnel carriers in the process, but then had to return to Grootfontein air force base to re-arm and refuel, leaving about 200 of the remaining paratroopers temporarily unprotected. All that stood between them and the advancing armoured column were the 22 men of the anti-tank platoon, armed only with 10 RPG-7 rocket launchers and five anti-tank mines which they had planted in the road.At this time however, there was a serious breakdown in command and control, and a number of fundamental errors were made. The shuttle of helicopters to and from Whiskey-Three, the HAA, as well as the order in which paratroopers were embarked, was improvised and initially uncoordinated and disorganised. It wasnt made initially clear to the commander of the helicopter extraction force quite what the problem - and the sudden urgency - was.  Furthermore two engineers, whose role it was to destroy enemy equipment, departed in the first wave with all the demolition fuses before all the equipment had been disabled.Meanwhile, apparently under the false impression from the helicopter departures that the paratroopers had all extracted, the Cuban column advanced directly into the ambush that the paratroopers had set for them.  The lead T-34 tank was destroyed by one of the anti-tank mines, while the paratroopers destroyed four of the BTR-152s using their RPG-7s. They also killed approximately 40 of the Cuban troops before making their retreat back along the road towards the Helicopter Zone (HLZ) east of Cassinga where Breytenbach was organising the remaining paratroopers for final extraction. In the face of the oncoming armoured column, Breytenbach ordered a thin defensive line, but realised the lightly armed paratroopers stood little chance against the armoured vehicles and prepared to fall-back into the bush to an emergency LZ while calling urgently for air support.The apparent success of the mission now looked like turning into a disaster for the SA troops, with the prospect of being over-run by armoured forces,  into enemy territory.  General Viljoen, who until this time had been wearing his rank and beret, removed and hid them.()At 14h20, when the Cuban AFVs were already in sight of the beleaguered paratroopers, a Buccaneer and two Mirage IIIs suddenly appeared ahead, eliciting a ragged cheer from the paratroopers. An experienced Air Controller (FAC) amongst the paratroopers then began to direct the three aircraft in strikes against the advancing Cuban armour. The Mirage IIIs, with their 30 mm cannons, destroyed 10 BTR-152s before running low on fuel and returning to Ondangwa air force base.  The Mirages cannons were unable to destroy any tanks, but the sole Buccaneer destroyed at least two tanks, an anti-aircraft position and a number of other vehicles with its 68 mm SNEB air-to-ground rockets.  The rockets had been omitted from the original Operation Order, but the Buccaneer Squadron Commander had fortuitously included them in the ordnance that was ferried to the Grootfontein forward air force base by Hercules, with his ground crews and maintenance spares.  The Buccaneer pilot was being fired on continually by a towed 14.5 mm anti-aircraft gun, which he had to make two passes at before he was able to destroy it with rockets.The Buccaneer ran out of ammunition at this point, but this coincided with the arrival of the 17 helicopters to extract the remaining paratroopers in the second wave.  The helicopters arrival betrayed the position of the LZ to the remaining Cuban forces, who began to advance on the area.  While unable to see the armoured vehicles, the paratroopers could hear their engines and gunfire, and could see trees being flattened in their path barely 200 metres away.  In a desperate attempt to prevent the Cuban tanks from firing at the vulnerable helicopters and the assembling SA troops waiting to be picked up, the Buccaneer pilot dived his aircraft dangerously low, nearly hitting trees as he flew close over the top of the tanks, disorienting the crews and forcing them to break off their developing attack on the parabats positions.Due to the disorganisation with the first wave of helicopters, there was nearly not enough space for all the remaining paratroopers and prisoners on the second wave. In the ensuing panic to scramble aboard the helicopters, 40 SWAPO prisoners, meant to have been taken back to South West Africa for interrogation, had to be set free and left behind.  Some excess equipment and ammunition was also dumped from the overloaded helicopters.  A final barrage of fire from the paratroopers stalled the closing Cuban amour just sufficiently long enough to complete the extraction of the assembled paratroops.However ten minutes after taking off, two of the Puma helicopters were directed to return to Cassinga, as it was feared that some of the paratroopers might have been left behind.  They spotted a group a people huddled together, but closer inspection revealed that they were the prisoners who had been left behind.  The helicopters flew a total of four low passes looking for paratroopers, when one of the helicopter pilots spotted a Cuban tank appearing from the bushes.  He warned the other Puma pilot, who was able to bank just in time so that the tank round missed the aircraft.  No paratroopers were found and the two Pumas returned to the HAA.  The dismantling of the HAA continued throughout the rest of the day.15h00 - 18h00At 15h00, one of the Mirage IIIs returned to Cassinga, and once again strafed the Cuban vehicles that were still on the road, setting at least one of them alight.  It was replaced at 15h30 by another aircraft and a Buccaneer which proceeded to destroy more of the vehicles and a building.  About a kilometer south of Cassinga, the Buccaneer attacked another column of vehicles, coming under heavy anti-aircraft fire in the process.Another Buccaneer arriving at 16h45 surprised some Cubans moving through the ruins, destroying a T-34 tank and some anti-aircraft guns in the process, while further Mirage and Buccaneer strikes at 17h10 and 18h35 destroyed another tank and other equipment.The result was that by nightfall nearly the entire Cuban battalion had been destroyed, killing around 150 Cuban soldiers, accounting for that countrys single biggest casualty rate during its military involvement in Angola.(A complete Angolan tank brigade relief force arriving at dusk, was too late to have any impact, and found only scenes of destruction at what had once been Cassinga.AftermathAccording to an Angolan government Paper the official toll of the Cassinga raid was a total of 624 dead and 611 injured civilians as well as combatants. Among the dead were 167 women and 298 teenagers and children. Since many of the combatants were female or teenagers and many combatants did not wear uniforms, the exact number of civilians among the dead could not be established.(Truth and Reconciliation Commission of South Africa Report, Vol. 2, Chapter 2, p. 52)In purely military terms, the South Africans declared the attack on Cassinga to be a great success, even though disaster was so closely averted by the intervention of the SAAF.  Despite not capturing Dimo Amaambo and other senior leaders, the destruction of the base, the heavy casualties inflicted, and capture of documentation set SWAPOs insurgency back by several months. On the SADF side, the casualties were low for such an attack, an important factor in South Africa where the public was intolerant of high casualty rates. Three soldiers died, eleven were wounded with one missing in action.In terms of military lessons learned, the South Africans realised after the battle that an improved command and control structure was needed for the South African Armys airborne units. To this end, 1, 2 and 3 Parachute Battalions were placed under the command of the newly-created 44 Parachute Brigade, therefore centralising command and control and logistics for the Armys airborne forces. The South African Defence Force also revamped the way it dealt with the media, though it was never able to erode the advantage in the propaganda arena that SWAPO enjoyed with its Soviet support, nor erase its enemys memory of the event.The South Africans admitted that the Cuban armoured battalion also performed above expectations.  Veterans of the various South African parachute battalions still privately celebrate Cassinga Day in remembrance both of the extent of the victory and of those who died that day.According to General Viljoen, Cassinga set the strategy for the SADF for the next ten years, i.e. that of launching pre-emptive strikes at SWAPO inside Angola, even though subsequent actions would be armoured rather than air assaults.()SWAPO launched a retaliatory bombardment from Zambia of Mulilo in the Strip on 23 August 1978, during which 10 soldiers were killed and 10 injured as a result of a direct hit on their barracks by an 82 mm mortar bomb.(  16 guerrillas were killed in a follow-up operation 250 km into Zambia.Political consequencesAccording to General Geldenhuys the raid was a jewel of military craftmanship,(Geldenhuys, J.: A Generals Story: From an Era of War and Peace, 1995, p. 93) but politically it was a disaster for the Apartheid regime.  A media campaign had been carefully prepared well in advance of the operation and media releases managed in order to counter negative reports on South African military actions and claims of killing innocent civilians. This campaign included the fabrication and distortion of SWAPO actions.( One of the parachute battalions was specifically tasked to take photographs() and instructed to focus on images supporting the South African cause; bodies were only to be photographed with weapons by their side, negative images, such a suffering victims, were to be avoided.( Nevertheless, in spite of these instructions, pictures of bodies without weapons and of dead SADF paratroopers were taken.(SADF photographs by Mike McWilliams included pictures of bodies without weapons, and pictures of dead SADF paratroopers.)Yet, it was SWAPO that maximised propaganda benefit, making the first announcements about the attack with pictures of bodies in civilian clothes that were picked up by the international media.()  They described the base as a refugee camp and claimed the SADF had slaughtered 600 defenceless refugees.( The bodies were buried in two mass graves at Cassinga and pictures of them were effectively used for this purpose.In fact, weapons and military installations were present and documented at the camp and the Red Cross stated that it was in fact both a refugee camp and a military base. In 1998 the South African Truth and Reconciliation Commission also concluded that The Nations invited SWAPO-leader Nujoma to address the council before issuing Nations Security Council Resolution 428 on 6 May condemning South Africa for the armed invasion of Angola carried out on 4 May 1978. The Council condemned apartheid and the continued occupation of Southwest Africa and commended Angola for its support of the Namibian people.After independence, the new government of Namibia declared 4 May as Day, a public holiday to commemorate the loss of life during the raid.()Official celebration of this event by the SANDF ended only in 1996, two years after Mandela was elected president.()Survivors* Kamanya(Ex-MP Kamanya dies in The Namibian, 1 August 2005)* Nashandi(State Houses Nashandi resigns New Era, 16 October 2009)Further reading****See also* of operations of the South African Border WarReferencesNotesExternal links*http://flecha.co.uk/CASSINGA.html Battle of Cassinga 4 May 1978**auf Cassingaved Cassingao Cassing
1371187
Lydenburg
footnotes               Lydenburg is a town in Mpumalanga, Africa. The town is slated to be renamed Mashishing, according to an announcement made on June 30, 2006 by the South African Minister of Arts and Culture, Pallo Jordan. Lydenburg is situated on the Sterkspruit/Dorps River tributary of the Olifants River at the base of the Tom Pass. The name is derived from Dutch meaning Town of Suffering. It has become the centre of the South African fly-fishing industry and is an agricultural and mining centre.HistoryThe earliest known forms of African sculpture in southern Africa dating back to AD 400 was found in the area in the late 1950s. Lydenburg was founded in 1849 by a group of Voortrekkers under the leadership of Potgieter when they abandoned their previous settlement Ohrigstad (to the north) due to a malaria epidemic. The town became the capital of the Lydenburg Republic (De Republiek Lydenburg in Zuid Afrika) in 1856 and later in 1857 joined the Republic of Utrecht but in 1860 both these republics joined the Zuid Afrikaanse Republiek (ZAR). Lydenburg became important because it was on the wagon route to the port of Bay (Maputo) which was free of British control. In 1871 construction of the road was started by Abraham Espag under the orders of President Francois Burgers.  The first wagons arrived in Lydenburg from Delagoa Bay in 1874.On 6 February 1873 alluvial gold was discovered and within 3 months the Lydenburg goldfields was proclaimed. The Boer War broke out between Britain and the Transvaal Republic in 1880. A British garrison under Lieutenant Walter Hillyar Colquhoun Long (uncle of the 1st Long) took control of Lydenburg to control the goldfields. It was from here that the ill-fated 94th Regiment under the command of Lieutenant-Colonel Philip Robert Anstruther marched to Pretoria. The remainder of the garrison at Lydenburg was besieged.By 1910 the railway reached Lydenburg. In 1927 it became a municipality. Name change In June 2006 it was announced that Arts and Culture minister, Jordan, approved the name change of Lydenburg to Mashishing (meaning long, green grass)(http://www.news24.com/SouthAfrica/News/Lydenburg-takes-on-new-name-20060906). However the name still hasnt caught on. Road signs still say Lydenburg and businesses and local building such as the Lydenburg Museum have still kept the old name. See also * of the Bushveld References af:Lydenburgca:Lydenburgde:Mashishingfr:Lydenburg(plaats)pl:Lydenburgro:Lydenburgru:ve:Lydenburg
1373412
Regional_District_of_Bulkley-Nechako
The Regional District of Bulkley-Nechako (RDBN) is a district in the province of Columbia, Canada. As of the 2006 census, the population was 38,243. The area is 73,419.01 square kilometres.  The regional district offices are in Burns Lake.Its geographical components are the Valley, the northern part of the Country, and the Country, including portions of the Mountains and Mountains in the west and north of the regional district, respectively.  The dominant landform is the Plateau.  Neighbouring regional districts are the Kitimat-Stikine, Central Coast, Cariboo, Fraser-Fort George, and River Regional Districts; on its north the boundary with the southern edge of the remote Region is separated from the Bulkley-Nechako Regional District by the parallel north.  The boundaries of the regional district near-entirely coincide with the territory of the Dakelh or Carrier peoples, and also some of that of the Dunneza (Beaver), but their reserves and governments lie outside the regional district system.  Roughly identical in area to the old New Caledonia fur district in the days of the West Company, it is still sometimes referenced as New Caledonia, but while trapping continues in some area, its economy is now based in forestry, mining, tourism (mostly ranching in southern areas).References*Statistics Canada 2006 Community Profile: Bulkley-Nechako (Regional district)External links* Regional District of Bulkley-NechakoDistrict of Bulkley-Nechakorgional de Bulkley-Nechakoregionale di Bulkley-Nechakoja: pl:Bulkley-Nechako
1375700
ALCO_Century_636
 poweroutputThe ALCO Century 636 was the most powerful single-engine diesel locomotive constructed by ALCO. The locomotive had a C-C arrangement and . The locomotive rested on a pair of trucks of all-new design, known as the Hi-Ad, standing for high adhesion. Visually, it is similar to the Century 630, but can be distinguished by the intercooler box. The C630 has two grilles here, one above the other. The C636 only has the upper grille. Production The production of only 34 Alco C636s, built in 1967 and 1968, reflected Alcos dwindling locomotive market share. Despite many new and innovative features, the C636 could not hold its own. Three demonstrators were built costing Alco about $5.5 million. 636-2, the only ex-Demo operating, was a factor in dissuading potential customers from purchasing these locomotives. During an evaluation on the Fe Railway, the same traction motor blower on 636-2 failed (which causes engine shutdown) and was replaced on three of four runs, and had other unsatisfactory results while being tested on the Pacific Railroad.A.E. Goodwin in Australia built 29 C636s between May 1968 and October 1970 for the Pilbara Iron Ore railroads. Hamersley Iron purchased 12 units in 5 separate orders. Bechtel purchased 5 C636s for use in the construction of the Mt. Newman Mining facilities. The latter company ordered 12 C636s a year later and bought Bechtels locomotives.Locomotive Works produced a M636 variant of the C636 on Dofasco trucks for Pacific Railway and National Railway. Original Owners  Current usage As of 2006, the Railroad (DL) and the York, Susquehanna and Western Railway (NYSW) own ALCO C636s. The Delaware-Lackawanna C636, number 3642, is formerly Conrail 6792. The New York, Susquehanna and Western Railway owns 2 ALCO C636s assigned numbers 3660 and 3662. The 3660 is former Cartier Mining number 78 and had been temporarily numbered RPRX 78. NYSW 3662 is former Quebec Cartier Mining number 77. The 3662 has yet to be renumbered and has been out of service due to freeze damage as of 2005. Both the Delaware-Lackawanna and the New York, Susquehanna and Western Railway also own M636s built by the Locomotive Works in Montreal, Canada.The NYSW C636s and M636s are now owned by Western New York and Pennsylvania Railroad/Avon and Lakeville Railroad.External links* Sarberenyi, Robert. Alco C636 Original Owners.
1381210
Vrpalota
longd18.13761Vrpalota is a town in Western Hungary, in the Transdanubian county of Veszprm. It was a mining town during the Socialist era, but the mines have been closed. Most of the citizens work in the nearby cities, Veszprm or Szkesfehrvr. History The towns origins are linked to the Roman and Avar periods, as testified verified by mounds, tombstones and Roman artifacts in the outskirts of the town, some of which can be found in the lapidary of Castle. In the Middle Ages it was a flourishing market town. In the 20th century it became a center for coal mining.Main sights*The Thuri castle, located in the heart of the town. It was commanded, among the others, by  Thuri. It is currently home to the Museum of Chemistry, and the collection of the memories of mining. Concerts and theatre performances are held there every summer.*The old Catholic church, home to Romanesque and early-Gothic frescos in a particularly good condition. One of the World War I memorials erected in those days and destroyed in the tempests of the history can be found here.*J Szerencst (Good Luck) Community Centre, which houses four large-sized Gobelin works of Ferenczy. The one-man exhibition of Matzon, one of the significant representatives of constructivism can be visited in the nearby Nagy Gyula Gallery, which was converted from a  synagogue.*Baroque Reformed church with its irregularly arched western faade. It  was built on the walls of the formerly Hussar Castle. It houses  the memorial plaque of Molnr.*Zichy Castle. The library-room with its  wooden cover and its frescos recalling mythological ages, is a regular place of cultural events. Italso includes the Zichy-Chapel and the  altar carved from sandstone in the Catholic cemetery. Among the graves  are  the memorial of militiaman martyrs of the Revolution and War of Independence belonging to the earls family.*Memorials of the Hungarian Revolution and War of Independence in 1848-49, of the World War heroes and victims, of the heroes of Revolution in 1956.Twin towns* Petroani, Romania* Fermo, Italy* Kremnica, Slovakia* Wolfsberg, Austria* Gradec, SloveniaExternal links*Vrpalota Home Pagede:Vrpalotaes:Vrpalotaeo:Vrpalotafa:fr:Vrpalotait:Vrpalotalt:Varpalotahu:Vrpalotanl:Vrpalotapl:Vrpalotaro:Vrpalotaru:sk:Vrpalotasl:Vrpalotasr:sv:Vrpalota
1385287
Air_Tindi
thumb|Air Tindi airplane operating in winterAir Tindi is an airline based in Yellowknife, Territories, Canada. Now owned by Air, it operates scheduled and on demand charter services. Its main base is Airport and the airline was formerly owned by the Arychuk family.() The name Tindi means the big lake or Slave Lake, in the local native Tch Yati language. History Air Tindi was established by two families, Alex Arychuk and his wife Sheila, and his brother Peter Arychuk and his wife Teri.(One on One: Alex Arychuk, Darren Locke, Wings magazine.)   It began operations on 1 November 1988, with four float/ski aircraft. In 1990, it purchased its first Havilland Canada DHC-6 Twin Otter with the help of the Rae-Edzo Development Corporation, allowing the airline to expand and provide more services to the growing mining exploration industry. In 1991, Air Tindi merged with Latham Island Airways and acquired a further four aircraft in the process.( By mid-1992, Air Tindi was operating four Twin Otters on floats. In 1993, their first large aircraft, a DHC 4 Caribou for re-supply work with the mining industry, was purchased. A DHC Dash 7 was acquired in 1996.On 19 December 2006, Air Tindi sold to Discovery Air (TSX at DA.A), a publicly traded holding company based in London, Ontario.(Discovery Air Inc. Closes Private Placement Offering and Acquisition of Air Tindi Ltd.) The original founders originally maintained their positions with Air Tindi, but various corporate disagreements led to Alex Arychuk leaving as president, and departing the Discovery Air board.(Things Fall Apart: Discovery Air, Jack Danylchuk, Up Here Business magazine, July 2009)In August 2011 the Government of Nunavut announced that it had awarded a contract to Air Tindi, along with its partner Arsaniq owned by Dennis Lyall, to provide medivac services to the Kitikmeot Region of Nunavut. The current holder of the contract, Aviation, has appealed to the Nunavummi Nangminiqaqtunik Ikajuuti(Nunavummi Nangminiqaqtunik Ikajuuti) and a decision is expected by 11 October 2011.(Adlair fights GN decision on Kitikmeot medevac contract 6 September 2011)(Facing an uncertain future, Adlair puts up brave front 3 October 2011) Destinations Air Tindi operates services (subject to traffic demand) to the following domestic scheduled destinations (as of November 2010):(Flight Schedule)* Simpson (Simpson Airport)* Gamti (Lakes Airport)* Lutselke (Airport)* Wekweeti (Airport)* What (Airport)* Yellowknife (Airport) Fleet As of November 2010, Air Tindi had the following aircraft registered with Canada and listed with Air Tindi:((Transport Canada listing of aircraft owned by Air Tindi (enter Air Tindi in the box titled Owner Name))Accidents and incidentsOn 4 October 2011, a Tindi owned Cessna Caravan en-route from Yellowknife to Lutselke crashed about  west of the community. There were, including the pilot, four people on the aircraft and two were reported killed. The condition of the two survivors was not disclosed but they had been sent to Stanton Territorial Hospital in Yellowknife.(N.W.T. plane crash kills 2 people)(Two dead in small plane crash in Northwest Territories, two others survive)ReferencesExternal links*Air TindiTindiTindi
1385829
Urpeth
Urpeth is a village in Durham, in England. It is situated a short distance from Ouston and Beamish.Urpeth started its life as a coal mining area with multiple seams of coal being mined from various locations around the current housing estate. Urpeth Colliery was owned by the Birtley Iron Company and during its heyday employed 300 men and boys.   The on site coke ovens produced up to 470 tons of coke each day. Geographically Urpeth is situated to the west of Ouston and is surrounded by fields and rolling hills. Standing in Urpeths only play park , one cannot see Ouston as there is a hill which blocks the view. This hill was formed from the coal spoils from both the Ouston and Urpeth collierys. The hill provides local children with an excellent area for sledging during winter and dog walkers throughout the year. There are currently two main businesses ran within Urpeth which is the Spar Newsagents and The Brooms pub.Urpeth was once host to a controversial landfill site to the south west of its main location. The site was used for the disposal of low level radioactive waste along with 3 other sites at Kibblesworth, Ryton and Cowpen Bewleyhttp://hansard.millbanksystems.com/written_answers/1994/dec/01/nuclear-waste. However since the late 90s the site was closed and a methane burner sits on the site.pl:Urpeth
1388084
Ken_Dillen
Kenneth George Dillen (born April 29, 1938) is a Canadian politician and political activist. He was a member of the Assembly of Manitoba from 1973 to 1977, serving as a member of the democratic New Democratic Party.(Manitoba Legislature biographies) His political views later shifted to the right, and he is currently seeking re-election to the Manitoba legislature as a candidate of the Liberal Party.(Election 2011 candidates: Thompson: Ken Dillen, Manitoba Liberal Party, accessed 12 September 2011.)Early life and careerDillen was born at the Serpent River Indian Reserve in Cutler, Ontario, and was educated in Ontario schools and at the Canadian Army Apprentice Training School in Camp Borden. He trained as an ironworker and became president of one of the largest industrial unions in Manitoba after moving to that province. He was also a member of the Mtis Federation in the 1970s.LegislatorHe was elected to the Manitoba legislature in the 1973 provincial election, narrowly defeating Progressive Conservative candidate Anna Derby in the northern riding of Thompson. He was the provinces first of the Legislative Assembly of indigenous background in several years.The New Democratic Party won a government in this election under Schreyers leadership. Dillen entered the legislature as a government backbencher, serving as Schreyers legislative assistant. He lost to Progressive Conservative candidate MacMaster by 916 votes in the 1977 provincial election.Dillen later moved to Saskatchewan and held several positions, including field staff coordinator for the Key Lake Board of Inquiry, overseeing uranium mining operations. He was also a member of the Association on Native Employment, the Inland Fishermans Association and the Taxpayers Federation.Notwithstanding his background in the labour movement and New Democratic Party, Dillen is now a supporter of the right-to-work movement and an opponent of shop unionization. In late 2004, he referred to the Saskatchewan New Democratic Party as communistic for its efforts to unionize part-time workers. He has also dismissed the right-wing Party as nothing more than disaffected socialists and has referenced Friedmans and Freedom as representative of his own beliefs. Dillen also opposes gun control, the Wheat Board and the Accord, and has spoken out against efforts by the Ontario government to ban bulls.In the late 2000s, he was secretary of the Centre Policy Institute. He has returned to Manitoba after spending a number of years in Saskatchewan, and is seeking re-election as a Liberal for the Thompson electoral division.Electoral recordReferences
1390451
Almenara,_Minas_Gerais
thumb|right|250px|Location of AlmenaraAlmenara is a city in the northeast of the state of Gerais.  Situated on the River it is the largest town in that river valley.  Its 2007 population was estimated at 36,907 and the municipal area was 2,301 km.It was founded on 13 January 1938.  In 1981 the city was made the seat of the Catholic Diocese of Almenara.  The elevation is 248 meters.  The postal code is 39900-000.  The distance to the state capital, Horizonte, is 744 kilometers.  Almenara is also the center of a statistical microregion of the same name.  Municipalities belonging to this microregion are:  Bandeira, Divispolis, Felisburgo,  Jacinto, Jequitinhonha, Joama, Jordnia, Verde, Formoso, Palmpolis, do Prado, Rubim, da Divisa, Maria do Salto, and Antnio do Jacinto. (Citybrazil)The main economic activity is cattle raising with over 89,000 head of cattle counted in 2006.  Agriculture is important with the main crops being coffee, coconuts, banana, corn, and sugarcane.  There were 4 banking agencies in 2006.  There were 2 private hospitals with 180 beds (2005).  In the rural area there were 983 farms in 2006.  More than 3,000 people depended on agriculture for a living.  Only 33 farms had tractors, which was a ratio of one tractor for 30 farms.(IBGE) The river beach of Almenara was once considered one of the most beautiful in the country.  Today, with mining in the tributaries of the Jequitinhonha its waters are polluted with mercury and oil.  Its clean sands have become dark and dirty.  The hill called Morro do Cruzeiro is used for hang gliding.  There is also an arched bridge with a span of 300 meters crossing the river.  When the river is full some people dive off the bridge. (City government site)*Municipal Development Index: .668 (2000)*State ranking: 680 out of 853 municipalities as of 2000*National ranking: 3,496 out of 5,138 municipalities as of 2000(Frigoletto)*Degree of urbanization: 78.48% (2000)--the rate for Minas Gerais was 82.0%*Illiteracy rate: 30.66% (15 years old or older) The rate for Minas Gerais was 11.96%; the rate for Brazil was 13.63%*Urban area covered by sewage system: 80.80%--the rate for Minas Gerais was 81.39%*Health centers and hospitals: 13 health centers and 02 hospitals with 172 beds(Data on Health and Education) References(See also* List of municipalities in Minas Geraiseo:Almenara(Minas Gerais)bpy:(Brasile)(Minas Gerais)no:Almenarapl:Almenarapt:Almenararo:Almenararu:vo:AlmenaraMinas Gerais
1392622
Cornforth
Cornforth is a village in Durham, England. It is situated a short distance to the north-east of Ferryhill.Before the middle part of the Victorian era, when coal mining was at its height in County Durham, Cornforth was in the parish of Bishop Middleham.Thomas Hutchinson (bap. 1698, d. 1769) was a classical scholar, born in Cornforth and baptised there on 17 May 1698.thumb|left|Village green and church at CornforthReferences* External links * West Cornforth Village Website* Cornforth Colliery entry on Durham Mining Museum* Cornforth Quarry entry on Durham Mining Museumnl:Cornforthpl:Cornforth
1393979
Ann_Turnbull
Ann Turnbull (born 1943) is a British writer of fiction for children and young adults. Her work includes books as well as novels. Many of her novels are set in Shropshire, the English county where she lives. She was born in Hertford, England.Turnbulls best known novels are Summer, set in a Shropshire mining town during the Depression of the 1930s which is about a young girl named Mary Dyer, and Shame, No Fear, a novel for young adults that depicts the persecution of Quakers during the 1660s, and is set in both Shropshire and London. Pigeon Summer was nominated for the Smarties Book Prize and No Shame, No Fear was nominated for both the Book Award and the Whitbread Book Award.External links*Official site
1395278
South_Hetton
South Hetton is a former mining village in Durham, in England. It is situated about six miles to the east of Durham and nine miles to the south of Sunderland.HistorySouth Hetton CollieryThe history of South Hetton is closely related to South Hetton Colliery. The South Hetton Coal Co., owned by Colonel Thomas Bradyll, first sank shafts in 1831. Large scale production began two years later and corresponded with a large increase in population. Employment peaked in the 1930s when over 1400 people worked at the colliery. However, activity declined in the latter half of the twentieth century with the colliery ceasing operations in 1982.  Angus Sibbet MurderThe village came to the attention of the nation in January 1967 when the body of fruit machine magnate employee Angus Sibbett, was found murdered in his Jaguar car under Pesspool Bridge. Dennis Stafford and Michael Luvaglio were later convicted of the crime, although there have been ongoing campaigns to clear both names. All appeals (including the House of Lords) failed due to a proven but unexplained collision between the cars of Sibbett and Stafford & Luvaglio, although Stafford and Luvaglio at their trial denied seeing or meeting up with Sibbett during the vital hours surrounding the actual murder  The killing  inspired the 1970s gangster film Carter starring Caine.SportsHetton Cricket Club currently play in the Durham Senior League and have a strong link within the community with the goal of developing sport in the area.External linksHettonHetton
1398946
Murton,_County_Durham
Murton is a village in Durham, England. Lying six miles (9.6 km) east of the city of Durham and seven miles (11.25 km) south of Sunderland, it has a population of 7,339.()Originally a rural agricultural hamlet called Morton,() the discovery of coal beneath its fields in the 19th century transformed it into an industrial community.() Morton became known as Murton Colliery or Murton-in-the-Whins() following the sinking of the pit in 1838 by South Hetton Coal Company,() and the village was a productive coal mining community for over a century. The pit employed over 1000 men at its peak and featured in a Post article showing the vesting of the mine at nationalisation in 1947.()The village also had the South East Durham Cooperative Bakery and a Northern Bus Company garage as added sources of jobs. In 1955 a by product works for coal was established for the production mainly of coke. The mine and other employment opportunities closed in the 1990s along with many other Durham mines and now the old spoil heaps are host to a retail outlet development Park, bringing much needed new employment.HistoryThe discovery of coal beneath the fields of East Durham during the 19th century, transformed the tiny hamlet of Morton into the thriving township of Murton.Decades later, however, the decision to close Murtons successful colliery almost, but not quite, succeeded in turning the close-knit community into a ghost town. Millions of pounds in Government and private investment is now being pumped into Murton, changing the face of the former village on an almost daily basis.Fewer than 100 people lived in the village of Murton before 1830 but, following the sinking of the mine in 1838, the population grew to 1,387 by 1851. Miners flocked to Murton from across Durham and Northumberland in the early years, with people later uprooting from Devon, Cornwall and Ireland too. Many of the road and place names reflected the original roots of these pitmen, like the Cornwall estate, and dozens of different accents could be heard in the streets.Work on the colliery  one of the pioneering mines of the East Durham coalfield, began on February 19, 1838, but it was five years before the first coals were drawn. Problems with pockets of shifting sand and the depth of the magnesium limestone overlying the coal delayed the work, making the project hugely expensive. Late shifts were even introduced for the first time, so that excavation could be carried out around the clock to finish the three-shafted pit as quickly as possible.Just five years after the colliery opened, however, there was an explosion on August 15, 1848, near the Polka East shaft, which killed 14 miners. The tragedy left villagers shaken, but the village itself continued to flourish. Indeed, by 1856 Murton was almost unrecognisable from the hamlet it had once been. Scores of terraced houses had been built to house the miners and the village now boasted three pubs, a new school, plus gas and coke works. As prospective miners continued to flood in, so the number of tradesmen grew, with Murton Colliery Co-operative Society helping to serve the village by 1890.As the village flourished, so too did the colliery. It was modernised after War I and, in 1922, a Koepe friction winding engine was installed in the West Pit. New pithead baths followed in 1939, described as being of especially pleasant design, and Murtons swimming pool was opened in 1961.But, despite high productivity and a loyal workforce, the decision was taken to close the pit in 1991. Campaigners fought against the plans, but failed to stop them. The Koepe winding engine was transferred to the Railway following the controversial closure and, in 1994, the collierys winding tower was demolished. Murtons once-thriving pit community was now no more.Timelineright|thumb|Murton a century ago.right|thumb|Murton Colliery in its heyday.right|thumb|Murton in by-gone days.right|thumb|Old Murton.1830: Population 691838: Work on pit starts1843: First coals drawn1851: Population 1,3951889: Electricity first used in pit1892: Murton toll gates removed1902: Three putters killed in pit, two aged 14, one aged 181906: Colliery draws 4,131 tons of coal in one day1910: Miners strike over Eight Hours Bill1913: Foundation stone laid for first council house1914: First telephone for Murton, based in post office1922: Cenotaph unveiled1923: Coal drawn from West Pit for first time1927: Bus service to Sunderland introduced by Northern buses1930: First talking pictures at Murton Empire1931: Flush toilets put in colliery houses1935: Miners started carrying electric lamps1939: Pit head baths opened1950: X-ray van visited Murton for the first time1953: The first paid annual holiday leave of two weeks was introduced1957: A new library was opened in Barnes Road1958: Murton Brickworks closed1961: Murtons swimming pool was opened1982: First memorial service held to commemorate fatalities at Murton pit1990: Miners fought to keep the pit open1991: Murton Colliery was closed1994: Pit winding tower demolished, despite being listedGeographyClimateLike the rest of the Kingdom, Murton has a temperate climate. At ( the average annual rainfall is lower than the national average of .(UK 1971-2000 averages, Office. Retrieved on 2007-08-20.) Equally there are only around 121.3 days( where more than  of rain falls compared with a national average of 154.4 days.( The area sees on average 1374.6 hours of sunshine per year,( compared with a national average of 1125.0 hours.( There is frost on 52 days( compared with a national average of 55.6 days.( Average daily maximum and minimum temperatures are  and ( compared with a national averages of  and  respectively.(The table below gives the average temperature and rainfall figures taken between 1971 and 2000 at the Met Office weather station in Durham:Old village streets and their nicknamesOwen Street: Sandgate RarLancaster Street: Double RarGreen Street: Smokey RarRailway Street: Red Tiled RarVilliers Street: Wood RarDurham Place: Sinkers RarDalton Terrace: Pot Pie RarSouth Street: Plantation RarEast Street: Cinder Burners RarShipperdon Street: Ower the FieldMurton Street: Cross RarOld Pilgrim Street: Boiler RarNew Pilgrim Street: Low RarPilgrim Street: High RarModel Street: Wagon RarEconomyThis is a chart of trend of regional gross value added of County Durham at current basic prices published (pp. 240-253) by Office for National Statistics with figures in millions of British Pounds Sterling.Notable inhabitants*Williamson - Professional footballer*Liddell - Professional footballer and football club manager*Hall DCM, MM - World War One soldier*Shaw (footballer born 1928) - Professional footballer*Cummings (politician) - Former miner, was MP for Easington until 2010*Ann Cotton - First British female serial killer*Murphy (VC) - Won the Victoria Cross*Kitson - Professional footballer*McNally - Won the Victoria Cross in World War One*Dave Harper - Drummer for pop group Frankie & The HeartstringsSee also* Durham* Seaham* Miners Gala* Tyne and Wear* Dawdon* EasingtonReferencesExternal links* Old photos of Murton Colliery, in a slide show form, at: YouTube slideshow video featuring the pits of old County Durham - including Murton: http://uk.youtube.com/watch?v3uGJhVayK4A* News stories about Murton: Echo. http://www.sunderlandecho.com* A thousand old photos of Seaham and Murton: http://www.east-durham.co.uk(Durham)(Durham)
1400913
Pioneer_Column
thumb|300px|right|Officers of the Pioneer Corps, c1890.The Pioneer Column was a force raised by Rhodes and his South Africa Company in 1890 and used in his efforts to annex the territory of Mashonaland, later part of Rhodesia (now Zimbabwe). Rhodes was anxious to secure Matabeleland and Mashonaland before the Germans, Portuguese or Boers did. His first step was to persuade the Matabele King Lobengula, in 1888, to sign a treaty giving him rights to mining and administration (but not settlement as such) in the area of Mashonaland which was ruled by the King by use of coercion and murderous raids involved tribute-taking and abduction of young men and women.(Path of Blood, Becker, P., Pengiuin Books, London,(1979)) Using this Concession (so called because Rhodess business partner, Charles Rudd, was instrumental in securing the signature) between Rhodes British South Africa Company (allegedly on behalf of Queen Victoria though without any official knowledge or authority) and Lobengula, he then sought and obtained a charter from the British government allowing him to act, essentially although in a limited way, with the governments consent. The next step was to occupy the territory. Column Assembly Rhodess military advisers estimated that it would take 2,500 men and about one million pounds to win the war that would, they thought, inevitably result when Lobengula realised that Rhodes meant not only to mine but also to occupy his land. Frank Johnson, a 23-year-old adventurer, however, undertook to deliver the territory in nine months with a mere 250 men for 87,500. Selous, a hunter with close knowledge of Mashonaland, agreed to join the effort as guide. Johnson published recruitment notices in Kimberley offering each volunteer  of land and 15 mining claims (aggregating about 21 acres). On the advice of Rhodes, Johnson selected for his column, from thousands of applicants, mostly the sons of rich families, so that if they were, indeed, imperilled by Lobengula their families would be more likely to enlist British government support for their rescue. Johnsons column eventually consisted of 180 civilian colonists, 62 wagons and 200 volunteers (who ultimately formed the nucleus of what became the British South African Police). A further party of 110 men, 16 wagons, 250 cattle and 130 spare horses later attached itself to the column.(Bridger, P., House, M., and others, 1973. Encyclopaedia Rhodesia, College Press, Salisbury, Rhodesia) The troopers were equipped with Martini-Henry rifles, revolvers, seven-pound field guns and Maxim machine guns, as well as an electric searchlight (which they later used to good effect to intimidate Matabele warriors shadowing the column). Occupation The route began at Macloutsie in Bechuanaland on 28 June 1890. On July 11, it crossed the river Tuli into Matabeland. It proceeded north-east  and then north over a distance of about 650 km intending to terminate at an open area explored by Selous a few years earlier that he called Mount Hampden. However, the column halted about 15 km before that at a naturally flat and marshy meadow bounded by a steep rocky hill; (todays Harare Kopje) on 12 September. The British union flag was hoisted on the following day, September 13 (later celebrated as a Rhodesian public holiday). Three towns were founded; the first in early August at the head of a gentle route that led up from the low altitude area known as the Lowveld (named Providential Pass), called Fort Victoria (renamed Masvingo in 1982); the second at Fort Charter on a plateau halfway to the terminus of the column at the originally named Fort Salisbury.(Sunshine and Storm in Rhodesia, FC Selous, Rhodesiana Reprint Library, Salisbury, 1969)The Pioneer Corps was officially disbanded on 1 October 1890 and each member was granted land on which to farm. Consequences The effects of the Pioneer Column were immense. With one act the destiny of the territory was changed forever. Mashonaland and Matabeleland ceased to be the poorly developed backwaters they had slipped into since the subsidence of the Mwenemutapa state about 500 years earlier and were irreversibly propelled into alignment with the world of the capitalist Christian West. A new elite snatched control from the Iron Age monarchy which had formerly held sway and retained power through demonstration of overwhelming technological superiority along with a towering confidence in its achievements. A new moral order was also imposed that has dramatically altered the culture and beliefs of the indigenous people.(The Cambridge History of Africa: From 1870 to 1905 v. 6 (The Cambridge History of Africa) CUP, 1985) Campaign Medal In 1927, the government of Rhodesia issued a new South Africa Company Medal to commemorate the earlier 1890 Pioneer Column. This medal was identical to the prior British South Africa Company Medals issued for the Matabele War and Matabele War, except that it was struck without any campaign details on the reverse.() References (* Samkange, Stanlake, On Trial for My Country, Heinemann African Writers Series 1966, for an African perspective.* Hill, Geoff, The Battle for Zimbabwe, Zebra Press, Cape Town, 2003.* Hensman, Howard, History of Rhodesia, Wm Blackwood & Sons, Edinburgh & London, 1890, for a contemporary and jingoistic British view. See also * Nyakasikana* Patrol* Members of the Pioneer Column
1404360
Rachel,_Nevada
Rachel is an unincorporated portion of County, Nevada.  As the closest habitation to the Air Force Range and 51, Rachel enjoys a modest celebrity, particularly among aviation enthusiasts and UFO hunters.The town lies approximately three hours drive north of Las Vegas along Nevada Highway 375 (the Extraterrestrial Highway), which has an unofficial speed limit of Warp 7. The tiny town receives a modest number of visitors interested in the U.S. governments secret doings, to whom a small tourist shop, 3-room motel, and an alien-themed restaurant and bar, the ALeInn are available.Several unpaved roads near Rachel lead from Highway 375 across the terrain to the boundary of Area 51 http://www.rachel-nevada.com/tikaboo_valley_map.html.Rachels population generally hovers around 80 inhabitants, some involved in ranching.  The town was originally established as a tungsten mining town, but the mines pulled out circa 1988.  Most of the year-round inhabitants live in homes. Recent events In 2006 KFC created a giant company logo on the ground at the north edge of Rachel and claimed it to be the first logo visible from space.  It marked the official debut of a massive global re-image campaign that will contemporize 14,000-plus KFC restaurants in over 80 countries over the next few years.() Constructed in early November, it took six days on site to assemble its 65,000 colored tiles on  of flat desert terrain. The logo also had a message on the tie area of the logo that featured an impostor colonel holding a sign over his head, reading Finger Lickin Good. Although the logo was removed in mid-2007, it is still visible on Google Earth.The town was featured in an episode of Therouxs Weird Weekends which covered the UFO subculture. Rachel was mentioned in a two-part episode of X-Files entitled Dreamland, in which a secret agent aware of the hidden backstory of the show, played by McKean, resided in the town. It is also a key place in the person shooter style game titled Area 51.The producers of the movie Independence Day gave the town a capsule, which is installed near the inn.In 2001, the Area 51 Research Center, one of two local businesses catering to Area 51 tourists, closed its doors for good. In late 2006, the local gas station and convenience store closed, along with the trailer park. Since then, the Little ALeInn is the only remaining local business providing services to tourists. There is the occasional rumor of the mine re-opening or a new business opening in the area, but none of these plans have materialized so far. Education The children are bussed to Nevada for school.ReferencesExternal links* Official website* Rachel Baptist Church* Lincoln County Chamber of Commerce* KFC logo in Rachel, as seen from space* Map of roads to Areal 51(Nevada)(Nevada)(Nevada)(Nevada)Nevadapl:Rachel(Nevada)sv:Rachel
1407378
College_of_Engineering_and_Technology,_Bhubaneswar
website         http://www.cet.edu.inThe College of Engineering and Technology, Bhubaneswar, (CETB), is a college of engineering in India. Overview Established as College of Engineering and Technology of Orissa University of Agriculture and Technology (OUAT) in 1981, CET Bhubaneswar is now a constituent college of Biju Patnaik University Of Technology (BPUT), Orissa.  The campus covers . The old campus is still functioning, as the architecture department.BPUT Academic structure The college provides B.Tech. degree in ten disciplines of engineering: namely Civil, Mechanical, Biotechnology, Electrical, Computer Science, Information Technology, Instrumentation and Electronics, Textile, Fashion and a 5-year B.Arch. degree.  It  offers a 3-year MCA, a 2-year M.Tech. course in Structural Engineering, Industrial Engineering and Management, Computer Science and Engineering and Information Technology and a 3-year B.Tech degree for Diploma Holders as lateral entries.Each academic year consists of two semesters and a summer term.  The education system is organised around a credit system, which ensures continuous evaluation of a students performance and provides flexibility to choose courses to suit the students ability or convenience. Each course is assigned credits depending upon the class contact hours.Events* XTASY is the colleges cultural extravaganza, held annually in January.* PERCEPTIONS is the annual technical meet.* Cetadel is the literary societies event, providing events in quizzing, writing, jamming, and debating. Cetadel is also responsible for the publication of the annual college magazine The Engineering Herald.Cetadel units are:* Blahsphemy from blasphemy and blah, a nonsense word (debates, JAMs, mock turncoats, extempores, GDs, and open houses)* TimbuQtu from Timbuktu and Q, symbolizing a question (quizzing, dumb charades, antakshari)* Adinfinitum from infinitum (jingle making, advertisement making, poster making, anti-publicity, product packaging)* WordsWorth from poet Wordsworths name and a combination of the words words and worth (writing, review, spin the yarn, storytelling)The college also organizes the Engineers Cup Inter-college cricket tournament in DecemberJanuary, and an annual athletics meet.It has its own band Irish Chants which performs across the state. Departments Information TechnologyThe Department of Information Technology was established in 2001. The curriculum of B.Tech (Information Technology) is the most updated to meet the global standard.The department runs B.Tech (Technology) courses. Bio-informatics, Microelectronics, VLSI design, J2EE, Data Mining and Data warehousing are offered as electives. The guidance too comes from a team of dedicated and highly qualified faculty members.The students have access to the computer lab which has a state of art softwareTo develop the communication skills of students, the department conducts seminars and group discussions which are frequently attended by experts from industries.  Head of the Department :  Dr. Jibitesh Mishra Lecturers:*  D P. Mishra  *  Ms. Jayshree Dev*  Ms. S. Swetapadma  *  Ms. S.Sahoo*  S. Das*  Sanjit Kumar Dash *  Ms. Ranjita Mishra Architecture The department has started a Master of Architecture course. Students work in the fields of Design, Architecture, Planning, and Architectural Conservation Facilities include scanners, copiers, a photography laboratory, design tools, software like R14 and 3D Home, and a collection of books and journals. Biotechnology The Department of Biotechnology was initiated for the 2007 batch of OJEE aspirants. The intake capacity is 30 per year, excluding the three seats for diploma students. It has a biochemistry lab, with equipment including flow machines and an electrophoresis apparatus.From 2008 the course structure was modified to include nanobiotechnology. In 2009, the Center for Nanobiotechnology was opened.By now, the department has fully equipped and functional microbiology, biochemistry, biology and plant tissue culture laboratories. A bioinformatics lab is being set up.The department hosts research projects granted by reputed bodies. At present, one research project from UGC-DAE CSR, Kolkata, on Bioremeditation of hexavalent chromium using stress tolerant microbes isolated from chromite mine environments of Orissa, is being implemented by Dr. Thatoi, HOD and another project on Assessment of nutritional and medicinal potential of Indigenous mushrooms Similipal Bioresphere Reserve, Orissa  has been sanctioned by Dept. Of Science and Technology, Govt. of Orissa to HOD, Dr. Thatoi.* Head of Department - Dr. H. N. Thatoi* Reader - Dr. H.N. Thatoi - Micro Biology and Molecular Biology* Lecturer - Dr. M.R. Swain - Industrial Microbiology* Mr. S. K. Das - Immunology, Engineering* Dr. S. Dash - Biochemistry, Immunology* S.C. Patnaik - Biochemistry, Bioinformatics* Mr. S.S Behera - Biochemistry, Bio Process Engineering Computer Science and Engineering The CSE branch started in 2001. The first batch of B.Tech. in Science & Engineering passed in 2005 under OUAT. From 2007 the first batch of B.Tech. CSE passed under BPUT. In 2007 the Medal among all the branches and among all the colleges of BPUT was from this branch by Ms. Chitra Patro who also joined IIM, Bangalore in 2007-08 Academic session.  It is headed by Professor (Dr.) Jibitesh Mishra. It has an intake of 60. There is 100% campus placement. The Department develops software, conducts short term courses, organises technical seminars, and projects, SC/ST training programs, and Infosys Campus Connect programmes. The students of the department join IIMs such as Ahmedabad, Bengaluru, Kolkata, Indore, and Shillong, and IITs such as Mumbai, IISC, and NIT.The departments research areas are networks, computing, and recognition.Department of Computer Science and EngineeringHead of Department: Dr. Jibitesh MishraMechanical EngineeringThe Department of Engineering specializes in Machine Design and Analysis, Production and Engineering, Machine Dynamics, Engineering, Element Analysis methods, Industrial Engineering and Management, Automobile Engineering, etc.The mechanical workshop has lathes (HMT, NC and CNC), machines (HMT), machines (BATLIBOI), shapers and grinders. The welding shop has welding, welding and tungsten arc welding equipment. The Material Testing Laboratory has UTM (Testing Machine) Instron, CO and HC Gas Analyzer, Vibration Equipment, and Vickers Testing Machines. Hardware for the CAD/CAM lab has HP workstations, Pentium III based printers and PCs. Software for designing and programming is also available, including NISA by EMRC, ANSYS, AutoCAD R-14, C++, and VB.Department of Mechanical EngineeringHead of Department - Dr. P.K. Satpathy* Dr. R .K. Dash* Ms. Sarmistha Parija* A. Mohanty* Dr. S. K. Pradhan* R K Mallik* S. Maharana* P.K.Parida* S. S. SahooElectrical EngineeringThe Department of Electrical Engineering has an Machine Lab, Voltage Lab, Relay Lab, Control Lab and a Microprocessor Lab. The Control lab apparata include displacement and acceleration measurement, motor speed control, pH controller and pH measurement, motor speed controller, VI and IV converters, flow and pressure control, and temperature and level control.Department of Electrical Engineering* HOD Dr. D.P. Bagarty - Power Systems, electronics and Drives* Dr.P.K.Satpathy - Professor - M.Tech. (IIT, Delhi), Ph.D. (IIT, Kharagpur)- Power Systems* Dr.R.K.Jena - Microprocessors, Soft computing* Sri. Abhimanyu Mohapatra - Lecturer* Dr.M.Viswavandhya - system (Linear and Nonlinear)* Mr.A.K.Dhal - theory, machines* Mr.S.Panda - Basic Electrical Science, Network* Mrs S.Patnaik - Network, Drives* Ms M.Behera - Network, Basic Electrical ScienceFashion TechnologyThe curriculum includes seminars, workshops, technology demonstrations, fairs, guest lectures and projects. Students also have the opportunity to work with faculty on consultants projects, thereby gaining valuable experience.Compulsory internship for 45 days has been incorporated after 6th semester examination as a part of curriculum.Textile TechnologyThe Department of Textile Engineering undergraduate programme in Textile Engineering teaches all facets of textile manufacturing including Yarn manufacturing, Fabric Manufacturing (Woven and Knitted), Garment manufacturing, Textile Chemical Processing, Textile testing, assurance, Mill management and Computer applications. To expose the students to the industrial environment, four weeks of industrial training are compulsory. Project work with a thesis in the final year is mandatory.Earlier the department was known as ITT (Institute of Textile Technology), located at Cuttack.Department of Textile Technology* K. N. Das - HOD* B. P. Dash - Reader* A. K. Dash - Reader* G. Bhatacharya - lecturer* Indramani Kandi-lecturer Alumni Alumni of the College of Engineering and Technology, BhubaneshwarPlacementThe placement record of CET is the best in the state and the students get placed in companies such as Infosys, TCS, Wipro, MindTree, Computer Services, Mahindra, Atos, Hexaware, IBM, Accenture, Cognizant, PCS, HCL, Polaris, Industries, AB Nuvo and Winsome Yarns.Many students opt for higher studies and get into foreign universities for pursuing their MS and MBA career. Students also go to IITs for M.Tech and IIMs, XLRI, XIMB, IIFT, IMT, IITs and NIFT for MBA. External links * Official website* Official website of Irish Chants2012 placement yet - Tata sreel , Delloite, Maruti Suzuki , TCS 
1411790
German_cruiser_Leipzig
{|Ship notes|}The German cruiser Leipzig was the ship of her class (Nrnberg was her improved sister ship). She was the fourth German warship to carry the name of the city of Leipzig.HistoryShe was built at Wilhelmshaven and launched on 18 October 1929. During the Civil War Leipzig conducted several patrols as part of the international naval blockade. On 11-12 December 1939, she and sister-ship Nurnberg provided cover for German destroyers mining the approaches to the River, and while returning on 13 December 1939 she (and Nurnberg) were torpedoed by the Navy submarine Salmon and severely damaged. Two destroyed boiler rooms were restored as living quarters only and Leipzig was converted into a training ship with a reduced maximum speed of 24 knots.  She was recommissioned after repairs on 1 December 1940.  When Germany attacked the Soviet Union in June 1941 (Operation Barbarossa), the cruiser took part in the shelling of the islands Saaremaa and Hiiumaa in the Sea, before returning to her duties as a training vessel.  She remained in the Baltic Sea and on 15 October 1944 was accidentally rammed amidships by the cruiser Prinz Eugen in heavy fog.  Heavily damaged (she had been sliced right thru to her keel-plate) and effectively immobilised, she recieved structural repairs needed to keep her hull from breaking apart and alow her to float.  For the remainder of the war she continued to serve as a training, barracks and flak ship. In March 1945 she shelled advancing Soviet army units near Gdynia, but was then towed to Aabenraa, Denmark at the end of March.At the end of War II Leipzig was surrendered to British forces, moved to Wilhelmshaven and surveyed to determine if repairs to her hull and machinery could be made to make her sea-worthy, but was not repaired and scuttled in the Sea with a cargo of gas munitions on 16 December 1946.thumb|300px|Leipzig recognition schemethumb|250px|Hull cross-section showing armour in redSee alsoReferences* Grner, Erich; Jung, Dieter; & Maass, Martin (1990). German Warships 1815-1945: Volume One (1st English ed.). London: Conway  Maritime Press. ISBN 0-85177-533-0.External links* German Naval History -  Light Cruiser Leipzig* Maritimequest Leipzig photo gallery(19291946)(1928)(incrociatore)(knnycirkl)(3)(1929 - 1946)(1931)(1929)(1929)(tu tun dng c)
1414211
Hanna,_Alberta
footnotes                Hanna () is a town in east-Alberta, Canada.The towns main industries are agriculture, oil production, tourism, and mining. It is the centre of a large trading area called Grass County and is the home of approximately 200 businesses. The mayor of the town is currently Mark Nikota.( Demographics In 2006, Hanna had a population of 2,847 living in 1,295 dwellings, a 4.7% decrease from 2001. The town has a land area of  and a density of .() Notable residents Hanna has had a variety of famous residents, including:*McClellan, Deputy Premier and Minister of Finance;*McDonald, professional hockey player and NHL Hall of Famer.*members of the rock band Nickelback;*Nill, professional hockey player; and*Willison, author and radio personality. See also *of communities in Alberta*of towns in Alberta References  External links *Town of Hanna (official website)(Alberta)Alberta(Canada)(Kanada)(Alberta)(Alberta)
1417009
Allanridge
footnotes               Allanridge is a gold mining town in the District Municipality of the State province in Africa. It is the main centre of the Lorraine Gold Mining Company and is dominated by the tall headgear and complex reduction works that processes thousands of tons of gold-bearing ore every month.Allanridge established as a settlement in 1947 and was named after Allan Roberts whose boreholes proximity to the gold bearing reef was the precursor to the mining in the area. The town layout was designed by town planner William Backhouse, who also planned Welkom.  It became a municipality on 21 December 1956 but this changed on the 5 December 2000 when it was incorporated into the Local Municipality with the city of Welkom and the towns of Hennenman, Odendaalsrus, Ventersburg and Virginia.Currently ,The town has produced one of the best personalities in its location,among those who dedicated hardworking in that city to bring the academic atmosphere of the city back,we can mention, ,Pheello Moses,a Chemistry,student in the currently,university of the free state,The Nyakallong location is 3 km outside of Allanridge. It was established during the apartheid era to house the mine workers of the Loraine Gold Mining Company.af:Allanridgenl:Allanridgepl:Allanridgero:Allanridge
1420407
Darwins_Black_Box
Darwins Black Box: The Biochemical Challenge to Evolution (1996, first edition; 2006, second edition) is a book written by Michael J. Behe and published by Free Press in which he presents his notion of complexity and claims that its presence in many biochemical systems indicates therefore that they must be the result of design rather than evolutionary processes. In 1993, Behe had written a chapter on clotting in Pandas and People, presenting essentially the same arguments but without the name irreducible complexity,() which he later presented in very similar terms in a chapter in Darwins Black Box. Behe later agreed that he had written both and agreed to the similarities when he defended intelligent design at the v. Dover Area School District trial.()()The book has been a source of controversy, as the community at large considers many criticisms of evolution or proponents of intelligent design to be religious, creationism, and pseudoscience. Common criticisms were that Behes ideas are not falsifiable, that his definition of an irreducibly complex system is ambiguous, and that he ignores previous work in evolution. Though influential within the design movement for several years, the book has lost some of its currency as more and more examples given by Behe as evidence of irreducible complexity have been shown to be explicable by known evolutionary mechanisms, something Behe conceded under cross examination while testifying as an expert witness on behalf of the defendants in Kitzmiller v. Dover Area School District. Overview The box in the title refers to the conceptual tool in which, for one reason or another, the internal workings of a device are taken for granted, so that its function may be discussed.Behe begins by reminding the general reader of shifts in the history of science, in which the foundations and assumptions of theories are examined, sometimes resulting in the rejection of an entire theory.  Behe suggests that such a paradigm shift in biology (and particularly in evolution) is imminent due to recent discoveries (circa 1996) in biochemistry. Behe acknowledges acceptance of the Theory of Evolution by the great majority of scientists, and states that most (though not all) do so based on authority.Behe states that elucidations of the evolutionary history of various biological features typically assume the existence of certain abilities as their starting point, such as Darwins example of a cluster of light-sensitive spots evolving into an eye via a series of intermediate steps. He then points out that Darwin dismissed the need to explain the origin of the simple light-sensitive spot, summarizes the modern understanding of the biochemistry of vision and claims that many other evolutionary explanations face a similar challenge.Behe next introduces and defines the concept of complexity as a system with a series of parts in which the removal of any part causes the entire system to cease functioning, offering a springloaded-bar mousetrap as a familiar example.  In the following chapters, Behe discusses the apparent irreducible complexity of several biological systems, including the cilium, the bacterial flagellum, blood clotting, the system and intracellular gated and vesicular transport.  Behe claims the underlying complexity and biochemical mechanisms of the systems are vastly under-appreciated, and identifies other, similar systems.Behe identifies one of the primary counter-arguments of irreducible complexity, gradual adaptationthat certain systems may have been co-opted from an original, unrelated role to assume a new function as an irreducibly complex system.  He counter-argues that though it is impossible to consider all possible roles for any component, it is extremely implausible that components can fortuitously change function within a complex system and that the focus of the theory changes from making to modifying components and recounts unsuccessful attempts to discover evolutionary pathways for complex systems within journals.  Behe states that though he did identify assertions that evolution had occurred, he found none that had been supported by experiment or calculation, and concludes the book by offering design as a solution to irreducible complexity. Reception Darwins Black Box was not well received by the community, which overwhelmingly rejected Behes premises and arguments.  Kenneth Miller described Behes argument as an updated version of the argument from design with reference to biochemistry (which was echoed by other reviewers()()), and also cites areas in biochemistry and the fossil record which demonstrate currently irreducibly complex systems evolving.  Miller also describes Behes theory as unfalsifiable, arguing that it arbitrarily ignores evidence that shows the evolution of a biochemical system.()  On his blog, Myers described it as ...an example of pseudoscientific dreck that has been enormously influential.()  In a review for Nature, Coyne described the book hailing from populist creationism that failed to deal with the evidence for evolution honestly.  Coyne also accuses Behe of mining and using hominem attacks against scientists while timidly accepting evolution.( )  A review on the pro-evolution website talk.origins, described the book as ...an exposition of the Frontiers of Ignorance and that within it systems were labeled irreducibly complex if Behe was not able to envision a simpler system that still worked.  The review also stated that the theory was unfalsifiable (echoing Miller(), with faulty logic that worked because Behe did not provide crucial facts that would illustrate its failings.()  Allen Orr has called Behes argument in the book ...just plain wrong, arguing that gradual adaptation could produce irreducibly complex systems.  Orr points to examples of gradual adaptation already known (citing to the work of H. J. Muller in the early 20th century()).  Behe is also criticized for claiming a conspiracy of silence among scientists regarding the failure of Darwinism.(Dawkins criticized the book for being logically flawed by setting up a false dichotomy in which Darwinian evolution is rejected despite what he sees as an enormous amount of positive evidence due to a single apparent failure to explain complexity. Dawkins further commented that it was an argument Darwin himself had anticipated, and that the example of a bacterial flagellum used by Behe had in fact been refuted by R. Miller in v. Dover Area School District.()Behe has responded to some of these criticisms.(Response to critical reviews by:* Talk.origins:** * H. Allan Orr:** )  The politically conservative magazine Review voted Darwins Black Box one of their top 100 non-fiction books of the century.()  Views of CreationIn a review of Behes paper Design vs. Randomness in Evolution: Where Do the Data Point?, Lamoureux criticised Darwins Black Box as having become central to fundamentalist and evangelical anti-evolution critiques against biological evolution. Behe supports the historically incorrect misrepresentation that Darwins views on the origin of life were atheistic, when the Origin of Species repeatedly refers to a Creator in a positive and supportive context as impressing laws on matter. Though Behe has avoided committing himself to the view that God intervenes directly in nature to create purportedly irreducibly complex structures, Darwins Black Box briefly speculates that Divine intervention might have caused the direct creation of a cell from which all of life evolved, supporting creationist views of miraculous acts of creation, but ironically echoing Darwins stated view of life, with its several powers, having been originally breathed into a few forms or into one. Behes claim that the creation of an original first cell represents a gap in the laws of nature needing divine intervention appears to be the problematic of the gaps position which is subject to the gaps being filled by scientific discoveries. Behes thesis that irreducible structures are created in one fell swoop is opposed by other biochemists, including many who are devout Christians, and has, it is claimed by some, no support from the fossil record - something Behe would dispute.() Peer review controversy In 2005, while testifying for the defense in the Dover trial, Behe claimed under oath that the book had received a more thorough review than a scholarly article in a refereed journal,()  a claim which appears to conflict the facts of the books peer review.()  Four of the books five reviewers (Michael Atchison, Robert Shapiro, John Morrow, and Doolittle) have made statements that contradict or otherwise do not support Behes claim of the book passing a rigorous peer review. ;Michael Atchison:  Atchison has stated that he did not review the book at all, but spent 10 minutes on the phone receiving a brief overview of the book which he then endorsed without ever seeing the text.();Robert Shapiro:  Shapiro has said that he reviewed the book, and while he agreed with some of its analysis of origin-of-life research, he thought its conclusions are false, though the best explanation of the argument from design that was available.()  Had the book been submitted to a peer-reviewed journal and this comment had appeared, the review provided by Shapiro would have forced the conclusions regarding design to be changed or removed.(;John Morrow: Morrow criticized the book as appalling and unsupported, which contributed to the original publisher turning down the book for publication.();Doolittle: Doolittle, upon whom Behe based much of his discussion of blood clotting, described it as misrepresenting many important points and disingenuous,() which also contributed to the original publisher turning down the book for publication.()In the same trial, Behe eventually testified under oath that There are no peer reviewed articles by anyone advocating for intelligent design supported by pertinent experiments or calculations which provide detailed rigorous accounts of how intelligent design of any biological system occurred.(Kitzmiller v. Dover Area School District/4:Whether ID Is Science, p88) The result of the trial was the ruling that intelligent design is not science and is essentially religious in nature.References External links * * Scanned copy (not all pages included) and reviews at Google books* * * caja negra de DarwinBlack BoxCaixa-Preta de DarwinKara Kutusu
1421986
Kansass_3rd_congressional_district
Kansass 3rd congressional district is a district in the state of Kansas. Located in eastern Kansas, the district encompasses Wyandotte and Johnson counties, which include the Kansas City Metropolitan Area, and portions of Douglas County, which includes part of the college town of Lawrence. The district includes Kansas City and the surrounding suburbs of Overland Park, Lenexa, Shawnee, and Olathe. The district is currently represented by Republican Yoder. DemographicsFollowing redistricting after the 2000 U.S. Census, there were 672,124 people, 258,439 households, and 173,022 families residing in the district. The density was 864.4/mi over a land area of . There were 272,721 housing units at an average density of 350.7/mi. The racial makeup of the district is 82.70% White, 8.88% Black or African American, 2.60% Asian, 0.70% Native American, 0.04% Pacific Islander, 3.09% from other races, and 1.99% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 6.79% of the population.There were 258,439 households out of which 36.52% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 53.21% were married couples living together, 10.27% had a female householder with no husband present, and 33.05% were non-families. 26.12% of all households were made up of individuals and 7.35% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.55 and the average family size was 3.11.In the district the population distribution by age is 26.60% under the age of 18, 10.49% from 18 to 24, 31.65% from 25 to 44, 21.17% from 45 to 64, and 10.09% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 33.6 years. For every 100 females there were 95.78 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 92.54 males.The median income for a household in the district is $51,118, and the median income for a family was $62,695. Males had a median income of $42,348 versus $30,353 for females. The capita income for the district was $26,133. About 4.9% of families and 7.8% of the population were below the line, including 8.7% of those under age 18 and 6.0% of those age 65 or over.Among the population aged 16 years and older, 71.0% was in the civilian force and 0.1% were in the armed forces. Of the employed civilian workers, 12.8% were government workers and 5.6% were self-employed. Management, professional, and related occupations employed 41.5% of the work force and sales and office occupations an additional 28.8%. Only 0.2% were employed in farming, fishing, and forestry occupations. The largest employment by industry was: educational, health and social services, 19.8%; professional, scientific, management, administrative, and waste management services, 12.0%; retail trade, 11.8%; and manufacturing, 10.4%. Agriculture, forestry, fishing and hunting, and mining industries only employed 0.4%. List of representativesRecent Election Results20022004200620082010References(External linksJohnson County Republican Party  http://www.johnsoncountyrepublicanparty.comCongress.com: Kansas Congressional districts
1424174
Fraterville,_Tennessee
footnotes                 Fraterville, Tennessee is an unincorporated community located on State Route 116 in Anderson County, Tennessee, between the towns of Lake City and Briceville. It is included in the Tennessee Statistical Area.Fraterville, which has a history of mining, is known for the Mine Disaster that occurred there in 1902. The name of the community, which is derived from the Latin word frater, means village of brothers.(Coal Creek: War and Disasters, Coal Creek Watershed Foundation, Inc., accessed September 15, 2008) Referencesvo:Fraterville
1427152
Job_Adams_Cooper
religion    Job Adams Cooper (November 6, 1843  January 20, 1899) was a U.S. Republican Party politician. He served as the sixth Governor of the of Colorado from 1889 to 1891.Early lifeJob Adams Cooper was born in Illinois, to Charles and Maria Hadley Cooper, one of seven children. The future Governor attended Knox College in Illinois, but took a leave of absence to fight in the Civil War for the Army.  Cooper enlisted as a sergeant in the Illinois Volunteer Infantry, and was stationed in Tennessee, during the Confederate raid on the city by troopers under the command of General Bedford Forrest. Following the war, he returned to complete his studies. Upon graduation from Knox College in 1867, he returned to his hometown of Greenville and was admitted to practice law in Illinois. That same year, he married Jane O. Barnes, the daughter of a prominent minister, and they had four children together. Leaving his family behind in 1872, he accompanied A. C. Phelps on a westward journey hoping to find entrepreneurial opportunities, and eventually settled in Colorado, where they started the law firm of Phelps and Cooper. In between 1872 and 1888, Cooper expanded his business interests to include insurance, banking, mining, and the cattle industry.Governor of ColoradoIn 1888, Cooper was nominated for Governor, and went on to defeat Mountain News editor MacDonald Patterson. Following his inauguration as the states sixth Governor in January, 1889, he signed legislation that created thirteen new counties, including: Baca, Cheyenne, Kiowa, Kit Carson, Lincoln, Montezuma, Morgan, Otero, Phillips, Prowers, Rio Blanco, Sedgwick, and Yuma. Furthermore, he opened a state orphans home in Denver and a state reformatory in Chaffee County.RetirementCooper declined to seek reelection in 1890, and returned to his law practice. He later formed a construction business and built Denvers Cooper Building, which is considered an architectural gem to this day. From 1893 to 1897, he served as President of the local of Commerce. He died at the relatively young age of 55 and is buried in Block 24 of Denvers Fairmount Cemetery.He was survived by at least one child, a daughter, Mary Louisa Cooper, wife of geologist and railroadman, Seymour Storrs.  The Storrs had two children, Lucius Seymour Storrs, Jr., and Storrs Grierson.()ReferencesExternal links*Governor Job Adams Cooper Collection at the Colorado State Archives*Adams CooperAdams Cooper
1429466
Madrona,_Seattle
right|thumb|MadronaImage:Raymond-Ogden Mansion 03.jpg|thumb|The Mansion in Madrona (built 1913) is listed on the Register of Historic Places.Madrona is a mostly residential neighborhood in east central Washington. It is bounded on the east by Washington; on the south by E. Cherry Street, beyond which is Leschi; on the west by Luther King, Jr. Way, beyond which is the Central District; and on the north by E. Howell Street, beyond which is Denny-Blaine.The neighborhoods main thoroughfares are E. Union and E. Cherry Streets (east- and westbound), Madrona Drive (northwest- and southeast-bound), and 34th Avenue and Lake Washington Boulevard (north- and southbound). It is home to Madrona Park and the 34th Avenue and E. Union commercial area.  History The neighborhood was named by John Ayer, who contributed the land for Madrona Park, after a species of tree (Arbutus) common to the area.Madronas motto, The Peaceable Kingdom, reflects its racially-mixed heritage. In the early 20th century, the mining industry brought Chinese immigrants to Madrona. Later, the shipbuilding boom brought an influx of Americans. For most of the second half of the 20th Century, 34th Avenue divided the neighborhood between mostly middle-class African American (to the west) and upper-class Caucasian (to the east). The Panthers used the Madrona Playfield on Spring Street and 34th Avenue as its marching drill location in Seattlehttp://www.historylink.org/output.cfm?file_id2235.In more recent years, as the neighborhood has gentrified, Madrona has been steadily returning to a more Caucasian demographic. The 2000 Census notes that, of the 5,097 residents in King County Census Tract 78 (covering Madrona east of 31st Avenue), 72% are Caucasian (up from 65% in 1990), 20% are African American (down from 29% in 1990), and 4% are Asian (roughly unchanged from 1990). Census Tract 77, two-thirds of which is in the Central District, has a significantly higher percentage of African American residents.External links*Madrona Neighborhood website*Madrona neighborhood profile and stats*Wilridge Winery, based in Madrona
1432796
Nikolai_Korotkov
 footnotes               Nikolai Sergeyevich Korotkov (also romanized Korotkoff; ) (  14 March 1920) was a Russian surgeon, a pioneer of 20th century surgery, and the inventor of auscultatory technique for blood pressure measurement. Associated eponyms*Korotkoff method is a non-invasive auscultatory technique for determining both systolic and diastolic pressure levels. The method requires  sphygmomanometer and  stethoscope. Due to ease and accuracy, it is considered a gold standard for blood pressure measurement *sounds are pulse-synchronous circulatory sounds heard through the stethoscope in auscultation of blood pressure using Riva-Roccis sphygmomanometer.*Korotkoff test or Korotkoff sign is a collateral circulation test: in aneurysm, if the blood pressure in the peripheral circulation remains fairly high while the artery above the aneurysm is compressed, the collateral circulation is good.BiographyNikolai Korotkov was born to a merchant family at 40 Milenskaia Street in Kursk on February 26, 1874. He attended the Kursk Gymnasium (secondary school). He entered the medical faculty of University in 1893 and transferred to University in 1895, where he graduated with distinction in 1898. He was appointed resident intern to professor Bobrov at the surgical clinic of Moscow university.Korotkov was given leave of absence to serve with the Russian military forces in the East during the Rebellion in China 1900. He was attached to the Cross in the Iversh Community under Dr Aleksinskii (a pupil of prof. Bobrov). The journey to the Far East entailed extensive travel by way of the railroad, through Irkutsk to Vladivostok and he returned to Moscow via Japan, Singapore, Ceylon and the Canal to reach the Sea and Feodosiya. Korotkov was honoured with the of St. Anna for outstandingly zealous labours in helping the sick and wounded soldiers.On his return Nikolai Korotkov turned his mind from military to academic pursuits and translated Eduard Alberts monograph Die Chirurgische Diagnostik from German to Russian. In 1903, Dr Federov was appointed professor of surgery at the Military Medical Academy at Petersburg, and he invited Korotkov to join him as assistant surgeon. During the War in 1904&ndash;1905, Korotkov went to Harbin in Manchuria as senior surgeon in charge of the Second St Georges Unit of the Red Cross. He became interested in surgery and began to collect cases for his thesis, which included 41 of 44 case reports of patients who were part of his war experience in the hospital at Harbin.Returning to St Petersburg in April 1905 he began to prepare his thesis, but it was a presentation to the Military Medical Academy in 1905 that earned him lasting fame. The technique of blood pressure measurement was reported in less than a page (only 281 words) of the Izvestie Imp. Voiennomedicinskoi Akademii (Reports of the Imperial Military Medical Academy):The critical comments of Korotkovs peers were dealt with in an adroit manner, and he appeared a month later at the Imperial Military Academy with animal experiments to support his theory that the sounds he had described were produced locally, rather than in the heart. He earned the approbation of professor M. V. Yanovsky, who declared: Korotkov has noticed and intelligently utilised a phenomenon which many observers have overlooked. Yanovsky and his pupils verified the accuracy of the technique and described the phases of the auscultatory sounds and for a time technique was known as the Korotkov-Yanovsky method.Nikolai Korotkov, then serving as research physician to the mining district of Vitimsko-Olekminsky in Siberia, received his doctorate in 1910. After that he served as surgeon to the workers of the gold mines of Lensk. Here he witnessed Tsarist atrocities and was affected deeply by the murder of unarmed striking miners. After this Korotkov returned to St. Petersburg and during the World War he was surgeon to The Charitable House for disabled soldiers in Selo. He welcomed the Revolution after which he was physician-in-chief of the Mechnikov Hospital in Petrograd until his death from lung tuberculosis on March 14, 1920.Bibliography* To the question of methods of determining the blood pressure (from the clinic of Professor S. P. Federov) Russian. Reports of the Imperial Military Academy 1905, 11: 365-367.* Contribution to the methods of measuring blood pressure; second preliminary report 13 December 1905 Russian. Vrach Gaz 1906, 10: 278.* Experiments for determining the efficiency of arterial collaterals. Stremennaia, 12 St Peterburg. P P Soykines Press, 1910. (and Segall HN. Experiments for determining the efficiency of arterial collaterals by N C Korotkoff. Montreal: Mansfield Book Mart, 1980:265. - Preface biographical notes and editing of translation from Russian.)References* Shevchenko Y, Tsitlik J. 90th Anniversary of the Development by Nikolai S. Korotkoff of the Auscultatory Method of Measuring Blood Pressure. Circulation. 1996;94:116-118* Andrey K. Gurevich, M.D. Journal Of Nephrology. Volume 19 no. Suppl. 10 - Special Issue on History of Nephrology. 2006External links* Whonamedit.com entry for N. KorotkovSergejevi KorotkovSergejewitsch KorotkowKorotkovSergeevi KorotkovKorotkovja:KorotkowKorotkov 
1435435
Tomari,_Hokkaid
 is a village located in Furuu District, Shiribeshi, Hokkaid, Japan.As of 2009, the village has a population of 2,014 and a density of 24.46 persons per km. The total area is 82.35 km.Tomari is situated on the western coast of the Peninsula along the of Japan.  The village is known for fishing and seafood, including urchin (uni), sea cucumber (namako) and squid (ika), as well as for its view of the sunset on the of Japan.Since the beginning of the 20th century, Tomari has been linked with energy and power generation, giving it its current nickname of Hometown of Energy.  Historically, the Kayanuma area of the village was a coal mining town.  Recently, the village is more famous for being the site of Hokkaids only power plant, the Nuclear Power Plant.  Tax revenue from the nuclear power plant has ensured that Tomaris local government, unlike most rural villages, operates at a consistent surplus.Tomari is sister cities with Ehime, another small town in Japan that is home to the Nuclear Power Plant.External links*Tomari official website (Hokkaid)io:Tomari(Hokkaid)ja:( )()()zh:
1438627
Shimokawa,_Hokkaid
thumb|200px|The location of Shimokawa in Kamikawa Subprefecture. is a  town located in Kamikawa (Teshio) District, Kamikawa, Hokkaid, Japan.As of 2008, the town has an estimated population of 3,836 and a density of 6.47 persons per km. The total area is 644.20 km. Geography Shimokawa is 90% forest: primarily oak, white birch, larch, and pine trees. Rivers The main river in Shimokawa is the River which is a tributary of the River (the second longest river in Hokkaido).  The Nayoro River has two branches: the Sanru River (smaller) and the Panke River (larger).  The Sanru River is very clear and is a spawning area for Cherry Trout. Fly fishing is very popular in Shimokawa. Industry Shimokawa was originally a mining town, extracting copper and gold.  The mines are now exhausted and the primary industries are lumber and farming. Lumber There are 5 lumber mills in Shimokawa which produce a total of 60,000 m of lumber in a year.  The lumber is used both in Japan and exported to Canada, Finland, New Zealand and other places.  After an area of the forest is harvested for lumber, it is always replanted with baby trees by the Forestry Union.  Sometimes the union invites townspeople to help. Sports Shimokawa has produced a large number of Olympic ski jumpers. Olympic Ski Jumping For the Winter Olympics, four ski jumpers who were born in Shimokawa attended (Kasai, Okabe, Ito and Ito). Until the Winter Olympics, Noriaki Kasai has participated 6 times. Takanobu Okabe has taken part in 4 Olympics and got the gold medal at the Winter Olympics in the team tournament. Daiki Ito has participated 2 times. Kenshiro Ito and Shima have participated once. Restaurants There are many restaurants in Shimokawa. Apollo is an Italian cafe with coffee, pasta, pizza, and other meals.  Morena is an Indian soup-curry restaurant with home-made cake and fruit juices.  Monja is an okonomiyaki restaurant.  Manb is a made-to-order reservation-only restaurant. Hot Springs Shimokawa has one hot spring called Gomi Onsen.  It is a small hotspring but has an outdoor section.  It has a hotel with 30 rooms. Schools Shimokawa has one nursery school, one elementary school, one junior high school, and one commercial high school. Festivals & Events Shimokawa has 3 main festivals, and several smaller festivals, held every year. The three main festivals are as follows:# Ice Candle Museum: For a week near the end of February, Shimokawas main park is filled with snow sculptures and decorated with thousands of ice candles. Events are held throughout the week, and kicked off with a large outdoor BBQ party on the first day.# Udon Festival: The last weekend in August is a two day festival filled with events such as races, baking contests, and traditional dances. Until 2005 it was called the Homecoming Festival.# Great Wall Festival: One afternoon in early spring, a large BBQ party with events and carnival style booths is held in Shimokawas main park, which contains a small replica of the Wall of China.Here are some of the many other festivals held annually in Shimokawa (in rough order of size):* Arts Weekend: A weekend of photo and craft exhibitions, concerts, and traditional arts (such as Tea Ceremony).* Culture Weekend: A weekend where many companies, offices, and factories open their doors to the public for tours.* Every school has their own sports festival weekend (where the students compete at different sports) and a separate school festival weekend (where the students organize activities and sales for themselves and the townspeople).* Mikoshi Parade: A Mikoshi (portable shrine) is carried through the town to drive away evil spirits. This is no easy feat, as the shrine weighs over 1 (metric) tonne.* Marching Band Parade: Held to coincide with Shimokawas War Memorial Day, marching bands (one from each school) parade through town, led by war veterans.External links* Official website in JapaneseHokkaidoja:ru:()zh:
1442474
Jack_Swilling
laterworkJohn W.  Jack Swilling (April 1, 1830 &ndash; August 12, 1878) founded the city of Phoenix, Arizona, in 1867.  Other pioneers and travelers had seen and commented on the ancient Hohokam canals in that area, but it was J. W. Swilling who  organized the first successful modern irrigation project in Arizonas Salt River Valley.  The Swilling Irrigating and Canal Company started the small farming community of Phoenix that since has grown into a major metropolitan area.Swilling earlier had an important role in the opening to settlement of the previously unexplored central Arizona highlands in the vicinity of modern-day Arizona.  His discoveries resulted in a major gold rush to the new area, and this in turn led to the establishment of Arizonas first Territorial Capital at the brand-new town of Prescott.Jack Swilling  was a teamster, prospector, mine and mill owner, and a saloon and dance hall owner.  He also was a visionary, a canal builder, farmer, rancher, politician, and public servant.  Swilling was also a States Army minuteman and a civilian aid to the States Army during the Civil War. All of this was accomplished while he suffered from periods of excruciating pain resulting from major injuries he suffered in 1854. He took morphine to assuage the pain, which led to dependency problems for the rest of his life.BiographyEarly lifeJack Swilling was born on April 1, 1830, at Red House Plantation, South Carolina, to George Washington Swilling and Margaret Farrar Swilling, the eighth of their 10 children.  George Swilling was the son of the plantation manager, while Miss Farrar was the owners daughter.  Farrars parents did not approve of the marriage, so the young couple eloped.  It took three years for her parents to accept the match.  In time, George Swilling became owner of the plantation.  When Jack Swilling was 14 the family moved from Carolina to Georgia.  Three years later he and an older brother enlisted in a mounted battalion of Georgia volunteers for service during the War.  After the war, the two young men returned to Georgia.  Jack Swilling drops out of sight for a time then, although he was reported in Georgia for the Christmas of 1849.The next recorded events in his life are his marriage at Alabama, in 1852 to Mary Jane Gray and the birth of their daughter Elizabeth a year later.  Swilling wrote that in 1854 he suffered serious injuriesa broken skull and a bullet lodged in his backin unstated circumstances.  Those injuries plagued him for the rest of his life and led to a dependency on drugs and alcohol.  In 1856, on his 26th birthday, something happened to cause him to leave permanently for the West.There is over a years break in the record, but he apparently joined the Leach Wagon Road Company, at Smith, Arkansas, in the summer of 1857 as a teamster, probably staying with the slow-moving oxen-drawn wagon train until its arrival a year later at Mesilla, in Arizona which was then part of Mexico Territory.The years between Swillings arrival in Arizona in 1858 and the founding of the Phoenix settlement almost a decade later were active and varied ones.  Following are some highlights:After his arrival in Arizona, Swilling moved to southern California, where he joined in a gold rush near Angeles.  A few months later he was drawn back to Arizona by the gold rush at Gila City where he also worked for the Overland Mail Company.Apache Wars and the American Civil WarHe was elected captain of the Rangers militia company that was formed for protection from Apache stock raids on the miners and the stage company.  The Gila Rangers with the support of warriors from the friendly Maricopa tribemade a January 1860 expedition to the unexplored Mountains of central Arizona to chastise Apache raiders.  That expedition resulted in some noteworthy discoveries:  the existence of the River and traces of mineral riches, including gold, in an area that looked well suited for ranching and farming.  However the area was too remote and dangerous for settlers at that time.Soon afterwards, the Gila City gold deposits ran out and Swilling followed his good friend Colonel Snively to Pinos Altos, where he both mined and ran a saloon and dance hall.  When the Army withdrew from New Mexico Territory  at the beginning of the Civil War, the men of Pinos Altos formed a militia company they named the Guards for defense against Apache attack. By then Arizona had been established which included all of New Mexico Territory south of the 34th parallel. Swilling was elected second in command of the company, or First Lieutenant, and retained that rank when the Arizona Guards were absorbed into the Confederate Army. Swilling likely fought at the of Pinos Altos, a Confederate victory and a battle which killed his commander; Captain J. Mastin.After a time spent defending against Apaches and acting as the facto police force for the area around Pinos Altos, he led a portion of the Arizona Guards that reinforced the militia garrison of Tucson in 1862. Swilling is believed to have commanded a party of rebels who burned Station and skirmished with the Union army. He was involved in the noted incident at Whites flour mill at the Pima Villages when Union Captain James McCleave was captured.  Following the Capture of Tucson, Swillings company retreatred and he became a civilian employee of the United States Army, first as a dispatch rider between General Carletons California Column and Union forces up the Grande, and later as a scout in an anti-Apache campaign.  He was involved in the campaign to take Mesilla which ended with a Union takeover of Confederate Arizonas capital.  Near the end of that employment, he encountered the R. Walker exploratory party near Pinos Altos when Swilling led the capture of the famous Apache chief Coloradas.Further Prospecting and MarriageSwillings war ended there and he convinced Joseph Walker and his group that there was gold in the central highlands of the new Arizona Territory.  He then guided them to where the first Yavapai County mining district was formed just a few miles south of present Prescott on May 10, 1863.  They called it the Mining District, and the rules they adopted were the areas first recorded laws.Swilling left the Walker party shortly after the formation of the Pioneer Mining District and joined up with the Weaver/Peeples exploratory party which arrived in the area shortly after the Walker group.  He made a small fortune from the unusual surface gold mine at Rich Hill between Wickenburg and Prescott.  News of his successes spread eastward when two gold samples from Swillings claim sent to General Carleton were forwarded for presentation to President Lincoln.Next, he was briefly part owner of a flour mill in Tucson apparently in partnership with his neighbor T. Hayden.  Quickly tiring of Tucson, he returned to Yavapai County where he prospected, owned gold mines and gold milling operations, and farmed.  In addition he also was the mail contractor between Prescott and the Pima villages below the River Valley on the River.  And then he had the inspiration to form the Swilling Irrigation and Canal Company that would reopen the Salt River Valley to farming.In the midst of all this activity, Jack Swilling married a young Mexican woman of Spanish heritage named Trinidad Mejia Escalante.  They were married on April 11, 1864, at Tucsons Agustin Cathedral when Trinidad was about seventeen.  Over the next fourteen years they had seven natural children, five girls and two boys, and adopted two Apache orphans, a boy and a girl.On November 16, 1867, he formed the Swilling Irrigating and Canal Company at Wickenburg.  Soon after, a small group of men headed by Jack Swilling started construction of the first modern-era irrigation canals in the Salt River Valley.  The following summer the first crops of wheat, barley and corn were harvested.Swilling claimed a quarter section south of what became Van Buren Street between 32nd and 36th Streets for his own farm.  He built a nine-room,  home there, which became known as Castle.  His farm was a local showplace, featuring an artificial pond with tame ducks, a vineyard and an orchard with a variety of fruit trees.He was involved in the planning and construction of additional canals, including the first ditch south of the Salt River in partnership with an old acquaintance, and business partner, T. Hayden, the founder of Arizona and father of long-time Arizona Senator T. Hayden.In the early days, Jack Swilling was one of the most prominent leaders of the Phoenix settlement and he was its first postmaster and first of the peace.  However, once Phoenix was well established and the so-called original townsite was located over three miles (5 km) to the west of his holdings, he lost interest and moved his growing family back to central Arizona.  There he mined, farmed and ranched in and around the area of Black Canyon City until he became a suspect in a stagecoach robbery near Wickenburg.DeathBy the spring of 1878, he and his family were living in the small mining community of Gillette, a few miles south of todays Black Canyon City.  His health was failing, and his drinking had become a problem.  Trinidad Swilling suggested that he go on a trip to recover and rebury the remains of their old friend, Colonel Snively, who had been murdered by Apaches in a wilderness area called Picacho.While Swilling and two companions were on this journey of Christian charity, three hooded menone tall, one medium size, and one shortrobbed a stagecoach near Wickenburg.  This description matched that of Swilling and his companions and they became suspects in the robbery.  His tendency to tell wild tales while drinking also was a factor.  A series of legal complications brought him to Yuma where he died in the county jail while awaiting a hearing.  The real robbersled by a man Swilling and others had publicly accusedwere identified only after Swillings death.Swilling was buried in a Yuma cemetery  before his family could be notified.  If there ever was a grave marker it is long gone and the precise location of Jack Swillings remains is unknown.After his death, Swillings reputation as a badman grew so fast that by the end of the 19th century a prominent Arizona historian would write of him as a typical desperado.  By many accounts he was a joker and yarn spinner and while drinking he spread tall tales about his exploits to all who would listen.  That, for example, is one reason he became a suspect in the Wickenburg stage robbery.Friends remembered Jack Swilling as an honest, hard-working, and generous man always ready to help those in need of a meal or a place to sleep.  He was known to put his own life at risk for others, literally riding to the rescue when help was needed in the face of Apache attack.In the end his use of a combination of narcotics and liquorto relieve the pain caused by old injuriesruined Jack Swillings health and his reputation.References and further reading* Albert R. Bates, Jack Swilling: Arizonas Most Lied About Pioneer, Wheatmark Publishing Co., Tucson, AZ, 2008. ISBN 978-1587369650External links*Jack Swilling Exhibit, 1992 with historic documents and photos,  at River Project*Swillings cabin in Black Canyon CitySwilling
1445082
Donner
Donner is a variation of Donar, the German  name of the god Thor  particularly as a character in the first opera, Rheingold of Wagners opera cycle Ring des Nibelungen. In modern German, it means thunder.It can also refer to:People*(surname)Places* (crater), a lunar crater on the far side of the Moon* Donner Pass exhibit at Gas and Steam Engine Museum in Vista, CA* Camp and Pass, where the Party was trapped by weather during the winter of 1846-1847** Memorial State Park, near the eastern shore of Lake, commemorates the disaster* California, an unincorporated community near Donner Pass* Ski Ranch on Donner Summit, California* und Blitzen River river in Oregon, United States* Donner-Reed Pioneer Museum* Donner mountain on Vancouver Island, British Columbia, Canada* California Museum for History, Women and the Arts#Treasures from a Trunk: California Pioneers Quilts and Textiles* William Hulmes Grammar School, school in in northern England, with Donner Block wing* Donner Laboratory, at of California, Berkeley, a biomedical atomic energy research center, funded by William H. Donner* McKinneys-Donner Lake State Highway, refers to State Route 89 Music*  veux donner ma voix French entry in the Eurovision Song Contest 1999*  Donner pour donner 1980 music video by Elton John*  Je nai plus rien  te donner song on Amours du dimanche (1989) album by French pop singer Lavoine*  Se donner la main track on French pop singer  Lories de toi album*  Emanuel Donner member of Austrian alternative pop band GingaTransport* USS Donner (LSD-20) United States naval ship* Michigan Triangle#George R. Donner captain of a vessel that disappeared on Lake MichiganAwards and titles* Prize, an award given for books considered excellent in regard to the writing of Canadian public policy* Donner Professor  academic title held by those who have held one of the five chairs (in science) funded by the William H. Donner FoundationFlora and fauna* Eriogonum umbellatum Torrey var. torreyanum (Donner Pass buckwheat), a variety of umbellatum* subcongesta common name Donner woodrushArt*  19th-century painter Bierstadt painted the Donner Pass in his Donner Lake from the SummitStage and screen* Frankie Donner character on American soap opera Days of our Lives* Fishman theater work We Are Destroyed, exploring the ill-fated Donner Party expedition* Donner character in CSI Miami television series* II: The Richard Donner Cut, a version of a superhero film* Donner, character in Stoppards Descending a Staircase play* General Gerhard Donner character in Wars 1989 science fiction anime film dir. by  Yasuhiko* Larry Donner character in Momma from the Train film* Maddux Donner (played by Livingston) character in Gravity (TV series)Literature* Dont You Cry for Me, 1940 novel by Weld based on the Donner party* The Mormons and the Donner Party article in BYU Studies by E. Campbell* the Reindeer (originally called Donder), alternative name of one of the reindeer named in the poem Visit from St. Nicholas * D. Houston American novelist, author of Snow Mountain Passage (2001) inspired by a familial link to the Donner Party* Rhodes novel The Ungodly: A Novel of the Donner Party* Donner, a superheroine from multiple Media comic books* Eric Donner is one of the six signature Scions that are presented and followed in all three core books of (role-playing game).* Martin Donner, character in Anderson science fiction novella Un-Man* Min Donner character in R. Donaldsons science fiction novel Dark and Hungry God Arises* Ordeal by Hunger: The Story of the Donner Party by R. Stewart* Palace Wagon Family: A True Story of the Donner Party by Sutton* Short story Ode to the Donner Party by Shields* Sir Magnus Donners, character in Dance to the Music of Time cycle of novels by Powell* The Journal of Douglas Allen Deeds: The Donner Party Expedition, 1846 young adult historical novel by Philbrick, in Name Is America series* The Mothers: An American Saga of Courage told the story of the Donner Party tragedy by Fisher* The Perilous Journey of the Donner Party fiction book for young adults by Calabro* Donner,  one of Clauss reindeer, as named in The Night Before ChristmasOtherDonner may also be:* kebab, a Turkish dish made with mutton* Metals Ltd., a Canadian mining company*  Palmer v Donner, an 1868 United States Supreme Court caseSee also*  Party (disambiguation)(Begriffsklrung)fr:Donnerit:Donnernl:Donnerja:ru:sv:Donner
1449008
Moel_Siabod
 easiest_route  Moel Siabod is a mountain in Snowdonia, North Wales, which sits isolated above the villages of Betws-y-Coed and Curig. At 872m it is the highest peak in the Moelwynion mountain range. The UK National Mountain Centre, Plas-y-Brenin, is located at the foot of Moel Siabod. From the top of the mountain, it is reputedly possible to see 13 of the 14 highest peaks in Wales on a clear day without turning ones head. The words Moel Siabod translate from Welsh as Scabby Hill.(Marsh, Terry. The Summits of Snowdonia (London: Robert Hale, 1984) ISBN 0709014562.)(Marsh, Terry. The Mountains of Wales (London: Hodder and Stoughton, 1985) ISBN 0340348275.)(Nuttall, John & Anne (1999). The Mountains of England & Wales - Volume 1: Wales (2nd edition ed.). Milnthorpe, Cumbria: Cicerone. ISBN 1-85284-304-7.) AccessThe mountain is easily accessible from the north via Curig and nearby Cyfyng (by a separate but similar path) and from the south via Dolwyddelan.TopographyThe highest part of the mountain forms a relatively level, rocky ridge approximately 800 m long, running roughly south-west (from the summit) to north-east. At the north-eastern end of this main ridge there is a fairly steep descent towards Cyfyng. At the south-west edge of the main ridge there is a further, much steeper ridge that branches off to the east, as well as several precipitous cliffs.The north-west side of the main ridge is relatively gentle and supports a variety of flora and has numerous paths. The south-east side has many sharp drops down to a valley. This valley, fenced in on two sides by the main ridge and the ridge running east from the summit, is at roughly 500 m above sea level and contains Llyn-y-foel (Welsh for lake of the mountain). There is both a steep descent, following a stream that emerges from the lake to the south-east, and a gentle descent, to the north-east, from this valley.TerrainAs mentioned above, the two main ridges are fairly rocky; an ascent up the minor ridge will usually require either the use of hands, as will the ascent to Llyn-y-foel from the Dolwyddelan path. The terrain around the lake is prone to be boggy, especially on the northern side, and the path to the lake from Pont Cyfyng frequently turns into a flowing stream.PathsThere are several routes to the top of Moel Siabod, only one of which is marked on the local Survey map. All of the paths below, excluding the route from Llyn-y-foel directly onto the minor ridge, are marked on the Snowdonia Snowdon and the Moelwynion  Harvey SuperWalker map. From Capel CurigThe most popular route starts from the Plas-y-Brenin National Mountaineering Centre in Curig, and is therefore used for guided excursions. It is the gentlest of the three most common routes and is the only one marked on the OS maps.Leaving the centre, you crosses the river Llygwy via the ancient bridge Pont-y-Bala, the path almost immediately enters Commission land and follows a variety of dirt tracks and footpaths before exiting onto open land and continuing south up the grassy northern side of the mountain.From Pont Cyfyngthumb|300px|right|Enlargeable photograph of Moel Siabod from Ty Hyll showing old slate mining site.A well marked in the village of Cyfyng onto a very steep tarmacked road marks the beginning of this path, Not the one with the pedestrian sign by it, with a footpath leaving the road after about 100 m. This footpath forks, with one route taking a sharp ascent onto the main ridge and one a more gentle route up through an abandoned slate mine and up to Llyn-y-foel (see above) from which there are several paths to the summit not marked on the OS map via the minor ridge to the east of the summit. See below - paths from Llyn-y-foel to the summitFrom DolwyddelanA large part of the horizontal distance covered on this route is on Commission land to the north of Dolwyddelan and the south of the mountain. Along the dirt tracks through this land there is a fork signposted Moel Siabod (left) or Capel Curig (right). The latter path leads first of all to Pont Cyfyng, where it is possible to join the path above, or continue to Capel Curig and join the first route. The former path is a more direct route to the summit. This path continues on dirt tracks for a while before heading onto a footpath through the forest and thence onto access land. At this point, the path - which occasionally requires the use of hands to get up the rocky path - follows a stream which originates at Llyn-y-foel.Paths from Llyn-y-foel to the summitThere are numerous tracks around the lake which will allow a walker to get from any point at the lake to any other without too much trouble. The main route from the lake to the summit heads to the south of the lake and then turns sharply right and ascends the minor ridge to the summit. There is a further, more obscure path that ascends very steeply over rockfalls and some scree directly onto the ridge from the lake.Cultural references* WoodReferencesExternal links* Computer generated summit panoramas North * Video of Gwilym Jones, Hill farmer of Moel Siabod* South index* www.geograph.co.uk : photos of Moel Siabod and surrounding areaSiabod
1452287
Pilgrims_Rest,_Mpumalanga
footnotes               thumb|right|The Robbers GravePilgrims Rest is a small town in the Mpumalanga province of Africa which has been declared a national monument. After it was officially declared a gold field in September 1873, it suddenly grew to 1,500 inhabitants searching for alluvial gold.  Towards the end of the 19th century claims were bought up and underground mining started by the company  known as TGME. Mining was closed down in 1971 and the village sold to the government as a national museum. Transvaal Gold Minings Estates, currently part of the listed Simmers and Jack, started gold mining again in 1998. The towns original architecture remains largely unchanged since then, because the town was declared a National Monument in 1986.Pilgrims Rest was the location of an emergency mint during the Boer War. This mint struck the famous and extremely rare Veld Pond.Also at the graveyard, every single grave was laid facing in the same direction, except for the famous Robbers Grave which is laid perpendicular to the rest, emblazoned simply with a cross and the large type words of Robbers Grave. It is as the name suggests the grave of a robber who was shot stealing a tent from one of the miners. A tent represented a home so was the most valuable of any individuals belongings, stealing this tent was a most grievous crime and the punishment was meted out in the extreme. World Heritage Status This site was added to the UNESCO Heritage Tentative List on May 15, 2004 in the Cultural category.See also* of the South African pound* Mabin, A.S. & Pirie, G.H. The township question at Pilgrims Rest, 18941922. South African Historical Journal, 17 (1985), 6483.* Pirie, G.H. Public administration in Pilgrims Rest, 19151969. Contree, 20 (1986), 2732.External links* Pilgrims Rest Reduction Works Industrial Heritage Site - UNESCO World Heritage Centreaf:PelgrimsrusRestro:Pelgrimsrus
1455421
Ermelo,_Mpumalanga
footnotes               Ermelo is the educational, industrial and commercial centre of the 7,750 km Sibande District Municipality in Mpumalanga province, of South Africa. Mixed farming (maize, cattle, potatoes, beans, wool, pigs, sunflower seeds, lucerne and sorghum) and anthracite, coal and torbanite mining take place here. Ermelo is the crossroads of three national highways, N2, N11 and the N17, only Pretoria & Johannesburg are crossed by more.HistorySome of the earliest inhabitants of the area were the mysterious Leghoya people. Not much is known about them, but ruins of their settlements dating back to c.1400 can found in the area.  Modern Ermelo was founded by Reformed Church Reverend Frans Lion Cachet (1835-1899). Cachet was an outspoken preacher, who had a strong interest in evangelism to Jews, his own family having had a Jewish heritage(). Cachet had met and been influenced by Willem Witteveen from Ermelo in the Netherlands as a young man, and named the settlement in honour of Witteveen.A congregation was started at Ermelo by Cachet in 1870, and was recognised by the 5th annual general meeting of the church in April of 1872()(ZA Places - Ermelo: The Early Years. http://www.za-places.co.za/mpumalanga/ermelo_the_early_years.html. Accessed 20-Aug-2011).The town was reduced to a single standing home by the British during the Boer War.DemographicsErmelo has a more than 40000 inhabitants. http://bevoelkerungsstatistik.de/wg.php?x&mengcis&lngde&desgamelan&geo-245&srtpnan&colabcdefghimoq&msz1500&ptc&vax Notable people from Ermelo * Nkosinathi Nhleko, soccer player* Bashini Mahlangu, soccer player* Dube, musician* Jennifer Ferguson, musician* Dan Nkosi, musician* William Papas, journalist* Mduduzi Manana, parliamentarian* Tshepo Ngwane, actor* Sibongile Manana, parliamentarian* Siphamandla Nkambule, musician* Eksteen Jacobsz, musician* Larry Robertson, founder of Capital college and Promat College* Johann Slee, award winning architect and painter* Mentz, rugby player* Mentz, rugby player (brother of Henno)* Daniel Overbeek, astronomerNight clubs* Dube Tonight* Back of the moon* Kariba* Old Man (187 Magwaza St 2351)* Moyeni Mpumalanga(Sdafrika)Mpumalanga(Zuid-Afrika)(RPA)Mpumalanga()ve:Ermelo
1459408
Charles_Warren
General Sir Charles Warren, GCMG, KCB, FRS (7 February 1840 &ndash; 21 January 1927) was an officer in the British Engineers. He was one of the earliest European archaeologists of Biblical Land, and particularly of Mount. Much of his military service was spent in the British South Africa, but in later life he was of Police of the Metropolis, the head of the London Metropolitan Police, from 1886 to 1888, during the period of the the Ripper murders. His command in combat during the Second Boer War was criticised, but he achieved considerable success during his long life in his military and civil posts.Education and early military careerWarren was born in Bangor, Gwynedd, Wales, the son of Major-General Sir Charles Warren. He was educated at Grammar School and Wem Grammar School in Shropshire. He also attended College for one term in 1854, from which he went to the Royal Military College, Sandhurst and then the Royal Military Academy at Woolwich (1855&ndash;1857). On 27 December 1857, he was commissioned a Lieutenant in the Engineers. On 1 September 1864, he married Fanny Margaretta Haydon (died 1919); they had two sons and two daughters. Warren was a devout Anglican and an enthusiastic freemason, becoming the third District Grand Master of the Eastern Archipelago in Singapore and the founding Master of the Coronati Lodge.Military careerFrom 1861 to 1865, Warren worked on the survey of Gibraltar. From 1865 to 1867, he was an assistant instructor in surveying at the School of Military Engineering in Chatham. He was promoted Captain for this work.Ottoman SyriaIn 1867, Warren was recruited by the Exploration Fund to conduct archaeology reconnaissance with a view of further research and excavation to be undertaken later in Syria, but more specifically the Land or Biblical Palestine. He conducted the first major excavations of Jerusalems Mount, thereby ushering in a new age of Biblical archaeology.  His most significant discovery was a water shaft, now known as Shaft, and a series of tunnels underneath the Temple Mount.() His Letters from the expedition would be published later as a journal. In 1870, ill-health forced Warren to return to England.South AfricaHe served briefly at Dover and then at the School of Gunnery at Shoeburyness (1871&ndash;1873). In 1876, the Office appointed him special commissioner to survey the boundary between West and the Free State. For this work, he was made a Companion of St Michael and St George (CMG) in 1877. In the War (1877&ndash;1878), he commanded the Fields Horse and was badly wounded at Perie Bush. For this service, he was in dispatches and promoted to Brevet Lieutenant-Colonel. He was then appointed special commissioner to investigate native questions in Bechuanaland and commanded the Northern Border Expedition troops in quelling the rebellion there. In 1879, he became Administrator of Griqualand West.  The town Warrenton in the Cape Province of Africa is named after him.Palmer expedition investigationIn 1880, Warren returned to England to become Chief Instructor in Surveying at the School of Military Engineering. He held this post until 1884, but it was interrupted in 1882, when the Admiralty sent him to Sinai to discover what had happened to Professor Henry Palmers archaeological expedition. He discovered that the expedition members had been robbed and murdered, located their remains, and brought their killers to justice. For this, he was created Knight Commander of St Michael and St George (KCMG) on 24 May 1883 and was also created a third class Mejidiye by the Egyptian government. In 1883, he was also made a Knight of Justice of the Order of St. John of Jerusalem, and in June 1884 he was elected a Fellow of the Society (FRS).Bechuanaland ExpeditionIn December 1884, by now a Major-General, Warren was sent as HM Special Commissioner to command a military expedition to Bechuanaland, to assert British sovereignty in the face of encroachments from Germany and the Transvaal, and to suppress the Boer freebooter states of Stellaland and Goshen, which were backed by the Transvaal and were stealing land and cattle from the local Tswana tribes. Becoming known as the Expedition, the force of 4,000 British and local troops headed north from Town, accompanied by the first three observation balloons ever used by the British Army in the field. The expedition achieved its aims without bloodshed, and Warren was recalled in September 1885 and appointed a Knight Grand Cross of St Michael and St George (GCMG) on 4 October 1885.Commissioner of PoliceIn 1885, Warren stood for election to Parliament as an independent Liberal candidate in the Sheffield Hallam constituency with a radical manifesto. He lost by 690 votes, and was appointed commander at Suakin in 1886. A few weeks after he arrived, however, he was appointed Commissioner of Police of the Metropolis following Sir Edmund Hendersons resignation.The exact rationale for the selection of Warren for the post is still unknown. Up to that time, and for some time into the 20th Century, the heads of Scotland Yard were selected from the ranks of the military.  In Warrens case he may have been selected in part by his involvement in discovering the fate of Professor Palmers expedition into the Sinai in 1883.  If so there may have been a serious error regarding his police work in that case, as it was a military investigation and not a civil style police operation.The Metropolitan Police was in a bad state when Warren took over, suffering from Hendersons inactivity over the past few years. Economic conditions in London were bad, leading to demonstrations. He was concerned for his mens welfare, but much of this went unheeded. His men found him rather aloof, although he generally had good relations with his superintendents. At Queen Victorias Golden Jubilee in 1887, the police received considerable adverse publicity after Miss Cass, an apparently respectable young seamstress, was (possibly) mistakenly arrested for soliciting, and was vocally supported by her employer in the courts.To make matters worse, Warren, a Liberal, did not get along with Conservative Secretary Henry Matthews, appointed a few months after he became Commissioner. Matthews supported the desire of the Assistant Commissioner (Crime), Monro, to remain effectively independent of the Commissioner and also supported the Receiver, the forces chief financial officer, who continually clashed with Warren. Office Secretary Lushington did not get on with Warren either. Warren was pilloried in the press for his extravagant dress uniform, his concern for the quality of his mens boots (a sensible concern considering they walked up to 20 miles a day, but one which was derided as a military obsession with kit), and his reintroduction of drill. The radical press completely turned against him after Bloody Sunday on 13 November 1887, when a demonstration in Square was broken up by 4,000 police officers on foot, 300 infantrymen and 600 mounted police and Life Guards.In 1888, Warren introduced five Constables, ranking between the Superintendents and the Assistant Commissioners. Monro insisted that the Chief Constable of the Investigation Department (CID), his deputy, should be a friend of his, Macnaghten, but Warren opposed his appointment on the grounds that during a riot in Bengal Macnaghten had been beaten by Hindoos, as he put it. This grew into a major row between Warren and Monro, with both men offering their resignation to the Home Secretary. Matthews accepted Monros resignation, but simply moved him to the Home Office and allowed him to keep command of Branch, which was his particular interest. Robert Anderson was appointed Assistant Commissioner (Crime) and Superintendent Williamson was appointed Chief Constable (CID). Both men were encouraged to liaise with Monro behind Warrens back.Jack the RipperWarrens biggest difficulty was the the Ripper case. He was probably unfairly blamed for the failure to track down the killer and faced press accusations that were frequently baseless. He was accused of failing to offer a reward for information, although in fact he supported the idea and it was blocked by the Home Office. He was accused of not putting enough police officers on the ground, whereas in fact Whitechapel was swamped with them. He was accused of being more interested in uniformed policing than detective work, which was true, but failed to take into consideration the fact that he allowed his experienced detective officers to conduct their own affairs and rarely interfered in their operations. He was accused of not using bloodhounds, and when he did eventually bring them in he was accused of being obsessed with them.He responded to these criticisms by attacking his detractors in the pages of Magazine, supporting vigilante activity, which the police on the streets knew was a bad idea, and publicly complaining about his lack of control of CID, which brought an official Home Office reprimand for discussing his office publicly without permission. Warren had had enough and resigned...coincidentally right before the murder of Jane Kelly on 9 November 1888. Every superintendent on the force visited him at home to express their regret. Warrens resignation hindered the investigation. He had given an order that if another murder occurred, nobody was to enter the scene - a strange turn of phrase as the four previous victims had all been found in the open street - until he arrived to direct the investigation. Consequently, when the murder of Kelly was discovered by a rent collector who looked in through the window of her room in a Spitalfields lodging house, the police did not enter the room for some three hours because, unaware of his resignation, they were waiting for Warren to arrive. He returned to military duties.He was appointed Knight Commander of the Bath (KCB) on 7 January 1888.Later military career and Boer WarIn 1889, Warren was sent to command the garrison in Singapore and continually quarrelled with the Home Secretary.(Farwell, p.159) He sited the guns of Singapore and remained there until 1894. Returning to England, he commanded the Thames District from 1895 to 1898, when he was promoted Lieutenant-General and was moved to the Reserve List.Royal Engineer Yacht ClubWatermanship being one of the many skills required of the Sapper led to the formation of a sailing club at the School of Military Engineering in 1812 and later to the development of cutter rowing teams. Construction of a canal linking Thames and Medway rivers in 1824 gave the Royal Engineers an inland waterway to practice these skills, with the officer responsible for the canal drawn from the Royal Engineers Regiment. In 1899 as General Officer Commanding the and Medway Canal, General Sir Charles Warren presented a challenge shield for a championship cutter race on the River Medway against the Navy. The Sapper teams were drawn from members of the Submarine Mining School, but when the service was disbanded in 1905, the tradition of cutter rowing was continued by the fieldwork squads. The REYC continues to compete against the Navy Sailing Association annually to this day. The club developed and became the Royal Engineer Yacht Club in 1846, making it one of the most senior yacht clubs in the United Kingdom. The REYC continues to this day, operating three club yachts and competing on behalf of the Corps at races around the world. The club is one of the oldest sports clubs in the British Army.Second Boer WarOn the outbreak of the Boer War in 1899, he returned to the colours to command the 5th Division of the African Field Force. Farwell described the decision to give command to Warren as an enigma.( In January 1900, Warren bungled the second attempted relief of Ladysmith, which was a west flanking movement over the River. At the of Spion Kop, on 23 January&ndash;24 January 1900, he had operational command, and his failure of judgment, delay and indecision despite his superior forces culminated in the disaster for British arms on Spion Kop. Farwell highlighted Warrens fixation with the armys oxen and his view that Hlangwane hill was the key to Colenso.(Farwell, pp.159&ndash;161) He suggested Warren was perhaps the worst of the British generals in the Boer War and certainly the most preposterous.( He was described by Buller in a letter to his wife as a duffer who was responsible for losing him a great chance.  Warren was recalled to Britain in August 1900 and never again commanded troops in the field. He was, however, promoted General in 1904 and became Colonel-Commandant of the Royal Engineers in 1905. A book by the South African, Owen Coetzer, attempted in a small way to vindicate him for his Boer War actions.(Coetzer, p.1)Retirement yearsFrom 1908, Warren became involved with Baden-Powell in the creation of the Boy Scout movement. He had previously authored several books on Biblical archaeology, particularly Jerusalem, and also wrote On Veldt in the Seventies, and The Ancient Cubit and Our Weights and Measures. He died of pneumonia, brought on by a bout of influenza, at his home in Weston-super-Mare, Somerset, was given a military funeral in Canterbury, and was buried in the churchyard at Westbere, Kent, next to his wife.Fictional portrayalsWarren was played by Henson in the 1973 miniseries Jack the Ripper.  He was played by Quayle in the 1979 film by Decree, which features the characters of Holmes and Watson in a dramatization of a conspiracy theory concerning the Ripper case.  In the 1988 made for TV film Jack the Ripper, which followed the same conspiracy theory as Murder by Decree, he was played by Hugh Fraser. In the 2001 film From Hell he was played by Richardson.BibliographyWorks by Charles Warren* *Underground Jerusalem (1874)*The Temple or the Tomb (1880)* *On the Veldt in the Seventies (1902)*The Ancient Cubit and Our Weights and Measures (1903)*The Early Weights and Measures of Mankind (1914)Works on Charles Warren* FootnotesReferences*Austin, Ron. The Australian Illustrated Encyclopedia of the Zulu and Boer Wars, Slouch Hat Publication, McCrae, 1999. ISBN 0-9585296-3-9*Bloomfield, Jeffrey, The Making of the Commissioner: 1886, R.W.Stone, Q.P.M. (ed.), The Criminologist, Vol.12, No.3, p. 139-155; reprinted, Paul Begg (Exec. ed.), The Ripperologist, No. 47, July 2003, p. 6-15.*Coetzer, Owen. The Anglo-Boer War: The Road to Infamy, 1899-1900, Arms and Armour, 1996. ISBN 1-85409-366-5*Farwell, Byron, The Great Boer War, Allen Lane, London, 1976 (plus subsequent publications) ISBN 0-7139-0820-3*Fido, Martin and Keith Skinner, The Official Encyclopedia of Scotland Yard (Virgin Books, London:1999)* *Kruger, Rayne. Goodbye Dolly Gray: The Story of the Boer War, 1959*Dictionary of National Biography*Pakenham, T.The Boer War(1979)External links* Palestine Exploration Fund page on Warren* Jack the Ripper Casebook article on Warren* Large excellent photograph of WarrenWarrenWarrenWarrenWarrenWarrenWarrenWarren
1462386
Treacle_mine
#REDIRECT mining
1467558
Mountain_Party
The Mountain Party is a party in the state of Virginia that on July 8, 2007, at its state convention, voted to become the West Virginia affiliate of the Green Party.() At the 2007 Green Party National Meeting the party was admitted to the Green Party as a state affiliate.() It is a progressive and environmentalist party. The party platform calls for an end to mountaintop removal mining. It also calls for timber regulation that reduces flooding, erosion and eliminates clear-cutting and destruction of old-growth forests. Other platform planks include an end to welfare, and the establishment of small schools, health care and finance reform.The party platformAs of April 27, 2002, the partys platform focused on:*Environmental Protection: energy, agriculture, pro-environmental economic development; a halt to mountaintop removal coal mining in order to preserve forestland and streams; timber regulation that reduces flooding, erosion and eliminates clear-cutting and destruction of forests; full enforcement of current environmental protection laws; and phasing out the most ecologically harmful sources of energy*Election law reform: Promote political justice, Enhance voter access, Full Public Financing of elections, Same day registration, Independent, non-partisan election commission, Free airtime and access to debates * Accurate and verifiable voter rolls, Instant runoff voting and other progressive voting systems*Corporate accountability: Require corporations to pay higher tax rates and be responsible corporate neighbors; Hold the executives of a corporation directly liable for their decisions; Challenge corporate personhood; Enforce laws governing corporate crime and violence*Economic fairness: Promote economic justice and community-based business organizations and activities; promote a living wage for all Virginia workers; and promote the ability to form unions and have collective bargaining*Education: Small community-based public schools and enforce time limits on busing; realign state budgetary priorities to ensure that all citizens attain an adequate educational level; provide civic education that encourages active participation in the democratic process beyond voting*Universal Health Care: Enact universal healthcare to include medical, dental and prescription benefits; promote healthy lifestyles in order to decrease medical expenditures for preventable disease; curtail corporate-induced disease*True democratic principles in government: promote political justice; no privatization of government; proportional representation in the state legislature; transparency and sunshine laws for all government functions*Tax Reform: Elimination of the sales tax on food and clothing; tax relief for small businesses; elimination of corporate welfare; make the tax code progressive; fair assessments of mineral holdings and properties*Gambling: Hold citizen referendums on any gambling initiatives in the state*Trade, Not Trade: oppose the American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), the Trade Area of the Americas treaty (FTAA), the Trade Organization treaty (WTO), the Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), and any future global trade treatiesThe party, similar in its outlook to the liberal wing of the Democratic Party, was created partially in response to the perceived conservative tilt of the states Democratic Party.HistoryUnder West Virginia access laws, a party gains automatic ballot access for the subsequent election cycle by gaining one percent of the votes for Governor. Having obtained access by petition in 2000, the party achieved that one percent in that election and again in 2004 and won over 4% of votes in 2008. The Mountain Party was born as a direct result of the Giardina for Governor campaign in the year 2000 general election. Gubernatorial candidate Jesse Johnson unsuccessfully sued to be included in debates between the major candidates in 2004 and again in 2008.  While the Mountain Party has never elected anyone to any statewide office, it has obtained good results in local elections. In 2004 Richwood elected party member and local poet Henry Baber as its mayor, although this was in a non-partisan election.As of November 2009, 1041 West Virginians had registered as Mountain Party voters and were eligible to vote in party primaries.()Election results2008 elections;President:McKinney received 2,327 votes, less than 1% of presidential votes cast in the state.;Governor:Jesse Johnson received 31,195 votes or 4.46% of gubernatorial votes cast.;11th Senate District:Andy Waddell received 2,788 votes or 7%.;30th Senate District:John Wellbourn received 3,889 votes or 1.5%.;51st House District:Robin Mills received 1,655 votes or 24%.2006 elections:States Senate candidate Jesse Johnson received 1.9% of the vote.2004 elections;Governor:Jesse Johnson received 18,430 of 744,433 votes or 2.48%.;12th Senate District:John M. Williams (Weston) received 2048 of 43,858 votes or 4.67%.2002 elections;15th Senate District:Kit Patten (Great Cacapon) received 1173 of 26,264 votes or 4.47%.;55th Delegate District:Vince George (Shepherdstown), in a two-candidate race against John Overington, a Republican, received 1396 of 3589 votes or 38%.;36th Delegate District:Bob Henry Baber (Richwood) received 376 of 3868 votes or 9.72%.2000 elections;President:Nader received 10,680 votes or 1.63% of presidential votes cast in the state.;Governor:Giardina received 10,416 votes or 1.62%.ReferencesExternal links*Mountain Party*West Virginia State Election Commission*West Virginia Geological and Economic Survey article on Mountaintop Removal Coal Mining
1470894
List_of_Star_Wars_systems
This is a list of the systems and systems in the fictional Star Wars galaxy. Only notable star systems are listed.AAargonarThe Aargonar system contains the planet Aargonar.AbregadoThe Abregado system orbits the star Anza and contains five planets, the third of which is Abregado-rae.AdubaThe Aduba System contains six planets, including the habitable Aduba-3.AdegaThe Adega System is situated in the Outer Rim and contains the planet Ossus.AlderaanThe Alderaan System orbits the star of the same name and contains five planets. Alderaan, second in the system, and Delaya, third in the system, are both habitable. The system was reduced to four planets after Alderaan was destroyed by the Star in A New Hope.AlharThe Alhar System contains the habitable world of Haruun Kal.AltyrThe Altyr system contains the planet Altyr 5, where a brutal battle of the Clone Wars was fought. An important New Republic base was later located there.AlzocThe Alzoc System is situated in the Outer Rim and contains the planet Alzoc III, homeworld of the Talz.AnoatLocated between the Hoth and Bespin Systems, the Anoat System consists primarily of three inhospitable planets, Anoat, Deyer, and Gentes. The Falcon passed through the relatively deserted system while escaping from the Empire. The three planets (including Gentes, home of the Ugnaughts) were abandoned sometime before the Civil War.AxumThe Axum System orbits the star Solis Axum and contains eight planets, including Axum, third in the system, and Anaxes (Defender of the Core), fourth in the system.BBakuraThe Bakura system, home to the planet of Bakura, was once the site of a Ssi-Ruuk invasion. It is located near the moon of Endor.Besh GorgonThis system has no natural planetary bodies. The Wheel is located here.BespinBespin is the gas-giant planet in which Cloud City (home of Lando Calrissian) resides.BilbringiBilbringi is featured in Zahns Heir To The Empire/Thrawn Trilogy. The system is rich with minerals, and more importantly, it is the site of a large shipyard. The Bilbringi Shipyards were equipped with a CGT array, which was the cause of a major battle during the Thrawn era.The asteroids used by Thrawn to blockade Coruscant were equipped with cloaking devices here, and loaded into one of Thrawns Destroyers. Because of the blockade, the New Republic was forced to acquire the CGT array to end the blockade.During this battle, the Noghri traitor Rukh assassinated the Grand Admiral, and the New Republic captured the system.During the Vong invasion, the shipyards at Bilbringi produced Star Destroyers for the New Republic.  BithSkywalker and his fleet were defending the Bith System during The Clone Wars before the separatist warship, Malevolence, attacked and almost killed Jedi master Koon. Anakin left the system to search for his fellow Jedi.BodiBodi is a system containing twelve planets in which are all habitable. The Bodi system is on the outer rim and has planets Bodi, Bodi 1, and Bodi 2.BonadanBonadan is an industrial system in the Rim. The ecology is completely destroyed due to the advancement of industry, and it is home to billions of diverse species. The planet makes an appearance in Wars: Empire at War.BothawuiBothawai is a strategic system in the Rim. It is first mentioned in Return of the Jedi when Mon Mothma mentions the many loss of bothan spies. The system was heavily guarded by the Jedi, amongst them Skywalker. There is noted to be a major spy network on the planet.BrentaalThe Brentaal System orbits the star Brenta and contains seven planets, the fourth of which is Brentaal.CChandrilaThe Chandrila System is located in Bormea Sector. The system has seven planets, the most notable of which is Chandrila.ChoraxChorax is a small system in which Squadron briefly made a base, shortly before the fall of Coruscant. The smuggler Terrik was saved by Rogue Squadron in this system.ChoriosThe Chorios Systems were composed of several planets with irregular orbits around a trio of stars. Some planets include Nam Chroios, Kings Galquek, Brachnis Chorios, and Pedducis Chorios. The Chorios systems were located deep within the backwater Meridian Sector.CiriusThe Cirius System contains four planets, one of which is the destroyed world of Caamas.Circarpous MajorThe Circarpous Major System contained about fifteen planets at one time, but it was destroyed in a supernova explosion.ColuThe home system of Clakdor VII.CorellianThe Corellian System orbits the star Corell and contains seven planets. The system is unusual in that five of the planets are habitable. These five planets are Corellia, Drall, Talus, Tralus, and Selonia. It also contains Station. It is home to the Drall and Selonian races, and it is believed that all five of the habitable planets were transported here from a different location. This was proven true by Anakin Solo when he found the giant planetary repulsors used to move them.CorulusThe Corulus System is located in Bormea Sector. There are four planets in the system, the outermost of which is Corulag.CoruscantThe Coruscant System orbits the star Coruscant and contains eleven planets. These planets are Revisse, Platoril, Vandor-1, Vandor-2, Vandor-3, Coruscant (the Galactic Capital world), Muscave, Stentat, Improcco, Nabatu, Ulabos, and the Obo Rin comet cluster. The Covey Asteroid Field lies between Improcco and Ulabos and the Obo Rin Comet Cluster lies at the edge of the system. Vandor-3 and Coruscant are the only habitable planets in the system.CularinThe Cularin system is a binary-star system that has six planets. One of the planets is also named Cularin. Another planet is the terraformed Almas.CyprixThe Cyprix system contains one planet called Xyth (which isnt habitable) and is located twenty-one parsecs beyond the outer rim.DDagobahThe Dagobah system is home to the Dagobah planet, where Jedi Master Yoda lived and trained padawan Skywalker in Empire Strikes Back & of the Jedi before passing away at the age of 900. Apart from hut a side cave is also located on this remote planet.DantooineOne of the planets,Dantooine, Princess Leia used as a decoy for the rebel base in A New HopeDominusThe Dominus System was an uncharted system in which DarthVaders Star Destroyer Executor was under construction and home to Vader and his Apprentice Marek in BBY.DorvalaMining planet, which provides ore for transparisteel starfighter canopies and viewports -as seen in novel Cloak of Deception-EElroodThe Elrood System, near the Rimma Trade Route, contains the planet Elrood.Empress TetaThe Empress Teta System is the home system of the Krath. The lush planet of Mandalore is also located in the region. Prior to the Sith War, Kun allied himself with Krath and Mandalorians. The Jedi Odan-Urr later unified the system. The system was formerly named the Koros System.Evona/ArdosEvona and Ardos are two suns orbited by the planet Varl. The alien race of Hutts are said to have their origins in the system.Evona was worshipped as a God by the Hutt race, and when it was supposedly consumed by a black hole, Hutts began thinking of themselves as Gods, hence their well known egocentrism.Little else is known about this minor star system in the vast Star Wars universe.EndorEndor is a forest moon. The second Death Star had its main shield generator on the moons surface.. The Rebel Alliance were sent to deactivate the shield. It is also home to the Ewok tribes.FFalleenOne of the systems that used to be under the protection of the Jedi until it was finally taken over by the separatists during the Clone Wars animated series. It is first mentioned in episode #6 by Kenobi but not seen.FestThe Fest System contains the planet Fest.GGamorrThis system contains the planet Gamorr, the backwards, war-torn and barbaric homeworld of the Gamorreans.GorshThe Gorsh System is located in a backwater part of the Outer Rim, and contains the planet Gorsh.HHelskaThe Helska System is a very small, unimportant system in the Outer Rim. Its primary planet is the frozen Helska 4.HorusetThe Horuset System contains the lone planet of Korriban.HuttaThe Hutta system is the system where the planet Nal Hutta is located with its moon Nar Shaddaa.HothThe Hoth System was a remote system along the Ison Trade Corridor, near the Anoat system. Its sixth planet, Hoth was the location of the rebel base in Empire Strikes Back. It also contained a large and mineral rich asteroid field, that was once the site of the Darksaber construction project.IIridonia is the homeworld of the Zabrak species.  Maul was born on Iridonia.JJaprealThe Japreal System is home to the planet Onderon and two other planets.K Kamino Kamino is located beyond the Outer Rim, and is an oceanic planet. Kenobi visited the planet in the of the Clones to find the bounty hunter Fett. The Army of the Republic was created on Kamino. Darth Vader also tried to make a perfect clone of Galen Malek on Kamino.KorribanHome to the Dark Lords of the Sith Karthakk The Karthakk system contains three notable planets named Maramere, Lok, and Nod Kartha, all of which were under Federation control until Master Adi Gallia and clone reinforcements arrived, made an alliance with local space pirate Nym, toppled the Trade Federations reign of terror in the Karthakk system, killed the evil Captain Cavic Toth, and managed to stop his Hex missile Threat that would have killed thousands on Geonosis at the very beginning of the Clone Wars.KashyyykThe Kashyyyk System contains the planet Kashyyyk, inhabited by the Wookiee race, and the Planet Trandosha, home of the Trandoshans. During the 3rd episode the Clones planned the assassination of Yoda. It, of course, was unsuccessful.KhuiuminThe Khuiumin System was once the base of operations for a group of Batiiv pirates until the Empire put exceptional effort into having the group destroyed during the early days of the New Order. The pirates themselves had manage to raise a small armada of starships numbering to approximately 140 to defend their base against the fleets of the Empire.The Imperial fleet dispatched two Victory class Destroyers names the Bombard and the Crusader to destroy this fleet and managed to do so through a combination of superior tactics and firepower, destyroying not only the fleet but the ground base also.KesselThe Kessel System contains the planet of Kessel, as well as a cluster of black holes that were the location of the Empires Maw Installation, where the first Death Star was created.KorosThe Koros System is the former name of the Empress Teta System.LLybeyaThe Lybeya System is home to the Asteroids.MMustafarThe Mustafar System contains the young and volcanic planet Mustafar, the gas giants Jestefad and Lefrani. Located in the Outer Rim. Skywalker and Kenobi dualed on Mustafar in of the Sith. A curious fact: In the midst of the battle, Lefrani eclipses the sun of Mustafar.MuunThe Muun system contains the rich planet Muunilinst, which is home to San Hill and the Muuns of the Intergalactic Banking Clan.NNabooThe Naboo System contains the five planets of the Naboo system. The Naboo homeworld (also called Naboo) is the third planet of the five. It is located in Chommell Sector. It is home to Queen Amidala,Jar Jar Binks, and the people of the Naboo. Skywalker and Amidala fell in love on Naboo.OOnderonPPakunni SystemThe Pakunni System is located near the Newland System. Its main inhabited planet is Pakunni. It was a haven for both pirates and smugglers around and at the time of the of Hoth. It appeared in the game Wars: Tie Fighter.;References*PolithThe Polith System contains the planet Thyferra.Polis MassaPolis massa is an extra large asteroid with smaller asteroids throughout the terrain. Near the End of Star Wars Episode III Revenge of the Sith, Yoda and Bail Organa flee there after the duel of Yoda and the Evil Emperor. After the duel of Anakin and Obi-wan on the lava planet Mustafar, Obi-wan brought Senator Padme Amidala to Polis Massa. This is where Senetor Amidala had Luke and Leia. This is also where she died.PyriaThe Pyria system is located in the Colonies region of the galaxy. The most important planet in the system is Borleias. The Pyria system was the site of an important battle during the Vong invasion.PyrshakThe Pyrshak System contains the planet Manaan.RRafaThis system was the home to the original race of the Wars galaxy, the Sharu.RifloriiThis system is a trinary system about which the planet of Riflor orbits.RishiA system located about twelve parsecs from the Rishi Maze that includes the planet Rishi.This system includes a moon called Rishi moon.Captain Rex and Commander Cody along with three other clones destroyed a republican base to alert the Republic of a separatist invasion during the clone wars.RodiaThe Rodia system is situated in the Outer Rim. It was visited in episode 8 of the Star Wars: Clone Wars animated series by Amidala, Jar Binks and C-3PO who went to rescue an old friend of Padms; Senator Farr. Farr is one of the systems ruling senators. Ah-Twa Onno is Padms friend and has been her familys friend long enough for her to call Onno her uncle. The Rodia system returns in the video game Wars: The Clone Wars - Jedi Alliance and the same environments are seen as during the Clone Wars episode.RospA large system with twenty planets, location uSSartinaynianThe Sartinaynian System is located in the Outer Rim in Braxant Sector. The system is the location of the last planet to be renamed Bastion.ScarlThe Scarl System was the system in which Vaders secret lab, the Empirical was stationed and destroyed by the droid PROXY in BBY. Marek and Eclipse were held here for 6 standard months, Galen being rebuilt by Vader after being killed by him on the Executor and Juno being held prisoner.SeriananThe Serianan System is located in the Rim. It contains four planets, of which the innermost one, Serias, is the only inhabitable planet in the system.TTingel ArmA backwater system.TarisThe Taris System contains the planet Taris.TaroonThe Taroon System contains the planets Bordal and Kuan.TatooThe Ryloth system (sometimes mistakenly called the tatoo system) contains the planet Tatooine which orbits twin suns, Tatoo I and Tatoo II. It is located in the outer rim territories containing also Ryloth and Klatooine.TelosTelos suffered greatly at the hands of the Sith during the Jedi Civil War, its surface the target of heavy bombardment from the Sith fleet. Using a complex shield network, the surface of the planet is divided into restoration zones, where flora and fauna from across the galaxy  including dangerous wild beasts such as the cannok from the jungle moon of Dxun  are introduced into the controlled environment. Outside the lush restoration zones, arid, unlivable barrens still cover much of the planets surface, a testament to the destruction and pain the once beautiful planet has endured. This planet appears in Wars: Knights of the Old Republic II: The Sith Lords.TethThe Teth system is one of the wild systems in the Star Wars galaxy. During the Clone Wars animated movie, Anakin Skywalker and his padawan Ahsoka had to travel there to locate Jabba the Hutts kidnapped son, Rotta. Anakin mentioned the region is so wild the Republic doesnt even have Clone Troopers there to protect it.UUtapauThis sanctuary systems primary world of Utapau served as a hideout for the Separatists. Is a semi-desertic world full with sinkholes, in which there are sources of water. It is unknown as to whether there are other worlds in the system.Utegetu NebulaThe Utegetu Nebula is a relatively new nebula in the Galaxy. As all nebulae, the Utegetu Nebula was formed by a supernova which was still in the process of cooling when found. The Nebula was found by the Solos when they were laying a trap for Alema Rar to reveal herself as a Gorog Joiner. The planets there seemed to have been unharmed by the supernova but this is probably because of Fizz.After the events of Joiner King the Killiks were relocated to the Utegetu Nebula. Unfortunately, the Ithorians needed a new home which was to be The Utegetu Nebula because of how it was undiscovered by anyone and that there was considerable, and violent, competition for planets to terraform for displaced refugees.The only entrance to the Nebula is through the Murgo Choke, a system with four different types of stars. It can easily be blockaded, as in Unseen Queen. There are two other places of interest in the Utegetu Nebula. One is the planet Woteba, named after the Killiks moved there. This is also where the Solos laid a trap for Alema Rar. The other is The Tuskens Eye where the Gorog led the Hives into the creation of a fleet of 11 well armed battle/hive ships.VVelusThe Velus System contains the oceanic planet of Velusia.VeronThe Veron system contains the planets Veron, Sileron, and Trieron. It is located in the Mid Rim.XXcorponIn the books: Obi-Wans Jedi Tales, and The Story Of Han Solo, the Xcorpon System (Pronounced Sorpon) is mentioned.YYavinThe Yavin system contains Yavin and its 26 moons, of which Yavin 4, Yavin 8 and Yavin 13 are habitable.YToubThe YToub System is at the center of the Hutt trade world, being that it contains the planet of Nal Hutta and its moon Shaddaa. It is located in Space.ZZugThe Zug System is a 10-planet system that is home to the banking planet of Aargau, named after Zug, . See also * of Star Wars planetsReferences#  Daniel Wallace and Scott Kolins, The Essential Guide to Planets and Moons (Star Wars) (1998). ISBN 0-345-42068-3#  Zahn, to the Empire, Book 1 of The Trilogy (1991). ISBN 0-553-07327-3# ^ Emma OBrien,Pitures and facts on Moons. External links * http://www.nav-computer.com Star Wars Navigation Computer* http://starwars.wikia.com/wiki/Category:Systems Wookieepedias Systems Category
1474162
Constitutional_status_of_Cornwall
200px|right|thumb|The flag of Cornwall (Kernow)Cornwall is currently administered as a unitary authority and county of England.(Hansard 6 March 2007 column 1878W) However, a number of organisations and individuals () question the constitutional basis for the administration of Cornwall as part of England, arguing that the Duchy Charters(Duchy of Cornwall Charters (Royal Charter; 16th March 1337, First Duchy of Cornwall Charter;17th March 1337, Second Duchy of Cornwall Charter; 18th March, 1337)) of 1337 place the governance of Cornwall with the of Cornwall rather than the Crown. These charters and various constitutional peculiarities related to the Duchy of Cornwall are argued to distinguish Cornwall from England constitutionally, to such an extent that Cornwall should not be described as part of England in a constitutional sense. Others do not accept this argument, and assert that Cornwall is constitutionally part of England, citing a range of other precedents, including Cornwalls representation in the Parliament from an early date. In ethnic and cultural terms, Cornwall and its inhabitants have at various times been referred to as foreign to England and the people in various ways, including by the English themselves. One aspect of the distinct identity of Cornwall, is the language which survived into the early modern period, and been revived in modern times.Cornish nationalists argue, whether from a legal, cultural or other basis, that Cornwall should have greater autonomy than the present administrative circumstances give. A manifestation of this is the campaign for a assembly, along the lines of the Welsh or Scottish legislative institutions. Those who assert that Cornwall is, or ought to be, separate from England, do not necessarily advocate separation from the United Kingdom. An important aim is Cornwalls recognition as a home nation in its own right similar to how Wales, Scotland and Ireland are considered.HistoryMyth of originAn ancient tale, the legend of Brutus, recounted by of Monmouth, makes explicit reference to a distinct origin of the Cornish people. The legend tells how Albion was colonised by refugees from Troy under Brutus, who renamed his new kingdom Britain, and how the island was subsequently divided up between his three sons, the eldest inheriting Loegria (roughly modern England, Lloegr in Welsh), the other two Albania (modern Scotland, Alba in Gaelic) and Cambria (modern Wales, Cymru in Welsh). In addition, according to the legend, a second and smaller group of Trojans arrived in Britain, led by a warrior named Corineus, to whom Brutus granted extensive estates. Just as Brutus had called the island Britain...and his companions Britons, so Corineus called the region of the kingdom which had fallen to his share Cornwall, after the manner of his own name, and the people who lived there...Cornishmen. This indicates that, at least as far as Geoffrey was concerned, Cornwall possessed an identity distinct from the other parts of Britain.Prior to the Norman ConquestImage:Romanbritain.jpg|right|thumb|300px|Roman Britannia showing those areas under Roman rule, and the position of Dumnonia as a part of Roman Britain.right|thumb|300px|The British Isles c802.In pre-Roman times, Cornwall was part of the kingdom of Dumnonia, and was later known to the Anglo-Saxons as West Wales, to distinguish it from North Wales (modern day Wales).() The Anglo-Saxon word Wealh, which is retained in the last syllable of Cornwall meant a foreigner,() or person who did not speak the English tongue. The first element Corn is probably related to English Horn (and Latin Cornu), indicating the shape of the peninsula.The Chronicle records a battle in 825 and quotes The West Wealas (Cornish) and the Defnas (men of Devon) fought at Gafulforda. However it does not say who won or who lost, whether the men of Cornwall and Devon were fighting each other or on the same side and certainly no mention of of Wessex. Gafulforda is thought to be Galford near Trenchard on the banks of the Lew (tributary of the Lyd), though some translations render it as Camelford, some 60 km further west.References in contemporary charters (for which there is either an original manuscript or an early copy regarded as authentic) show of Wessex (802-39) granting lands in Cornwall at Kilkhampton, Ros, Maker, Pawton (in Breock, not far from Wadebridge, head manor of Pydar in Domesday Book), Caellwic (perhaps Celliwig or Kellywick in Egloshayle), and Lawhitton to Sherborne Abbey and to the Bishop of Sherborne.(Hooke, Della (1994) Pre-Conquest Charter Bounds of Devon and Cornwall, Woodbridge: Boydell; pp. 1617) All of the identifiable locations except Pawton are in the far east of Cornwall, so these references show a degree of West Saxon control over its eastern fringes. Such control had certainly been established in places by the later ninth century, as indicated by the will of King Alfred the Great (871-99).(Keynes, Simon & Lapidge, Michael (tr.) (1983), Alfred the Great: Assers Life of King Alfred and other contemporary sources, London: Penguin; pp. 61, 175-6, 193-4; cf. ibid, p. 89.) Apart from the reference to Egberts grant at Pawton there is no indication that English rule extended deep into Cornwall at this stage and the absence of any burhs west of Lydford in the Hidage may suggest limitations on the authority of the Kingdom of Wessex in parts of Cornwall.Athelstan, who came to the throne of England in 924 CE, immediately began a campaign to consolidate his power, and by about 926 had taken control of the Kingdom of Northumbria, following which he established firm boundaries with other kingdoms such as Scotland and Cornwall. The latter agreement, according to 12th century Country historian of Malmesbury, ended rights of residence for Cornish subjects in Exeter, and fixed the Cornish boundary at the east bank of the Tamar.(William of Malmesbury, Of Ethelstan the son of Edward, in History of the Kings of England (Gesta Regum Anglorum))(Payton, Philip, Cornish, in Encyclopedia of the Languages of Europe, Blackwell (2000) ISBN 9780631220398) At Easter 928, Athelstan held court at Exeter, with the Welsh and West Welsh subject rulers present,(thelstan Oxford Dictionary of National Biography online (subscription)) and by 931 he had appointed a bishop for Cornwall within the English church (i.e. subject to the authority of the Archbishop of Canterbury).(Orme, Nicholas The Saints of Cornwall Oxford University Press (2000) ISBN 9780198207658, pp910) The manumissions,(Jones, Heather Rose Cornish (and Other) Personal Names from the 10th Century Bodmin Manumissions: Name Formats (rev.  2001)) two to three generations later, show that the ruling class of Cornwall quickly became Anglicised, most owners of slaves having Anglo-Saxon names (not necessarily because they were of English descent; some at least were Cornish nobles who changed their names). Among those manumitting (releasing) slaves in the Bodmin record are four English kings, but no Cornish kings, dukes or earls.It is clear that at this time areas beyond the core of Anglo-Saxon settlement were recognised as different by the English kings. Athelstans successor, Edmund, in a charter for an estate just north of Exeter,(Miller, Sean (ed.) Charter text (Latin), Sawyer ref. 498 New Regesta Regum Anglorum (2001)) styled himself as King of the English, and ruler of this province of Britons. Edmunds successor Edgar styled himself, King of the English and ruler of the adjacent nations. This was followed by king Aethelred II (978-1016) describing Cornwall not as an English shire, but as a province, or client territory (though a reference for this statement is hard to find).Surviving charters issued by the Kings of England Edmund I (939-46), Edgar (959-75), the Martyr (975-8), Aethelred II (978-1016), Edmund II (1016), Cnut (101635) and the Confessor (104266) record grants of land in Cornwall made by these kings. In contrast to the easterly concentration of the estates held or granted by English kings in the ninth century, the tenth and eleventh-century grants were widely distributed across Cornwall. As is usual with charters of this period, the authenticity of some of these documents is open to question (though Della Hooke has established high reliability for the Cornish material), but that of others (e.g. Edgars grant of estates at Tywarnhaile and Bosowsa to his thane Eanulf in 960, Edward the Confessors grant of estates at Traboe, Trevallack, Grugwith and Trethewey to Bishop Ealdred in 1059) is not in any doubt. Some of these grants include exemptions from obligations to the crown which would otherwise accompany land ownership, while retaining others, including those regarding military service.  Assuming that these documents are authentic, the attachment of these obligations to the King of England to ownership of land in Cornwall suggests that the area was under his direct rule and implies that the legal and administrative relationship between the king and his subjects was the same there as elsewhere in his kingdom.(Whitelock, Dorothy (ed.) (1979) English Historical Documents, vol. 2 (c500-1042), 2nd edition. London: Methuen; pp. 56667, 597-99 (nos. 115, 131))(Hooke, Della (1994) Pre-Conquest Charter Bounds of Devon and Cornwall. Woodbridge: Boydell; pp. 1669)In 1051, with the exile of Earl of Wessex and his sons and the forfeiture of their earldoms, a man named Odda was appointed earl over a portion of the lands thus vacated: this comprised Dorset, Somerset, Devon, and Wealas.(Swanton, Michael (tr.) (2000) The Anglo-Saxon Chronicles, 2nd ed., London, Phoenix Press; p. 177) As Wealas is Saxon for foreigners, this could mean West Wales--that is, Cornwallor it could mean that he was overlord of the Cornish foreigners in Devon or elsewhere.Elizabethan historian Camden, in the Cornish section of his Britannia, notes that As for the Earles, none of British bloud are mentioned but onely Candorus (called by others Cadocus), who is accounted by the late writers the last Earle of Cornwall of British race.Norman conquest and afterCornwall was included in the survey, initiated by the Conqueror, the first Norman king of England, which became known as the Book, where it is included as being part of the Norman kings new domain. Cornwall was unusual as Domesday records no Saxon burh; a burh (borough) was the Saxons centre of legal and administrative power. Moreover, nearly all land was held by one person, Williams half-brother of Mortain, who may have been the first Norman to bear the title of Cornwall. He held his Cornish lands not as a Tenant in Chief of the King, as was the case with other landowners, but as de-facto Viceroy.F.M.Stenton tells us () that the early Norman compilation known as The Laws of William the Conqueror records all regions under West Saxon Law. These included Kent, Surrey, Sussex, Berkshire, Hanpshire, Wiltshire, Dorset, Somerset and Devon. Cornwall is not recorded as being under West Saxon, or English, law.Ingulf was secretary to William the Conqueror and after 1066 was appointed Abbot of Croyland. When his church burned down, he established a fund raising committee to rebuild it. Ingulfs Chronicle tells us:Having obtained this indulgence, he now opened the foundation for the new church, and sent throughout the whole of England, and into lands adjoining and beyond the sea, letters testimonial. To the Northern parts and into Scotland he sent the brothers Fulk and Oger, and into Denmark and Norway the brothers Swetman and Wulsin; while to Wales, Cornwall and Ireland he sent the brothers Augustin and Osbert.  See Ingulf Chronicle of the Abbey of Croyland with the continuation of Peter of Blois, trans Henry T. Riley (London: Henry G Bohn, 1854) pp. 229227of Huntingdon, writing about 1129, included Cornwall in his list of shires of England in his History of the English.On the Mappa Mundi, circa 1300, now in Cathedral, Cornwall (as Cornubia) is one of the very few regions within Britain to be named individually. . The significance and relevance of this is unclear; the map belongs to a category of map known as Complex (Great) World Maps and its depiction, within such a world context, should be seen in parallel with related contemporaneous material.()The phrase England and Cornwall (Anglia et Cornubia) has been used on occasion in post-Norman official documents referring to the Duchy of Cornwall:Extracted from a commission of the first Duke of Cornwall, 1351:25 Edw. III to John Dabernoun, our Steward and Sheriff of Cornwall greeting. On account of certain escheats we command you that you inquire by all the means in your power how much land and rents, goods and chattels, whom and in whom, and of what value they which those persons of Cornwall and England have, whose names we send in a schedule enclosed......Caxtons 1480 Description of Britain debated whether or not Cornwall should be shown as separate to, or part of, England.Tudor PeriodThe Italian Vergil in his Anglica Historia, published in 1535 wrote that four peoples speaking four different languages inhabited Britain:the whole Countrie of Britain ...is divided into iiii partes; whereof the one is inhabited of Englishmen, the other of Scottes, the third of Wallshemen, and the fowerthe of Cornishe people, which all differ emonge them selves, either in tongue, ...in manners, or ells in lawes and ordinaunces.During the Tudor period some travellers regarded the Cornish as a separate cultural group, from which some modern observers conclude that they were a separate ethnic group. For example Lodovico Falier, an Italian diplomat at the Court of Henry VIII said, The language of the English, Welsh and Cornish men is so different that they do not understand each other. He went on to give the alleged national characteristics of the three peoples, saying for example the Cornishman is poor, rough and boorish.Another example is Gaspard de Coligny Chtillon  the French Ambassador in London  who wrote saying that England was not a united whole as it contains Wales and Cornwall, natural enemies of the rest of England, and speaking a different language. His use of the phrase the rest of  implies that he believed Cornwall and Wales to be part of England in his sense of the word.Some maps of the British Isles prior to the 17th century showed Cornwall (Cornubia / Cornwallia) as a territory on a par with Wales. However most post-date the incorporation of Wales as a principality of England. Examples include the maps ofMunster (1515),(http://freepages.genealogy.rootsweb.com/~genmaps/genfiles/COU_files/ENG/aaEng/munster_england-det_1550.jpg)() Ortelius,() and Ruscelli.() Maps that depict Cornwall as a county of the Kingdom of England and Wales includeMercators 1564 atlas of Europe,() and Saxtons 1579 map authorised by Queen Elizabeth I.()A miniature epitome of Ortelius map of England & Wales, published in 1595, names Cornwall; the same map displays Kent in an equivalent manner.(Anglia from Epitome Theatri Orteliania (1595) Online at Rootsweb.) Maps of Britain which display Cornwall usually in their legends do not refer to Cornwall, e.g. Lily 1548. This suggests that care is needed in interpreting the status of places shown on maps, as with any historical source.17th & 18th CenturiesRecognition that several peoples lived within Britain and Ireland continues through the 17th century. For example after the death of  I in 1603, the Venetian ambassador wrote that the late queen had ruled over five different peoples: English, Welsh, Cornish, Scottish ...and Irish.Writing in 1616, diplomat Arthur Hopton stated:England is ...divided into 3 great Provinces, or Countries ...every of them speaking a several and different language, as English, Welsh and Cornish.Wales was effectively annexed to the of England in the 16th century by the in Wales Acts 15351542, but references to England in law were not presumed to include Wales (or indeed Berwick-upon-Tweed) until the and Berwick Act 1746.  By this time the use of England and Cornwall (Anglia et Cornubia) had ceased.Because of the tendency of historians to trust the work of their predecessors, Geoffrey of Monmouths  semi-fictional 12th-Century Historia Regum Britanniae remained influential for centuries, often used by writers who were unaware that his work was the source. For example, in 1769 the antiquary Borlase wrote the following, which is actually a summary of a passage from Geoffrey iii:1:Of this time we are to understand what Edward I. says (Sheringham. Anglorum Gentis Origine p. 129.) that Britain, Wales, and Cornwall, were the portion of Belinus, elder son of Dunwallo, and that that part of the Island, afterwards called England, was divided in three shares, viz. Britain, which reached from the Tweed, Westward, as far as the river Ex; Wales inclosed by the rivers Severn, and Dee; and Cornwall from the river Ex to the Lands-End.Another 18th century writer, Richard Gough, concentrated on a contemporary viewpoint, noting that Cornwall seems to be another Kingdom, in his Camdens Britannia, 2nd ed.(4 vols; London, 1806).During the eighteenth century, Johnson created an ironic Cornish of Independence that he used in his essay Taxation no Tyranny (TAXATION NO TYRANNY by Samuel Johnson, From The Works of Samuel Johnson published by Pafraets & Company, Troy, New York (1913). Retrieved 15 July 2006.) His irony starts::As political diseases are naturally contagious, let it be supposed, for a moment, that Cornwall, seized with the Philadelphian phrensy, may resolve to separate itself from the general system of the English constitution, and judge of its own rights in its own parliament. A congress might then meet at Truro, and address the other counties in a style not unlike the language of the American patriots ... We are the acknowledged descendants of the earliest inhabitants of Britain, of men, who, before the time of history, took possession of the island desolate and waste, and, therefore, open to the first occupants. Of this descent, our language is a sufficient proof, which, not quite a century ago, was different from yours.19th centuryPopular Cornish sentiment during the 19th century appears to have been still strong. For example, Hamilton Jenkin records the reaction of a school pupil who was asked to describe Cornwalls situation replied: hes kidged to a furren country from the top hand  i.e. its joined to a foreign country from the upper part. This reply was heard by the whole school with much approval, including old Peggy (the school-dame) herself.(Jenkin, A. K. Hamilton (1927) The Cornish Miner. London: George Allen & Unwin (Newton Abbot: David & Charles (reprint 1972, of 3rd ed. 1962); p. 274)The famous crime writer Collins described Cornwall as::a county where, it must be remembered, a stranger is doubly a stranger, in relation to his provincial sympathies; where the national feeling is almost entirely merged into the local feeling; where a man speaks of himself as Cornish in much the same way that a Welshman speaks of himself as Welsh.(Collins, Wilkie (1851) Rambles Beyond Railways, or Notes in Cornwall taken A-foot . London: Richard Bentley; p. 124)Chambers Journal in 1861 described Cornwall as one of the most un-English of English counties.(Chambers Journal; 17th February, 1861)  a sentiment echoed by the naturalist Hudson who also referred to it as un-English and said there were::few Englishmen in Cornwall who do not experience that antipathy or sense of separation in mind from the people they live with, and are not looked upon as foreigners(Hudson, W. H. (1908) The Lands End: a Naturalists Impressions of West Cornwall. London: Wildwood (reprint 1981); p. 34)Until the Tin Duties Abolition Act 1838, the Cornish miner was charged twice the level of taxation compared to the English miner. The English practice of charging foreigners double taxation had existed in Cornwall for over 600 years prior to the 1836 Act and was first referenced in William de Wrothams letter of 1198AD, published in G.R.Lewis, The Stannaries 1908. The campaigning West Briton Newspaper called the racially applied tax oppresive and vexatious Jan 1838. In 1856 the Westminster Parliament was still able to refer to the Cornish as aboriginals.Case papers, Page 11, Section 25Cornish shiresImage:Kernow Hundreds.png|right|thumb|300px|of Cornwall in the early 19th century, (formerly known as Cornish Shires)Additionally, Cornwall was also divided into Hundreds, which often bore the name of shire in English. In Cornish, they were called kevrangow (sing. kevrang).Although the name shire, today implies some kind of county status, hundreds in some English counties often bore the suffix shire as well (e.g. Salfordshire), but where English shires were split into hundreds each having their own constable, Cornish hundreds had constables at parish level.(Norden, John (1650) A Topographical and Historical Survey of Cornwall; p. 23)The Kevrangow were not however, English hundreds: Triggshire came from Tricori three warbands, suggesting a military muster area capable of supporting three hundred fighting men. However it must be said that this is an inference from name alone, and does not constitute historical evidence of any fighting force raised by a Cornish hundred.The Cornish kevrang replicated Englands shire system on a smaller scale.  Although by the 15th century the shires of Cornwall had become hundreds, the administrative differences remained in place long after.(Hutchings, Inspector, of Camborne (1957) The History of the Cornwall Constabulary. Truro: private circulation)Constitutional status  arguments on each sideCurrent administrative statusRegardless of the question of whether Cornwall constitutes one of the counties of England, an administrative county of Cornwall was set up by the Government Act 1888, which came into effect on 1 April 1889.  This was replaced by a county of Cornwall in 1974 by the Government Act 1972, which includes it under the heading of England. The Duke of Cornwall is still granted a number of unique statutory privileges, exemptions, powers, rights and authority in the Cornwall (Tamar Bridge) Act 1998, s.41, and other Acts.  In addition the Treasury Solicitors agency for bona vacantia Division considers The Duchy of Cornwall to comprise the County of Cornwall.(Bona Vacantia  See Jusrisdiction)The argument for non-English constitutional statusthe time of King Canute, Cornwall fell outside his British realms.(John, H. (1995) The Penguin Historical Atlas of the Vikings. London: Penguin Books)Image:Domesday-book-1804x972.jpg|left|thumb|250px|A line drawing of the Book. Notably, large swathes of northern England, Winchester and London do not appear in it, but Cornwall doesAs noted above, English kings of the 10th century, from Athelstan onward, referred to themselves as rulers of both the English and the other nations within Britain, so there is a question as to whether Cornwall had autonomy similar to, in particular, Wales. During the latter part of the pre-Norman period, the eastern seaboard of modern day England became increasingly under the sway of the Norse. Forkbeard, the first Danish King of England, died a few weeks after his English opponent the Unready had fled, so it is probable that he never properly took control of Cornwall.(The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle (Laud Chronicle) 10131014)(Lund, Niels (1997) Harald Bltands Dd (The Death of Harold Bluetooth). Roskilde Museum) His son Canute never properly conquered or controlled Scotland or Wales,(Trow, M. J. (2005) Cnut: Emperor of the North. Stroud: Sutton) but he appears to have had some authority in Cornwall, for in 1027 his counsellor Lyfing (already bishop of Crediton) was appointed as of Cornwall (St Germans), beginning the merger which would later form the See of Exeter. The map pictured, by William R. Shepherd (1926), shows Cornwall as not part of Canutes realm, but this approach is not followed by more recent scholarship, such as David Hills An Atlas of Anglo-Saxon England(1981). Ultimately, the Danes control of Wessex was lost in 1042 with the death of both of Canutes sons (Edward the Confessor retook Wessex for the Anglo-Saxons) but nevertheless the historical possibility that Cornwall was not a fully subdued part of the English kingdom under the Danes is critical and is an argument that may be advanced for the idea that both the Anglo-Saxon and Danish kings had limitations on their political status in Cornwall in the 10th and 11th centuries.When the Domesday Survey was initiated, by William, in 1086, men were sent to each shire in his new kingdom. This has to be seen within the context of matters of land, property and taxation and not as a means of misrepresenting what is understood, at that time, as a county. A shire, coming under the jurisdiction of the sheriff, is known alternatively as sheriffdom, shrievalty, or vicecomitatus and equates to the modern meaning of the word county.On 12 Feb 1857, during the pivotal Cornish Foreshore dispute, the Attorney General to the Duchy of Cornwall stated that whether it was held by a viceroy, by the Crown or granted to family or favourites, the Earldom of Cornwall (Comitatus Cornubi) included all territorial revenues, rights and property which were held as of the Honor. He then outlined how, when entrusted to the Crown, Cornwall was held not jure coron but jure Comitatus  or jure Ducatus, when augmented to a Duchy  as of the Honor in manu Regis existente. foreshore dispute papersIn 1328 the Earldom of Cornwall, extinct since the disgrace and execution of Piers Gaveston in 1312, was recreated and awarded to John, younger brother of Edward III.(John, Earl of Cornwall in Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (2004)) In September 1336, shortly before he was due to marry, John died, so his heir was his brother the King, who at the beginning of March the following year proposed to Parliament that the Earldom should become a Royal Duchy, to, in the words of the Royal Declaration that preceded the Charter, restore notable places of the realm to their pristine honours. This was agreed, and put into law by a charter dated the 17th of March 1337. A second charter, immediately following the Great Charter, attempted to clarify the Dukes rights specifically within the County of Cornwall. In addition to extensive estates (among them a number of entire towns and villages) this included the governance of the whole of Cornwall.When the first Duke of Cornwall came of age in 1351, one of his first official acts was to carry out his own form of Domesday survey (Commission 25 Edward III).  This has already been referred to above and confirms that Cornwall was not in England, when the Duke refers to his tenants and property as being in Cornwall and England of the Black Prince.  This implies that Cornwall was at that time a constitutionally non-English territory, a province of the Britons.To assert that this is a mediaeval feudal relic with no relevance to the present day constitutional situation, would not be historically or legally supportable.It has been claimed that sometime between 1858 and prior to the UK Parliament passing the Local Government Act in 1888, several Acts of Parliament were made to disappear. Allegedly, the pre-1st charter Letters Patent and the last two duchy charters were shredded, and the English translation of the remaining 1st duchy charter was altered from the original translation (these actions being kept secret, and the people of Cornwall never consulted). The 1st duchy charter (Constitutional Law 10) is still on the statute books but is marked by government as being revised again in 1978. The alleged co-conspirators in the coup dtat were and are the Government of the Duchy of Cornwall and the Government of the United Kingdom.()However any allegation of this kind needs to take account of the publication together in book form of the collection of English Acts of Parliament in 1811.(The statutes at large, of England and of Great Britain, London, Eyre & Strahan (1811))The Council for Racial Equality in Cornwall website states the following:- Cornwall retains a unique and distinct constitutional relationship with the Crown, based on the Duchy of Cornwall and the Stannaries. For other purposes it is recognised as a Celtic region or nation and enjoys its own national flag.()On 14 July 2009, Rogerson MP, of the Democrats, presented a Cornish breakaway bill to the Parliament in Westminster  The Government of Cornwall Bill. The bill proposes a devolved Assembly for Cornwall, similar to the Welsh and Scottish setup. The bill states that Cornwall should re-assert its rightful place within the United Kingdom. Cornwall is a unique part of the country, and this should be reflected in the way that it is governed. The Bill would provide Cornwall for greater responsibility in areas such as agriculture, heritage, education, housing and economic sustainability. There is a political and social will for Cornwall to be recognised as its own nation. Constitutionally, Cornwall has the right to a level of self-Government, as demonstrated by the Foreshore Case in 1858 which confirmed that Cornwall is legally a Duchy which is extraterritorial to England. If the Government is going to recognise the right of Scotland and Wales to greater self-determination because of their unique cultural and political positions, then they should recognise the same right of Cornwall.()()()The argument for English county statusImage:Medieval parliament edward.Jpg|thumb|250px|The English parliament in front of Edward I c.1300. From its foundation until 1707, it intermittently included areas not now considered to be in England, e.g. Wales was represented in the parliament from 1536 to 1707. At other times, Berwick-upon-Tweed and Calais were included, but Berwick was not formally incorporated into England until the 19th century.Image:EnglandSouthWest.png|thumb|right|250px|Cornwall is included in the administrative region West England (in red). This region is used for some governmental purposes.Some people reject all claims that Cornwall is, or ought to be, distinct from England. While recognising that there are local peculiarisms, they point out that Yorkshire, Kent, and Cheshire (for example) also have local customs and identities that do not seem to undermine their essential Englishness. The legal claims concerning the Duchy, they argue, are without merit except as relics of mediaeval feudalism, and they contend that Stannary law applied not to Cornwall as a nation, but merely to the guild of tin miners. Rather, they argue that Cornwall has been not only in English possession, but part of England itself, either since Athelstan conquered it in 936, since the administrative centralisation of the dynasty, or since the creation of County Council in 1888. Finally, they agree with representatives of the Duchy itself that the Duchy is, in essence, a real estate company that serves to raise income for the Prince of Wales. They compare the situation of the Duchy of Cornwall with that of the Duchy of Lancaster, which has similar rights in Lancashire, which is indisputably part of England.(for example, the Act of Parliament against false returns by escheators, 1 Henry VIII c. 8, in Statutes of the Realm, volume 3 printed by command of King George III) The proponents of such perspectives include not only Unionists, but most branches and agencies of government.Below are some indications that would tend to support the assertion that  for more than the last thousand years has been governed as a part of England and in a way indistinguishable from other parts of England:*It has been argued that Cornwall was absorbed into England rather than conquered.(Hastings, Adrian (1997) The construction of nationhood: ethnicity, religion, and nationalism (Cambridge))*Several English charters dating from before 1066 show the king of England exercising effective power in Cornwall as in any other part of their kingdom. For example, in 960 King Eadgar gave land in Tiwaernhel to one of his thanes.((Sawyer charters, #684))*From the mid-ninth century the Cornish Church acknowledged the jurisdiction of the of Canterbury, and in the 10th century the English king Athelstan created a diocese of Cornwall centred on St Germans. In 1050, King Eadward subsumed the diocese of Cornwall under that of Exeter.((Sawyer 1021))*In 1051, as noted above, Cornwall was granted with Devon, Somerset and Dorset to Odda, indicating that Cornwall had by then been integrated into the normal English system of local government.(* The Book, compiled in 1086, lists all territory in Great Britain under Norman control at that time, mostly listing individual manors grouped by county. Scotland is excluded, and so are nominally English areas then under Scottish control, such as Northumberland and most of Cumberland. Wales is also excluded, except for areas the Normans had managed to capture, such as Flintshire. Cornwall is not excluded, and, unlike, for example, the later Lancashire (parts of which were listed with Cheshire, other parts with Yorkshire) is given a listing in the normal Domesday county-based style.(Domesday Book: A Complete Translation, London, Penguin Books (2003) ISBN 9780141439945)*The records of the medieval eyres, the court sessions of the kings itinerant judges. Maitland FW (1888) Select pleas of the crown prints examples from Cornwall. The eyre records show Cornwall and England with common judicial arrangements from the police duties of tithings at the lowest level of administration to the highest itinerant courts.*Some say that before the creation of the Duchy, the assets of the Earl of Cornwall (including privileges such as bailiff rights, stannaries and wrecks) were subject to Crown escheat, as in the case of 2nd Earl of Cornwall (died 1300)(Calendarium Inquisitionum Post Mortem et Escaetarum published by command of King George III (1806)) However, records contained within the foreshore dispute papers show that entry into Cornwall for  the Kings Escheator was often barred on grounds that the Kings writ does not run in Cornwall.  For example, records of the Launceston Eyre of 1284 show Edmund successfully resisting the Kings attempted assertion of escheat rights over Cornwall. Edmunds advocate opened his plea with the words, my liege lord hols Corrnwall above the Lord King in Chief....so the Escheator of the Lord the King shall not intermeddle in anything belonging to the Sheriff of Cornwall.  That same year Edmund is confirmed as having right of wreck in Cornwall Regis Rolls 14 Edw.1 Easter No.99, M29d  Foreshore dispute papers. *The Rolls which inter alia record the King and his council governing Cornwall after the creation of the Dukedom in 1337. Examples are the inquiries into the use of the English-controlled port of Calais in 1474 (when officials of all counties, including Cornwall, were required to submit returns),(Calendar of the Patent Rolls: Edward IV, Henry VI, London, HMSO, 1900) the King granting licences to trade to people in Cornwall in 1364, the Duke of Cornwall complaining in 1371 to the Kings Council about offences by some local men in Cornwall, and in 1380 the Kings Council ordering the Sheriff of Cornwall to arrest and imprison an offender.* The 1337 charters describe Cornwall as a county, using the same word (comitatus) as that used to describe other counties such as Devon and Surrey.*Cornwall sent members to the of England from the late thirteenth century when that parliament originated.* Some national policies in the Middle Ages, such as the taxation of boroughs,(De tallagio in civitatibus etc., Patent Rolls, 6 Edward III (1332), in Foedera, volume 2 part 2 by Thomas Rymer (1821)- in which Cornwall is grouped with Devon, Somerset and Dorset) or the setting of prices for wool,(for example, De Proclamando, super pretio lanarum, Close Rolls, 17 Edward III (1343), in Foedera, volume 2 part 2 by Thomas Rymer (1821)) were applied on a county-by-county basis- including Cornwall.*Medieval taxes such as the Papal 1291 taxation, the 1377 poll tax and the tax for defence against the cruel malice of the Scots in 1496-7(The Statutes of the Realm, volume 2, printed by command of King George III (1816) pp 6445) include Cornwall among the other English counties.*The subsidies/taxes and musters of the Tudor period.*The grants of fairs and markets in Cornwall by the king; for example, Penzance in 1406.Modern day governmental positionCornwall is currently represented in the European Parliament within the South West England Parliament constituency, which also takes in Gibraltar.The (previous) government has said it will not be undertaking a review of the constitutional status of Cornwall and will not be changing the present status of the county; the justice minister, Michael Wills, replying to a question from Andrew George MP, stated that Cornwall is an administrative county of England, electing MPs to the UK Parliament, and is subject to UK legislation. It has always been an integral part of the Union. The Government have no plans to alter the constitutional status of Cornwall.(Commons Hansard, 6 October 2008 column 154W)Moves for recognition of legal autonomyThe Duchy of Cornwallthumb|200px|The banner of the Duchy of Cornwall.The duchy was established in 1337 out of the former earldom of Cornwall by Edward III of England for his son, Edward, Prince of Wales, the Black Prince, who became the first Duke of Cornwall. The Duke obtaining greater rights over Cornwall than the Earls had previously exercised. These increased powers over Cornwall included the right to appoint Sheriffs, vacantia, trove, a separate exchequer, and such forth. Most of these rights are still exercised by the Duchy. The Kilbrandon Report (1969&ndash;1971) into the British constitution recommends that, when referring to Cornwall, official sources should cite the Duchy not the County. This was suggested in recognition of its constitutional position.In 1780 Burke sought to curtail further the power of the Crown by removing the various principalities which existed. the five several distinct principalities besides the supreme . If you travel beyond Mount Edgcumbe, you find him king in his incognito, and he is duke of Cornwall . Thus every one of these principalities has the apparatus of a kingdom . Cornwall is the best of them.Some people, including Solidarity and the group claiming to be the Cornish Stannary Parliament, argue that Cornwall has a jure status apart as a sovereign Duchy extraterritorial to England. A commonly cited basis for this argument is a case of arbitration between the Crown and the Duchy of Cornwall (18561857) in which the Officers of the Duchy successfully argued that the Duchy enjoyed many of the rights and prerogatives of a palatine and that although the duke was not granted Royal Jurisdiction, was considered to be quasi-sovereign within his Duchy of Cornwall.The arbitration, as instructed by the Crown, was based on legal argument and documentation, led to the Cornwall Submarine Mines Act of 1858.  The Officers of the Duchy, based on its researches, made this submission:# That Cornwall, like Wales, was at the time of the Conquest, and was subsequently treated in many respects as distinct from England.# That it was held by the Earls of Cornwall with the rights and prerogative of a County Palatine, as far as regarded the Seignory or territorial dominion.# That the Dukes of Cornwall have from the creation of the Duchy enjoyed the rights and prerogatives of a County Palatine, as far as regarded seignory or territorial dominion, and that to a great extent by Earls.# That when the Earldom was augmented into a Duchy, the circumstances attending to its creation, as well as the language of the Duchy Charter, not only support and confirm natural presumption, that the new and higher title was to be accompanied with at least as great dignity, power, and prerogative as the Earls enjoyed, but also afforded evidence that the Duchy was to be invested with still more extensive rights and privileges.# The Duchy Charters have always been construed and treated, not merely by the Courts of Judicature, but also by the Legislature of the Country, as having vested in the Dukes of Cornwall the whole territorial interest and dominion of the Crown in and over the entire County of Cornwall.However, the term palatine appears not to have been used historically of Cornwall, and the duchy did not have as much autonomy as the County Palatine of Durham, which was ruled by the Prince-Bishop of Durham. However, whilst not specifically called a county palatine, the Officers of the Duchy made the observation (Duchy Preliminary Statement  Cornish Foreshore Dispute 1856): The Dukes also had their own escheators in Cornwall, and it is deserving of notice that in the saving clause of the Act of Escheators, 1 Henry VIII., c. 8, s. 5 (as is the case in numerous other acts of Parliament), the Duchy of Cornwall is classed with counties undoubtedly palatinate.The Stannaries and their revivalSince 1974, a group has claimed to be a revived Cornish Stannary Parliament and have the ancient right of Cornish tin-miners assemblies to veto legislation from Westminster. In 1977 the Cymru MP Wigley in Parliament asked the Attorney General for England and Wales if he would provide the date upon which enactments of the Charter of Pardon of 1508 were rescinded. The reply, received on 14 May 1977 and now held at the Library of Wales, stated that a Stannators right to veto Westminster legislation had never been formally withdrawn.(1977  The Stannators right to veto Westminster legislation is confirmed by Parliament)(Wigleys  question (on behalf of Kernow) is contained in Hansard vol 931 No. 97 p.115 3 May 1977 (parliamentary question no. 125). The written reply on 14 May 1977 from the Lord Chancellor ref. 3039/39 was deposited at the Library of Wales by Dafydd Wigley.)Moves for a change of constitutional statusImage:Celtic Nations.svg|thumb|250px|The Modern Celtic nations as recognised by the Celtic League and the Congress---- Campaigns for fuller regional autonomyAn early campaign for an independent Cornwall was put forward during the first Civil War by Richard Grenville, 1st Baronet. He tried to use Cornish particularist sentiment to gather support for the Royalist cause. The Cornish were fighting for their Royalist privileges, notably the Duchy and Stannaries and he put a plan to the Prince which would, if implemented, have created a semi-independent Cornwall.(Stoyle, Mark (2002) West Britons. Exeter: University of Exeter Press)In contrast to the arguments that Cornwall is already de jure autonomous, thanks to the Duchy and Stannary parliament, various ongoing political movements are seeking to change Cornwalls constitutional status. Kernow, for example, has for many years sought for Cornwall the position of a first-order (NUTS 1) EU region, which would put Cornwall on the same statistical level as Scotland, Wales, Ireland and the of England.In the same vein, the Constitutional Convention  composed of a number of political groups in Cornwall (including Mebyon Kernow)  gathered about 50,000 signatures in 2000 on a petition to create a Assembly resembling the Assembly for Wales. The petition was undertaken in the context of an ongoing debate on whether to devolve power to the English regions, of which Cornwall is currently part of the South West. Cornwall Councils Feb 2003 MORI poll showed 55% in favour of an elected, fully devolved regional assembly for Cornwall and 13% against. (Previous result: 46% in favour in 2002).(Give Cornwall what it wants)  However the same MORI poll indicated an equal number of respondents in favour of a South West Regional Assembly ).(http://72.14.235.132/search?qcache:_emuQ2wP2e4J:www.cornwall.gov.uk/index.cfm/index.cfm/index.cfm%3Farticleid%3D3142+%22mori+poll%22+%22cornwall+county+council%22+2003&cd1&hlen&ctclnk) The campaign had the support of all five Cornish Lib Dem MPs at the time, Kernow, and Cornwall Council. Whitty, as Parliamentary Under-Secretary of State at the Department of Environment, Transport and the Regions, in the of Lords, recognised that Cornwall has a special case for devolution.(of Lords debates, Wednesday, 21 March 2001, Devolution: England transcript of speech) and on a visit to Cornwall deputy Prime Minister John Prescott said Cornwall has the strongest regional identity in the UK.The Conservative and Unionist Party under Cameron appointed Prisk as Shadow Minister for Cornwall on 26 July 2007.() The party said that the move was aimed at putting Cornwalls concerns at the heart of Conservative thinking. However, the new coaliation government established in 2010 under Camerons leadership did not appoint a Minister for Cornwall.To some extent the moves for autonomy in Cornwall have often been tied up with cultural/linguistic revivalist organisations. Rosalie Eastlake in a 1981 paper suggested that::In each historic period, economic exploitation and cultural alienation succeeded one another, until the nineteenth century when the mining economy of Cornwall became an essential part of the English industrial system. The twentieth century offers either the prospect of total incorporation into England, or a cultural revival spearheaded by the several small, national and cultural organisations which now exist. (Eastlake, Rosalie (1981) Cornwall: The Development of a Celtic Periphery. Unpublished MA thesis University)Cornwalls distinctiveness as a national, as opposed to regional, minority has been periodically recognised by major British papers. For example, a Guardian editorial in 1990 pointed to these differences, and warned that they should be constitutionally recognised:: Smaller minorities also have equally proud visions of themselves as irreducibly Welsh, Irish, Manx or Cornish. These identities are distinctly national in ways which proud people from Yorkshire, much less proud people from Berkshire will never know. Any new constitutional settlement which ignores these factors will be built on uneven ground. (Guardian, editorial, 8 May 1990)The Guardian also carried an article in November 2008 titled Self-rule for Cornwall written by the human rights campaigner Tatchell.(): Like Wales and Scotland, Cornwall considers itself a separate Celtic nation  so why shouldnt it have independence?Tatchell concluded his article with the question...:Cornwall was once separate and self-governing. If the Cornish people want autonomy and it would improve their lives, why shouldnt they have self-rule once again? Malta, with only 400,000 people, is an independent state within the EU. Why not Cornwall?Cornish cultural, civic and ethnic nationalismWhile nearly all agree that Cornwall, along with Scotland, Wales and parts of England forms part of the British periphery in economic and social terms, some observers express surprise at enduring sentiments in Cornwall; Adrian Lee, for example, while considering Cornwall to be part of England, also considers it to have a unique status within England::The history of Cornwall as one of Englands peripheral areas is relatively little known, as is the fact that it is the only part of England to have given rise to and sustained a nationalist/autonomist movement that has been neither spurious nor ephemeral.(Lee, Adrian (1978) Cornwall: Aspects of Regionalism and Nationalism. Unpublished paper presented to the Workshop on Nationalist and Regionalist Movements in Western Europe, University (Glasgow), p13)Some people will, in addition to making the legal or constitutional arguments mentioned above, stress that the Cornish are a distinct ethnic group, that people in Cornwall typically refer to England as beginning east of the Tamar,() and that there is a language. For the first time in a UK Census, those wishing to describe their ethnicity as Cornish were given their own code number (06) on the 2001 UK Census form, alongside those for people wishing to describe themselves as English, Welsh, Irish or Scottish. About 34,000 people in Cornwall and 3,500 people in the rest of the UK wrote on their census forms in 2001 that they considered their ethnic group to be Cornish. This represented nearly 7% of the population of Cornwall and is therefore a significant phenomenon.() Although happy with this development, campaigners expressed reservations about the lack of publicity surrounding the issue, the lack of a clear tick-box for the Cornish option on the census and the need to deny being British in order to write Cornish in the field provided. There have been calls for the tick box option to be extended to the Cornish() for the 2011 Census,(Fight goes on to include Cornish ethnicity and language in census options) as a Welsh and English tick box option was recently agreed by the government.(Mebyon Kernow support the campaign for a Cornish tick-box on 2011 census)Conspiracy theoryThe Cornish conspiracy theory is claimed to be a long-running conspiracy by the English establishment to deprive people of their rights, identity and autonomy.() It is claimed that the main reason why the Cornish are being denied recognition of their identity is to prevent any public debate or official enquiry into the constitutional status of Cornwall regarding the of Cornwall, sometimes referred to as the Cornish Question.(Sandford, Mark (2002) The Cornish Question. London: Constitutional Unit, School of Public Policy, University College London) Cornish historians point to the fact that in 1508 the Charter of Pardon was granted by Henry VII to give Cornwall a legal right to its own Parliament with the power of veto over acts, statutes, laws, etc., passed by the Westminster government. These rights were granted in perpetuity and cannot be lawfully rescinded, but today are ignored by the government.(Sources of Cornish History  Charter of Pardon  1508)(Payton, Philip (1996) Cornwall. Fowey: Alexander Associates)In 1858 the Foreshore Case (a case of arbitration between Crown and the Duchy of Cornwall) confirmed that the of Cornwall, was considered to be a quasi-sovereign within the Duchy of Cornwall territory (Cornwall), but today the Duchy of Cornwall describes itself as a private estate which funds the public, charitable and private activities of the of Wales and his family. It is claimed that at some point after 1858, the officers of the Duchy, with the support of members of the UK Government, developed a plan to portray the Duchy of Cornwall as a private estate.()More recently in 2007 the Cornish were the only UK ethnic/cultural group and indigenous minority to be specifically mentioned for exclusion from the Convention for the Protection of National Minorities by the British government.()()* The Proceedings Act 1947 Section 40, 2g, gives the heir to the throne, the of Cornwall, the authority to control or otherwise intervene in proceedings that affect his rights, property and profits.(The Crown Proceedings Act (1947))* The 1971 Kilbrandon Report into the British constitution recommended that, when referring to Cornwall  official sources should cite the Duchy not the County  this was suggested in recognition of its constitutional position.()* In 1977 Cymru MP Wigley received confirmation in Parliament that the Stannators right to veto Westminster legislation is still valid.(14 May 1977  Cornwall Council  Stannators right to veto Westminster legislation had never been formally withdrawn.)(Reference  Library of Wales, Aberystwyth, where Wigley deposited his papers in 1978)* In July 1997 Andrew George MP attempted to raise a question concerning the Duchy of Cornwall in the House of Commons but was prevented from doing so by an injunction that disallows MPs raising any questions in Parliament that are in any way related to the Duchy. The injunction prevents MPs asking questions regarding the role, rights, powers and privileges of the Dukes of Cornwall in Cornwall  reference Tamar Bridge Act 1998, s.41 and letter from the House of Commons Library to Andrew George MP, dated 16 July  1997.()()* On 12 December 2001 a petition with 50,000 signatures was presented to Downing Street in favour of more autonomy for Cornwall  a Assembly  so far this has not been implemented by the Government.()* In June 2005 the government allocated 80,000 per year for three years of direct central government funding to the language. Although pleased with this development, Cornish language speakers point to the fact that during the same period for example the Ulster Scots dialect is being allocated 1,000,000 per year of direct government funding.()* The National History Curriculum officially starts with the Roman period, rather than earlier civilisations without their own written records, such as the Celts.()(Institute of Cornish Historical Studies)* In 2007 it was announced by the for National Statistics that a Cornish tick box would be refused on the next 2011 Census because insufficient requirement for the data had been expressed by Census users and national identity and ethnicity questions will contain tick boxes only for the largest groups*. This is despite the fact that other groups such as Travellers for example are recognised on the form and the Cornish had previously been allocated the ethnic code of 06 for the 2001 Census  ref. Kingdom Census 2001 Ethnic Codes.(Cornwall Council  importance of Cornish ethnicity and language included by the ONS)* There has been official Government (Treasury) approval for the leasing of Cornish heritage sites such as Castle by the commercial Duchy of Cornwall to the state subsidised organisation known as Heritage.() On January 18, 2002, at Truro Crown Court, three members of the Cornish Stannary Parliament attempted to raise issues regarding the history of the Duchy of Cornwall, but were prevented from doing so when a Interest Immunity certificate (gagging order) was presented to the court by the Prosecution Service.()See also*sentiment*charters applying to Cornwall*of topics related to Cornwall* Wiktionary definitions for Cornish, Nation and ethnic groupReferences External links * The Cornish Stannary Parliament*Maps of Cornwall on h2g2*The Cornish Assembly  Senedh Kernow* This is not Cornwall (in Cornish)* The Cornish: A Neglected Nation?
1478364
Diavik_Diamond_Mine
The Diavik Diamond Mine is a diamond mine in the Slave Region of the Territories, Canada, about  north of Yellowknife.()It has become an important part of the regional economy, employing 700, grossing C$100 million in sales, and producing 8 million carats () of diamonds annually. The area was surveyed in 1992 and construction began in 2001, with production commencing in January 2003. It is connected by an ice road and Airport with a  gravel runway regularly accommodating 737 jet aircraft.The mine is owned by a venture between the Winston Diamond Corporation and Diavik Diamond Mines Inc., a subsidiary of Tinto Group. The lifespan of the mine is expected to be 16 to 22 years.The mine consists of three pipes associated with the de Gras kimberlite field and is located on an island  in de Gras and is informally called East Island. It is about  south of the Circle.In 2006 the road from Yellowknife to the Diavik mine, and neighbouring mines, froze late and thawed early.()The Diavik mine was unable to truck in all the supplies needed for the rest of 2006 before the road closed and arrangements had to be made to bring the remainder of the supplies in by air.On July 5, 2007 a consortium of seven mining companies, including Rio Tinto, announced they are sponsoring environmental impact studies to construct a deep-water port in Inlet.()()Their plans include building a  road connecting the port to their mines. The port would serve vessels of up to 25,000 tonnes.In March 2010, underground mining began at the mine. The transition from open pit to underground mining is expected to be completed by 2012.()See also*Diamond Mine*Lake Diamond MineReferencesFurther reading*Field guide to Diavik Diamond Mine, written by mine staff for 2003 International Kimberlite Conference. Includes geology, maps and photos.* Chapter 17. Diamond Exploration  Ekati and Diavik Mines, Canada by Charles J. Moon (Google Books preview )in Charles J. Moon, M. K. G. Whateley, Anthony M. Evans, Introduction to Mineral Exploration, 2nd Edition. 2006,Wiley-Blackwell. ISBN 978-1405113175.:*Figures and captions from Chapter 17 are available at publishers siteExternal links*Diavik Diamond Mine, official website*Diavik Diamond Mine article at mining-technology.com*1991 Discovery of Diamonds in the NWT*Photos of Diavik Mine at Google Imagesde:Diavik-Diamantenminede diamants Diavikja:
1483029
Brendon_Hills
 easiest_route  The Brendon Hills are composed of a lofty ridge of hills in the Lyn Valley area of western Somerset, England. The terrain is broken by a series of deeply incised streams and rivers running roughly southwards to meet the Haddeo, a tributary of the Exe.()The hills are quite heavily cultivated unlike their neighbouring upland areas of Exmoor and the Hills. Over the centuries they have been mined for minerals, notably ironstone from which iron is extracted for making steel.() During the 19th century this activity reached a peak with the Somerset Mineral Railway, including an  incline, being built to take the ore to Watchet from where it was sent to Vale for smelting. The main mining operations ended when the mines were worked out towards the end of the 19th century. The hills merge level into the eastern side of Exmoor, and they are included within the National Park. The highest point on the hills is Lype Hill at  above sea level  the range meets Exmoor.The highest point on the ridge itself is . Both points are marked by Survey points and are located within enclosed farmland.The hills are on the route of the Way. References HillsHills
1485502
Ralph_Henstock
Ralph Henstock (June 2, 1923 &ndash; January 17, 2007) was an English mathematician and author. As an Integration theorist, he is notable for integral. Henstock brought the theory to a highly developed stage without ever having encountered Kurzweils 1957 paper on the subject.Early lifeHe was born in the coal-mining village of Nottinghamshire, the only child of mineworker and former coalminer William Henstock and Mary Ellen Henstock (ne Bancroft). On the Henstock side he was descended from 17th century  Flemish immigrants called Hemstok.Because of his early academic promise it was expected that Henstock would attend University where his father and uncle had received technical education, but as it turned out he won scholarships which enabled him to study mathematics at Johns College, Cambridge from October 1941 until November 1943, when he was sent for war service to the of Supplys department of Statistical Method and Quality Control in London. This work did not satisfy him, so he enrolled at Birkbeck College, London where he joined the weekly seminar of Professor Paul Dienes which was then a focus for mathematical activity in London. Henstock wanted to study series but Dienes prevailed upon him to get involved in the theory of integration, thereby setting him on course for his lifes work.A devoted Methodist, the lasting impression he made was one of gentle sincerity and amiability. Henstock married Marjorie Jardine in 1949. Their son John was born July 10 1952. Ralph Henstock died on January 17 2007 after a short illness.WorkHe was awarded the Cambridge B.A. in 1944 and began research for the PhD in London, which he gained in December 1948 with a thesis entitled Interval Functions and their Integrals, an extension of J. C. Burkills theory. His Ph.D. examiners were Burkill and H. Kestelman. In 1947 he returned briefly to Cambridge to complete the undergraduate mathematical studies which had been truncated by his Ministry of Supply work.Most of Henstocks work was concerned with integration. From initial studies of the Burkill and Ward integrals he formulated an integration process whereby the domain of integration is suitably partitioned for sums to approximate the integral of a function. His methods led to an integral on the real line that was very similar in construction and simplicity to the integral but which included the integral and, in addition, allowed non-absolute convergence.These ideas were developed from the late 1950s. Independently, Jaroslav Kurzweil developed a similar Riemann-type integral on the real line. The resulting integral is now known as the integral. On the real line it is equivalent to the integral, but has a simpler definition.In the following decades, Henstock developed extensively the distinctive features of his theory, inventing the concepts of division spaces or integration bases to demonstrate in general settings the properties and characteristics of mathematical integration. His theory provides a unified approach to non-absolute integral, as different kinds of Henstock integral, choosing an appropriate integration basis (division space, in Henstocks own terminology). It has been used in differential and integral equations, harmonic analysis, probability theory and Feynman integration. Numerous monographs and texts have appeared since 1980 and there have been several conferences devoted to the theory. It has been taught in standard courses in mathematical analysis.Henstock was author of 46 journal papers in the period 1946 to 2006. He published four books on analysis (Theory of Integration, 1963; Linear Analysis, 1967; Lectures on the Theory of Integration, 1988; and The General Theory of Integration, 1991). He wrote 171 reviews for MathSciNet. In 1994 he was awarded the Andy Prize of the XVIII Summer Symposium in Real Analysis. His academic career began as Assistant Lecturer, College for Women, 1947-48; then Assistant Lecturer at Birkbeck, 1948-51; Lecturer, University Belfast, 1951-56; Lecturer, University, 1956-60; Senior Lecturer and Reader, Queens University Belfast, 1960-64; Reader, University, 1964-70; Chair of Pure Mathematics, University of Ulster, 1970-88; and Leverhulme Fellow 1988-91. List of publications of Ralph Henstock Much of Henstocks earliest work was published by the Journal of the London Mathematical Society. These were On interval functions and their integrals I (21, 1946) and II  (23, 1948); The efficiency of matrices for series (22, 1947); The efficiency of matrices for sequences (25, 1950); The efficiency of convergence  factors for functions of a continuous real variable (30, 1955); A new description of the Ward integral (35 1960); and The integrability of functions of interval functions (39 1964). His works, published in Proceedings of the Mathematical Society, were Density integration (53, 1951); On the measure of sum sets (I) The theorems of Brunn, Minkowski, and Lusternik, (with A.M. McBeath) (3 3, 1953); Linear functions with domain a real countably infinite dimensional space (3 5, 1955); Linear and bilinear functions with domain contained in a real countably infinite dimensional space (3 6, 1956); The use of convergence factors in Ward integration (3 10, 1960); The equivalence of generalized forms of the Ward, variational, Denjoy-Stieltjes, and Perron-Stieltjes integrals (3 10, 1960); N-variation and N-variational integrals of set functions (3 11, 1961); Definitions of Riemann type of the variational integrals (3 11, 1961); Difference-sets and the theorem (3 13, 1963); Generalized integrals of vector-valued functions (3 19 1969)His additional papers were#Sets of uniqueness for trigonometric series and integrals, Proceedings of the Philosophical Society 46 (1950) 538-548.#On Wards Perron-Stieltjes integral, Canadian Journal of Mathematics 9 (1957) 96-109.#The summation by convergence factors of Laplace-Stieltjes integrals outside their half plane of convergence, Mathematische Zeitschrift 67 (1957) 10-31.#Theory of Integration, Butterworths, London, 1962.#theorems for integrals, Canadian Journal of Mathematics 15 (1963) 433-439.#Majorants in variational integration, Canadian Journal of Mathematics 18 (1966) 49-74.#A Riemann-type integral of Lebesgue power, Canadian  Journal of Mathematics 20 (1968) 79-87.#Linear Analysis, Butterworths, London, 1968.#Integration by parts, Aequationes Mathematicae 9 (1973) 1-18.#The N-variational integral and the Schwarz distributions III, Journal of the London Mathematical Society (2) 6 (1973) 693-700.#Integration in product spaces, including Wiener and Feynman integration, Proceedings of the London Mathematical Society (3) 27 (1973) 317-344.#Additivity and the Lebesgue limit theorems, The Greek Mathematical Society C. Caratheodory Symposium, 1973, 223-241, (published 1974).#Integration, variation and differentiation in division spaces, Proceedings of the Royal Irish Academy, Series A (10) 78 (1978) 69-85.#The variation on the real line, Proceedings of the Royal Irish Academy, Series A (1) 79 (1979) 1-10.#Generalized Riemann integration and an intrinsic topology, Canadian Journal of Mathematics 32 (1980) 395-413.#Division spaces, vector-valued functions and backwards martingales, Proceedings of the Royal Irish Academy, Series A (2) 80 (1980) 217-232.#Density integration and Walsh functions, Bulletin of the Malaysian Mathematical Society (2) 5 (1982) 1-19.#A problem in two-dimensional integration, Journal of the Australian Mathematical Society, (Series A) 35 (1983) 386-404.#The Lebesgue syndrome, Real Analysis Exchange   9 (1983-84) 96-110.#The reversal of power and integration, Bulletin of the Institute of Mathematics and its Applications 22 (1986) 60-61.#Lectures on the Theory of Integration, World Scientific, Singapore, 1988.#A short history of integration theory, South East Asian Bulletin of Mathematics 12  (1988) 75-95.#Introduction to the new integrals, New integrals (Coleraine, 1988), 7-9, Lecture Notes in Mathematics, 1419, Springer-Verlag,  Berlin,  1990.#Integration in infinite-dimensional spaces, New integrals (Coleraine, 1988), 54-65, Lecture Notes in Mathematics, 1419, Springer-Verlag,  Berlin,  1990.#Stochastic and other functional integrals, Real Analysis Exchange 16 (1990/91) 460-470.#The General Theory of Integration, Oxford Mathematical Monographs, Clarendon Press, Oxford, 1991.#The integral over product spaces and Wieners formula, Real Analysis Exchange   17 (1991/92) 737-744.#Infinite decimals, Mathematica Japonica 38 (1993) 203-209.#Measure spaces and division spaces, Real Analysis Exchange 19 (1993/94) 121-128.#The construction of path integrals, Mathematica Japonica 39 (1994) 15-18.#Gauge or Kurzweil-Henstock integration. Proceedings of the Prague Mathematical Conference 1996, 117-122, Icaris, Prague, 1997.#De La Valle Poussins contributions to integration theory, Charles-Jean de La Valle Poussin Oeuvres Scientifiques, Volume II, Acadmie Royale de Belgique, Circolo Matematico di Palermo, 2001, 3-16.#Partitioning infinite-dimensional spaces for generalized Riemann integration, (with P. Muldowney and V.A. Skvortsov) Bulletin of the London Mathematical Society, 38 (2006) 795-803. Review of Henstocks work The journal Scientiae Mathematicae Japonicae published a special commemorative issue in his honor, January 2008. The above article is copied, with permission, from Real Analysis Exchange and from Scientiae Mathematicae Japonicae. The latter contains the following review of Henstocks work:1. Ralph Henstock, an obituary, by P. Bullen.2. Ralph Henstock: research summary, by E. Talvila.3. The integral  la Henstock, by Lee P.Y.4. The natural integral on the real line, by B. Thomson.5. Ralph Henstocks influence on integration theory, by W.F. Pfeffer.6. Henstock on random variation, by P. Muldowney.7. Henstock integral in harmonic analysis, by V.A. Skvortsov.8. Convergences on the Henstock-Kurzweil integral, by S. Nakanishi.See also*of an interval*function References * * *  Whole Number 247*Henstock
1489337
Western_Thailand
thumb|upright|right|Western Thailand according to the six-region grouping systemWestern Thailand  is a region of Thailand bordering Myanmar on the west and Thailand on the east.GeographyThailands long mountainous border with Myanmar continues south from Thailand into Western Thailand following the Tenasserim Hills. This narrow region stretches from Bangkoks outer reaches to the border with Myanmar and from the Hills in the north to Province in the south.The geography of the western region of Thailand is characterised by high mountains and steep river valleys. Western Thailand hosts much of Thailands less-disturbed forest areas. Water and minerals are also important natural resources; the region is home to many of the countrys major dams, and mining is an important industry in the area. Many of the village names in Western Thailand rely heavily on the physical geography of the region.(Surajitlak Deepadung, Toponyms in the Western Region of Thailand)Administrative divisionsAccording to the six geographical regions established by the National Research Council of Thailand, the Western region includes the following provinces:#Kanchanaburi ()#Phetchaburi ()#Prachuap Khiri Khan ()#Ratchaburi ()#Tak, ()See also*of Thailand*HillsNotes(()
1491048
George_Washington_Emery_Dorsey
George Washington Emery Dorsey (January 25, 1842  June 12, 1911) was a Representative to the States Congress from Nebraska. BiographyDorsey was born in County, Virginia and moved with his parents to Preston County, Virginia (now Virginia) in 1856. He attended private schools and Oak Hill Academy.During the Civil War, he recruited a volunteer company and entered the Army in August 1861 as a first lieutenant in the Regiment West Virginia Infantry. He was subsequently promoted to captain and major for meritorious service and was mustered out with the Army of the Shenandoah in August 1865. Dorsey moved to Nebraska in 1866 and studied law. He was admitted to the bar and commenced practice in 1869. He engaged in banking and served as vice president of the State board of agriculture. He was chairman of the Republican State central committee and was elected as a Republican to the Forty-ninth, Fiftieth, and Fifty-first Congresses (March 4, 1885&ndash;March 3, 1891). He served as chairman of the Committee on Banking and Currency (Fifty-first Congress) and was an unsuccessful candidate for reelection in 1890 to the Fifty-second Congress. He engaged in mining enterprises in Nevada and Utah.Dorsey died in Lake City, Utah and was buried in the City Cemetery, Fremont, County, Nebraska. See alsoReferences* Retrieved on 2008-10-13Washington Emery Dorsey
1493656
Thabazimbi
footnotes               Thabazimbi is an iron mining town in the Limpopo province of Africa. The town is situated at the feet of the Ysterberg and is surrounded by the Witfonteinrand and Boshofberg with the majestic Kransberg in the background. The name Thabazimbi means mountain of iron because of the large ore reef that was discovered in 1919 by J.H. Williams. The mine boasts one of the largest shafts in Africa. More than 2 million tons of ore are mined every year and hauled by train to Mittals iron and steel works. The railway line from Rustenburg reached the area in the 1930s and full scale iron and steel production began. The town was proclaimed in 1953. Kumba Iron Ore, previously Resources, is now the principal operator of the iron ore mine.The National Park about 20 km north-east of the town and situated in the heart of Mountains characterised by contrasting mountain landscapes, hills and valleys, as well a variety of wildlife. Marakele National Park is also the home of some of the Elephants that were caught up in controversy in 1999 involving cruelty in South Africa.In the post-apartheid era, the town made headlines in 2003 as the site of Staaldraad, the Springboks infamous training camp prior to the Rugby World Cup. The excesses of Kamp Staaldraad helped lead to an almost complete housecleaning of the upper administrative levels of South African union. External links *Thabazimbi Online Portal*Local Newspaper: Die Kwvol *Sanparks Site: Marakele Park*Kumba Resourcesaf:Thabazimbiru:
1495469
Mariposa_(fictional_town)
Mariposa is a fictional Canadian town created by Leacock as the setting for a series of short stories. They were originally commissioned by Montreal Star newspaper and later collected and published in one volume as Sketches of a Little Town. Since then, many attempts have been made to expand the canon, present it in a different form or make reference to it.Although the author publicly denied it, the town is closely modelled on the very real town of Ontario and its inhabitants. He named it after one or more nearby communities, which had borne versions of that name in real life, which have since become extinct: Mariposa Township and Mariposa unincorporated place, and Mariposa Beach. Leacock was a professor of economy at University in Montreal, Quebec, but he had a summer home at Old Brewery Bay. The names of the characters in the stories were altered to avoid potential libel lawsuits when the stories were published in book form in 1912.The remainder of this article will provide information on Mariposa in the form of a regular geographic entry as if it really existed, with references to the facts associated with the non-fictional models.GeographyMariposa, Ontario, nicknamed Hull Town, is situated between Lake Ossawippi and Lake Wissanotti (modelled on Couchiching and Simcoe, although with features that radically depart from both). The Ossawippi River joins these two lakes, and the Lower Ossawippi River feeds into the northern end of Lake Wissanotti. The community is located on the Shield and hence the soil is rocky and supports mostly slow-growing evergreen trees. Politically, Mariposa is located in Missinaba County (modelled on Simcoe County and possibly taking its name from the Missinaibi River near Ontario) which was surveyed in a grid pattern. The town is the metropolis of surrounding rural Tecumseh Township (modelled on Tecumseth Township in Simcoe County), from which it was created in the 19th century, and serves as the judicial district but not county seat. It is only one hundred miles north of the provincial metropolis (modelled on Toronto).DemographicsThe official census conducted by the federal government lists a population of about five thousand, not counting outlying districts such as Tecumseh Corners, Nichols Corners, Third Concession and Fourth Concession. Other ordinarily reliable sources, including the local agent for the collection of Ontarios vital statistics and the towns two newspapers, estimate that the population is as high as nearly ten thousand.  The ethnic origins of most residents are from the Isles, the descendants of whom have overwhelmed the indigenous Missinabi population. Major sources of in migration are the provinces, northern Ontario and Massachusetts. Major destinations of out migration, especially for educational and economic reasons, are the nearby provincial metropolis.  Mariposans follow diverse Christian denominations according to their ethnic origins, but the Anglicans are clearly most dominant, followed in no particular order by Presbyterians, Salvationists,  Methodists and Catholics. Mallory Thomkins of the Times-Herald newspaper is the only outspoken agnostic or atheist.EconomyThere are several sectors of the economy, and each will be discussed in turn.Primary industry and agricultureMariposa was attractive to its first inhabitants as a source of primary industries. Swampy areas near the Ossawippi River and nearby shallow reedy areas on Lake Wissanotti itself provided excellent homes for waterfowl and excellent killing grounds for duck hunters. Both fowl and human feasted on abundant bass, chub and the native maskinonge (piscis mariposis) fish.The townsite was occupied by pine and hemlock woods and its reduced remains still ring the town. Choice hardwoods like elm and maple are south of Marpiosa, while north of town are tamarack and willow. Although Mariposa is south of Spanish River lumber country, it still maintains a planing factory or sawmill on the lakeshore near the railway siding and every spring there is a huge influx of rough lumbermen.In the immediate vicinity of Mariposa, there are some fair crop farms, but in the extremities of Tecumseh Township and Missinaba County, forbidding rocks, fetid swamps and dense forests of the north country of the Canadian or Laurentian Shield make the soil large scale cultivation of grains or fruits impractical. Livestock farming is somewhat more successful, and the Mariposa Packing Company is always kept busy.Secondary industry, commerce and financeExcluding the sawmill, there is very little industry in town, notably only the Mariposa Carriage Co. This may be partly explained by the erratic nature of the distribution of hydro-electric power generated by the dam on the Lower Ossiwipi River nineteen miles (30 km) north at the rapids.Only on official occasions is the forty or so foot wide bustling downtown thoroughfare of Mariposa called by its proper name, Missinaba Street (after the county and based on Mississaga Street in Orillia), rather than Main Street. Among the many shops there are Pharmaceutical Hall (Jim Eliots drug store), Pete Glover and Alf McNichols co-located hardware and paint stores and Ed Moores photo shop. Similarly, services downtown include lawyers, doctors, dentists, Jefferson Jeff Thorpes barbershop and, when it is all over, Golgotha Ginghams funeral home.Mariposa boasts two branches of major banks: the Commercial Bank (modelled on what is now the Imperial Bank of Commerce) and the Exchange Bank (modelled on what is now the Bank of Canada). Robertsons Coal and Wood Office was divided to serve as Mariposa Mining Exchange during the investment boom in junior mining companies. Thorpe earned 5312% profit after investing in Northern Star mine in northern Ontario. Trying to continue his financial success, he invested his profits in the Cuban Land Development Company whose corporate headquarters was a P.O. box in New York City. Unfortunately, police discovered this to be a fraud and Thorpe lost not only his own money but undertook to repay Mariposans whom he had help to invest in the dubious scheme.TourismIn recent years, tourism has become the backbone of the town as city folk take the short train trip north. Town architecture is preserved and enhanced, mainly through the activity of hotelier Josh Smith who not only rebuilt and expanded his own property but also replaced the faade of the Anglican church.Smiths hotel has long been a fixture of the town, and when he bought it around 1908. The hotel has borne many names both before and after his acquisition of it, in approximate order: the Royal Hotel, the Queens Hotel, the Alexandria Hotel, Smiths Ladies and Gents (sic) Caf, Smiths Summer Pavilion, Smiths Tourists Emporium, Smiths Northern Health Resort, Smiths Northern Health Resort and Home of the Wissanotti Angler, and Smiths British Arms.  Clearly, Josh Smith dominates the hospitality industry, but visitors may also stay at the Continental Hotel, operated by Pete Robinson, or Mariposa House, containing a billiard room. There are also seven short-stay cottages located along Lake Wissanotti.CommunicationsAlthough it is a small town located in a rural county, Mariposa maintains close connections with the rest of Ontario, Canada and the world. The downtown office, with Alf Trelawney as its postmaster, served impartially under Liberal government of Mackenzie as well as the Conservative government of A. Macdonald.The town took to advanced technology very early, having a telephone exchange staffed with four women operators in 1912. The telegraph office, operated by Billy Rawson, linked Mariposa by telegraph wires along Main Street to the nearby county seat (modelled on Barrie) and the provincial metropolis.For such a small town, the fourth estate is amply represented by two widely read newspapers (modelled on the Orillia Packet-Times and the Owen Sound Sun-Times). The Mariposa Newspacket supports the Conservative Party and its editor wears his blue temperance ribbon of the Knights of Pythias. The Mariposa Times-Herald supports the Liberal Party and its editor published the famous partisan screed from Patriotus Canadiensis. TransportationMariposa has good transportation networks. Rail transit is provided by the transcontinental trains which roll through the town, usually at night. Unfortunately, scruffy miners and coiffed millionaires from the city rarely stop to offload or load. For that, one must board the Mariposa Local which links the town to the city one hundred miles to the south. Once commercial travellers from the city arrive from the 6:30 a.m. express train, or before they wish to leave the Main Street hotel strip to catch the 5:30 p.m. train to the city, they take the hotel shuttle into downtown. Otherwise, there is no carrier transit in town so even bank employees use their feet or bicycles.Since 1972, the stationary dining cars of the  Ossawippi Express have served as a reminder of the areas proud railway history, and given residents and visitors a classy place to eat out.Mariposa Belle was the name of its notoriously unseaworthy steamship which cruised at . Its only scheduled departures from the wharf built by the federal government were for scenic cruises on May 24 and July 1 (that is, Day and Day). Many locals and visitors took chartered day excursions twenty miles (32 km) north to Indian Island (modelled on Island reserve on Lake Simcoe and Chiefs Island of the Rama Indian Reserve on Lake Couchiching) on Lake Wissanotti. Locals groups, including Knights of Pythias and Sons of Temperance, also take day trips to local option dry townships in Missinaba County.In 1987, a new paddlewheeled cruise ship also called Mariposa Belle began operating in Toronto. In contrast to its namesake, conspicuous and considerable consumption of food and alcohol is the sole purpose of this ship.Government and servicesJudicial oversight is provided by Judge Philip Pepperleigh, a staunch Conservative, has sat on the bench of the Mariposa Court House for years since emigrating from the Maritimes. Sometimes, it seems more like judicial oversight when he ignores the arguments of Macartney, the prosecuting (i.e., Crown) attorney. For example, Pepperleigh acquitted his own son for hitting a prominent Liberal and fined publican Josh Smith for not opening his bar after hours to accommodate His Honour.The greatest threat to public safety is fire, so the volunteer fire brigade was organized by townsmen. Its lone fire engine is parked at the Fire Hall at the main intersection, and both are funded by proceeds of the Firemens Ball held each winter.  The only other safety and health organizations in town are the marine life station on Lake Wissanotti and the Mariposa Hospital. The formers 14-man Mackinaw rescue boat was rescued by the Mariposa Belle when both sank. The latters source of income is almost exclusively public subscription.However, the greatest source of the threat to public safety proved to be Josh Smith, de facto chief of the volunteer fire department. Witnesses told detectives brought up from Toronto that they saw Smith in suspicious circumstances before a fire destroyed the debt-ridden Anglican church and that only later did he return to organize the fire fighting effort. Nonetheless, Judge Pepperleigh acquitted Smith of arson and fraud.Other minor officialdom is stabled at the county seat, where the Licence Commissioners grant or withdraw liquor licences based in part on the adherence to an 11 p.m. last call. Undertaker Golgotha Gingham doubles as the provincially appointed collector of vital statistics.Public education is directed by the School Board which operates several schools in the township (e.g., Tecumseh Corners School House and Concession School House) and one school. Mariposa High School offers a full spectrum of instruction including English literature, drama, music and biology. The Mariposa Mechanics Institute, blessed with Gallagher collection donated by one of the towns most learned men, provides adults with opportunities for self-education and continuing education.PoliticsMunicipal politics are normally sedate, with several leading members of the council and community such as businessman Pete Glover taking turns annually as mayor. The only incumbent known outside the town was Harry J. Boyle, concurrently the chairman of the CBC in 1967. The only moderately controversial feature of municipal politics is the local option on Prohibition, which even temperance organizations sometimes find inconvenient. However, normally staid federal politics become very important and divisive at election time. Religious solidarity is torn apart. The Rev. Mr. Rupert Drone, the Anglican priest, preaches the Conservative message from his pulpit despite the fact his brother Edward Drone ran as an Independent on an anti-corruption platform. Likewise the Presbyterian minister supports the Conservative Party regardless of the fact that twenty-year veteran Liberal MP John Henry Bagshaw is a co-religionist and is seen as a supporter of that community.Professional solidarity is also rent asunder, as Judge Pepperleigh is a Conservative, Dr. Gallagher is a Liberal and Dr. Joe Milligan is a Conservative. Business solidarity is also rather tenuous. The Continental Hotel is used as Conservative election headquarters while Mariposa House is used by the Liberals. Prior to the 1911 election, Josh Smith maintained his hotel as a politically multi-partisan (or Independent-Liberal-Conservative-Imperialist) place.After Smith won his liquor licence back, he gained political favour by operating the best hotel in town and donating $100 to each of the established political parties, the Mariposa Hospital and other worthy charities. He paid the touring amusement ride operator enough cash so that all children could ride for free that day.Based on his growing popularity, Smith unexpectedly became the conservative candidate in the federal election of 1911. The main election issues were reciprocity and Naval Service, but Smith deftly sat on the fence on these issues. He deftly deflected all the mud the incumbent MP slung his way, and through deft manipulation of the mob mentality and telecommunications Smith achieved an electoral upset by defeating Bagshaw. He was, however, silent in victory.Culture and entertainmentCulture and entertainment are intimately entwined in Mariposa. They are organized mainly along religious denominational lines but also in secular fraternal and civic societies, so these two components will be treated separately.Religious culture and entertainmentThe dominant religion is Anglicanism, and the Church of England Church (as it is locally known) is the venue for most Anglican pastimes Its programs include the Mothers Auxiliary, the Girls Auxiliary, the Infants School, the Book Club, the Bible Study Class, a choir, and Willing Workers of the Church of England and its youth wing the Early Workers Guild. Dean Drone has served the church since about 1870, but his financial acumen is dubious. When he tore down the original stone church and erected a wooden replacement, the debt crushed the congregation. The Whirlwind Campaign designed to retire debt achieved only 0.04% of its ambitious $250,000 goal. The lay leadership including Gingham, Nivens and Mullins forced Drone to accept a curate to take over most of his duties, except the Infants School.Protestants are also active on the Mariposa cultural and religious scene. The Salvation Army conducts its street ministry at the main intersection downtown, and solicits funds as Smiths Hotel even though it is the watering hole in town. The Methodist Social has poetry readings, and the Presbyterian Church will even accept Anglicans like Zena Pepperleigh, the district judges daughter, as curious visitors to its divine services.Roman Catholics understandably keep a low profile in town, since every July 12 the Orangemens Parade is celebrated by Mariposans with flourish. St. Patricks Day, St. Andrews Day, St. Georges Day, Independence Day and  July 1 are also popularly celebrated. Despite the overt activity of the Orangemen, Catholics hold an annual summer picnic at which the Salvation Army band plays. Anglicans are also known to drop in on Catholic masses, but only in the city where their attendance is anonymous and will not lead to social complications.Secular culture and entertainmentIn addition to overt or primarily religious organizations operating directly as part of the diverse Christian denominations of Mariposa, there are many secular or ecumenical organizations the civic-minded resident may join. The Young Mens Christian Association offers a physical and spiritual outlet for Mariposians, especially those like bank clerk Peter Pupkin who moved to the town from away.Organized amateur sports are very popular in Mariposa. One may join the Ball Club, Lacrosse Club, Curling Club, Mariposa Canoe Club, Shoe Club, and the Mariposa Tennis Club (behind Dr. Gallaghers house). Foot races are organized on Indian Island during Mariposa Belle excursions. Sleigh riding , sport fishing and duck hunting are also very popular solitary or small group pastimes.Music and dancing are incorporated into many secular activities, since these are often very circumscribed if not outright banned in a religious environment (except for the Salvation Army, which makes music a central part of its ministry). The uniformed town band, with at least ten members, plays its coronets every Wednesday in the municipal park. The Mariposa Quartette, the Oddfellows Brass Band and the Knights of Pythias  band are also active. The fundraising Firemens Ball is the highlight of the winter social season, eclipsing even the Oyster Supper of Knights of Pythias.The usual fraternal societies were active in the town: Freemasons, Oddfellows, Foresters. More regional or local cross-denominational or secular organizations are: Knights of Pythias (which has Dean Drone as chaplain), Sons of Temperance (whose members sometimes stray) and Girls Friendly Society (since they are barred from the Pythians).References and external links*Andrew, Allan. (prod.) Sunshine Sketches of a Little Town, Stage 47. December 1, 1946. Broadcasting Corporation (CBC), Toronto.* Ferris, Ina. The Face in the Window: Sunshine Sketches Reconsidered, Studies in Canadian Literature. 1978. University of New Brunswick, Fredericton.* Katz, Stephen. (Prod. and dir.) The Great Mariposa Train Robbery, Morningside. March 17, 1989. CBC, Toronto.* Leacock, Stephen. Sketches of a Little Town. Ms. Library and Archives Canada still images and compendia.* Leacock, Stephen. Sunshine Sketches of a Little Town. 1912. Bell and Cockburn, Toronto. Republished various times, among them ISBN 0-7710-9984-3, ISBN 1-896133-34-7, ISBN 1-55111-178-0 and ISBN 1-894003-20-9.* Leacock, Stephen. Sunshine Sketches of a Little Town. Gutenberg Project electronic version* Leacock, Stephen. Sunshine Sketches of a Little Town. LiteratureClassics.com electronic version* Legate, David M. Stephen Leacock: A Biography. 1970. Doubleday, Toronto. Especially pp. 61-64.*Ossawippi Express. 1972-. Railway car restaurant, Orillia.* Packet & Times. 1874-. Newspaper, Orillia. * Rae, Johnny. (Prod.) The Hero of Mariposa, CBC Wednesday Night. March 31, 1954. CBC, Toronto.* Tweed, Tommy. (Prod.) The Great Election, CBC Wednesday Night. March 9, 1949. CBC, Toronto.* Tweed, Tommy. (Prod.) The Hostelry of Mr. Smith, CBC Wednesday Night. Nov. 30, 1949. CBC, Toronto.
1499085
Gregory_Highway
The Gregory Highway is a state highway in Queensland that serves the major coal-mining centres of Queensland. The highway was named after Gregory, an early explorer.It runs southward from outside Georgetown off the Developmental Road, via Lynd Junction (The Lynd) and Charters Towers, to Springsure, over 900 kilometres away.North of Clermont it is known as the Gregory Developmental Road or the Great Inland Road and it is a very lonely road that was recently upgraded to almost completely dual-laned bitumen that used to be single lane. The road is used mainly by train.List of towns along the Gregory Highway*Lynd Junction*Charters Towers*Belyando Crossing*Clermont*Capella*Emerald*SpringsureSee also*in Australia*of highways in QueenslandHighwayHighway
1502182
Chest_radiograph
MeshID  D013902In medicine, a chest radiograph, commonly called a chest X-ray (CXR), is a projection radiograph of the chest used to diagnose conditions affecting the chest, its contents, and nearby structures. Chest radiographs are among the most common films taken, being diagnostic of many conditions.Like all methods of radiography, chest radiography employs radiation in the form of X-rays to generate images of the chest. The typical radiation dose to an adult from a chest radiograph is around 0.06 mSv.()Problems identifiedChest radiographs are used to diagnose many conditions involving the chest wall, bones of the thorax, and structures contained within the cavity including the lungs, heart, and vessels. Pneumonia and heart failure are very commonly diagnosed by chest radiograph. Chest radiographs are used to screen for job-related lung disease in industries such as mining where workers are exposed to dust.(Using Digital Chest Images to Monitor the Health of Coal Miners and Other Workers. National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health.)For some conditions of the chest, radiography is good for screening but poor for diagnosis. When a condition is suspected based on chest radiography, additional imaging of the chest can be obtained to definitively diagnose the condition or to provide evidence in favor of the diagnosis suggested by initial chest radiography.Unless a fractured rib is suspected of being displaced, and therefore likely to cause damage to the lungs and other tissue structures, x-ray of the chest is not necessary as it will not alter patient management.The main regions where a chest X-ray may identify problems may be summarized as ABCDEF by their first letters:(medicalmnemonics.com > Chest X-ray interpretation 2002)*Airways, including hilar adenopathy or enlargement*Breast shadows*Bones, e.g. rib fractures and lytic bone lesions*Cardiac silhoutte, detecting cardiac enlargement*Costophrenic angles, including pleural effusions*Diaphragm, e.g. evidence of free air*Edges, e.g. apices for fibrosis, pneumothorax, pleural thickening or plaques*Extrathoracic tissues*Fields (parenchyma), being evidence of alveolar filling*Failure, e.g. alveolar air space disease with prominent vascularity with or without pleural effusionsViewsFile:Chest labeled.png|thumb|300px|A chest radiograph with the angle parts of the ribs and some other landmarks labeled.Different views of the chest can be obtained by changing the relative orientation of the body and the direction of the x-ray beams. The most common views are posteroanterior, anteroposterior, and lateral. In an posteroanterior (PA) view, the x-ray source is positioned so that x-rays enter through the posterior (back) aspect of the chest, and exit out of the anterior (front) aspect where they are detected. To obtain this view, individuals stand facing a flat surface behind which is an x-ray detector. A radiation source is positioned behind the patient at a standard distance, and x-ray beams are transmitted toward the patient.In anteroposterior (AP) views, the positions of the x-ray source and detector are reversed: x-rays enter through the anterior aspect and exit through the posterior aspect of the chest. AP chest x-rays are harder to interpret than PA x-rays and are therefore generally reserved for situations where it is difficult for the patient to obtain a normal chest x-ray, such as when the patient cannot get out of bed.  In this situation, mobile X-ray equipment is used to obtain a lying down chest x-ray (known as a supine film).  As a result most supine films are also AP.Lateral views of the chest are obtained in a similar fashion as the posteroanterior views, except in the lateral view, the patient stands with both arms raised and the left side of the chest pressed against a flat surface.Typical viewsIn the States, initial imaging of the chest generally consists of PA and lateral views. In other countries, the PA view suffices as an initial study; the lateral view is only added if indicated from interpretation of the PA view.Additional views*Decubitus - useful for differentiating effusions from consolidation (e.g. pneumonia)and Loculated effusions from free fluid in the pleura. In effusions, the fluid layers out (by comparison to an up-right view, when it often accumulates in the angles).*Lordotic view - used to visualize the of the lung, to pick-up abnormalities such as a tumour.*Expiratory view - helpful for the diagnosis of pneumothorax*Oblique viewAbnormalitiesNoduleA nodule is a discrete opacity in the lung which may be caused by:* Neoplasm: benign or malignant* Granuloma: tuberculosis* Infection: round pneumonia* Vascular: infarct, varix, granulomatosis, arthritisThere are a number of features that are helpful in suggesting the diagnosis:* rate of growth** Doubling time of less than one month: sarcoma/infection/infarction/vascular** Doubling time of six to 18 months: benign tumour/malignant granuloma** Doubling time of more than 24 months: benign nodule malignancy* calcification* margin** smooth** lobulated** presence of a radiata* shape* siteIf the nodules are multiple, the differential is then smaller:*infection: tuberculosis, fungal infection, septic emboli*neoplasm: e.g., metastases, lymphoma, hamartoma*sarcoidosis*alveolitis*auto-immune disease: e.g., granulomatosis, arthritis*inhalation (e.g., pneumoconiosis)CavitiesA cavity is a walled hollow structure within the lungs. Diagnosis is aided by noting:*wall thickness*wall outline*changes in the surrounding lungThe causes include:*cancer (usually malignant)*infarct (usually from a pulmonary embolus)*infection: e.g., aureus, tuberculosis, negative bacteria (especially pneumoniae),anaerobic bacteria, and fungal *granulomatosisPleural abnormalitiesFluid in space between the lung and the chest wall is termed a effusion. There needs to be at least 75ml of pleural fluid in order to blunt the angle on the lateral chest radiograph, and 200ml on the posteroanterior chest radiograph. On a lateral decubitus, amounts as small as 5ml of fluid are possible. Pleural effusions typically have a meniscus visible on an erect chest radiograph, but loculated effusions (as occur with an empyema) may have a lenticular shape (the fluid making an angle with the chest wall).Pleural thickening may cause blunting of the costophrenic angle, but is distinguished from pleural fluid by the fact that it occurs as a linear shadow ascending vertically and clinging to the ribs.Diffuse shadowingThe differential for diffuse shadowing is very broad and can defeat even the most experienced radiologist. It is seldom possible to reach a diagnosis on the basis of the chest radiograph alone: high-resolution CT of the chest is usually required and sometimes a lung biopsy. The following features should be noted:*type of shadowing (lines, dots or rings)**reticular (crisscrossing lines)**shadow (lines paralleling bony landmarks)**nodular (lots of small dots)**rings or cysts**ground glass**consolidation (diffuse opacity with bronchograms)*location (where is the lesion worst?)**upper (e.g., sarcoid, tuberculosis, silicosis/pneumoconiosis, spondylitis, cell histiocytosis)**lower (e.g., fibrosing alveolitis, tissue disease, asbestosis, drug reactions)**central (e.g., oedema, proteinosis, lymphoma, sarcoma, PCP)**peripheral (e.g., fibrosing alveolitis, tissue disease, eosinophilic pneumonia, obliterans organizing pneumonia)*lung volume**increased (e.g., cell histiocytosis, lymphangioleiomyomatosis, fibrosis, bronchopulmonary aspergillosis)**decreased (e.g., fibrotic lung disease, chronic sarcoidosis, chronic extrinsic allergic alveolitis)effusions may occur with cancer, sarcoid, connective tissue diseases and lymphangioleiomyomatosis. The presence of a pleural effusion argues against pneumocystis pneumonia.;Reticular (linear) pattern:(sometimes called reticulonodular because of the appearance of nodules at the intersection of the lines, even though there are no true nodules present):*fibrosing alveolitis:*tissue disease:*sarcoidosis:*radiation fibrosis:*asbestosis:*lymphangitis carcinomatosis:*PCP;Nodular pattern:*sarcoidosis:*silicosis/pneumoconiosis:*allergic alveolitis;*cell histiocytosis;*carcinomatosa;*tuberculosis;*metastases;Cystic:*fibrosing alveolitis (late stage honeycomb lung):*cystic bronchiectasis:*cell histiocytosis:*lymphangioleiomyomatosis;Ground glass:*allergic alveolitis:*interstitial pneumonitis:*proteinosis:*respiratory distress syndrome (RDS);Consolidation:*Alveolar haemorrhage:*cell carcinoma:*vasculitis:*eosinophilic pneumoniaSigns:*The sign is especially helpful in localizing lung lesions.     (e.g., loss of right heart border in right middle lobe pneumonia),(Chest X-Ray, OB-GYN 101:  Introductory Obstetrics & Gynecology.  2003, 2004, 2005, 2008 Medical Education Division,   Brookside Associates, Ltd. Retrieved 9 February 2010.):*The bronchogram sign, where branching     radiolucent columns of air     corresponding to bronchi is seen,  usually indicates air-space (alveolar) disease, as from blood, pus, mucous, cells, protein surrounding the air bronchograms. This is seen in distress syndrome(LimitationsWhile chest radiographs are a cheap and relatively safe method of investigating diseases of the chest, there are a number of serious chest conditions that may be associated with a normal chest radiograph and other means of assessment may be necessary to make the diagnosis.  For example, a patient with an acute myocardial infarction may have a completely normal chest radiograph.See alsox-rayCTMRIReferencesExternal links* Chest X-ray Atlas* USUHS: Basic Chest X-Ray Review* eMedicine Radiology: Chest articles* Database of chest radiology related to emergency medicine* Introduction to chest radiology: a tutorial for learning to read a chest x-ray* Chest Radiology Tutorials Free Web Tutorials for Chest Anatomy and Lung Malignancies in Radiology  de:Rntgen-Thoraxde toraxdu thoraxnl:Thoraxfotoklatki piersiowejde traxhrudnkath:
1507051
List_of_Canadian_National_Railways_companies
The following were component companies of the National Railways in 1962, or predecessors of such companies:__NOTOC__A*Coal Company*Railroad*and Great Waterways Railway*Midland Railway*Railway*Gibson Railway and Manufacturing Company*Union Telegraph Company*and Belchertown Railroad*Belchertown and Palmer Railroad*Telegraph Company*and Atlantic Railway*and Lake Superior Railway*and St. Lawrence Railroad*Quebec and Western Railway*Limited* Train(Aqua train)B*des Chaleurs Railway*Granite Railway*City Terminal Railway*of Chaleurs Railway*of Quinte Railway and Navigation Company*of Quinte Railway*Junction Railway*and North Hastings Railway*Railway of Chicago (Belt Railway of Chicago, History.  Retrieved January 31, 2006.)*Hotel*and Barrys Bay Railway*Granite Railway*and Buffalo Joint Stock Railroad*Norfolk and Port Burwell Railway*and Fitchburg Railroad*and Whitehall Railroad*and American Express Company*and North American Express Company*Westport and North-Western Railway*and Westport Railway*Westport and Sault Ste. Marie Railway*Realty Company*and Moncton Branch Railway*and Moncton Railway*and Northumberland Strait Railway*Railway and Transportation Company*and Lake Huron Railway*Brantford and Goderich Railway*and Telkwa Valley Coal Company*Falls and French River Railway*and Lamoille Railroad*and Lamoille Valley Railroad*Inlet Tunnel and Bridge CompanyC*Air Line Railway*Atlantic Railway*Atlantic Transit Company*Atlantic Transit Company of U.S.*Eastern Railway*New Brunswick and Nova Scotia Railway*Airways*Express Company*Government Merchant Marine*Government Railways*Government Railways Employees Relief and Insurance Association*- Minnesota Bridge Company*National Electric Railways*National Express Company*National Hotels*National Land Settlement Association*National Lines - Niagara Frontier - New York*National Railway*National Railways - Eastern Lines*National Railways (France)*National Railways Pension Fund - 1929*National Railways Pension Fund - 1935*Canadian National Railways Radio*National Railways Securities Trust*National Railways Trust Company*National Realties*National Rolling Stock*National Steamship Company*National Telegraph Company*National Transfer Company*National Transportation*National (West Indies) Steamships*Northern Alberta Railway*Northern Branch Lines Company*Northern Coal and Ore Dock Company*Northern Consolidated Railways*Northern Express Company*Northern Manitoba Railway*Northern Montreal Tunnel and Terminal Company*Northern Ontario Railway*Northern Pacific Railway*Northern Quebec Railway*Northern Railway Arbitration Award*Northern Railway*Northern Railway Express Company*Northern Realties*Northern Rolling Stock*Northern Saskatchewan Railway*Northern Steamships*Northern System Terminals (Limited)*Northern Telegraph Company*Northern Transfer Company*Northern Western Railway*Yukon Railway*Oils*and Louisburg Railway*Breton Railway, Coal and Iron Company*Breton Railway*Breton Railway Extension Company*and Gulf Shore Railway*Railway*and Grenville Railway*Corporation*Canada Express Company*Canada Railway*Counties Railway*Ontario Railway*Railway Limited, (N.S.)*Vermont Airways Incorporated*Vermont Railroad*Vermont Railway*Vermont Railway Incorporated*Vermont Terminal Incorporated*Vermont Transit Corporation*Vermont Transportation Company*Vermont Warehouse Incorporated*and Connecticut River Railroad*and St. Lawrence Railroad*and St. Lawrence Railroad (New York)*Hotel*and Northern Railway*Laurier Hotel*Branch Railway*Railway*Rice and Company*Detroit and Canada Grand Trunk Junction Railroad*and Grand Trunk Railway*Kalamazoo and Saginaw Railway*and Kalamazoo Terminal Railroad*Lake County Railway*and Lake Huron Railroad*New York and Boston Refrigerator Company*and North Eastern Railroad*and Southern Railroad*and State Line Extension Railway*Chicago and State Line Railway*and Western Indiana Belt Railway*and Western Indiana Railroad*Saginaw and Mackinaw Railroad*and Suburban Electric Railway*Steamship Company*Railway of Nova Scotia*Blairton and Marmora Railway and Mining Company*Peterborough and Marmora Railway and Mining Company*and Peterborough Railway*Railroad*of Proprietors of the Champlain and St. Lawrence Railroad*Land Corporation*Railroad of Vermont*Realty and Holding Company*and Province Line Railway and Bridge Company*Transportation CompanyD*Navigation Company*Street Railway*Belt Railroad*Grand Haven and Milwaukee Railway*and Huron Railway*and Huron Railway*and Milwaukee Railroad*and Milwaukee Railway*and Pontiac Railroad*Terminal Railroad*and Toledo Shore Line Railroad*and Annapolis Railway*Telegraph Company*Telegraph Securities*County Railway*Rainy Lake and Winnipeg Railway*Virginia and Rainy Lake Railway*and Virginia Realty Company*Winnipeg and Pacific Railroad*Winnipeg and Pacific RailwayE*Richelieu Valley Railway*Transport*Extension Railway*Lands Department*Transport*District Railway*Dunvegan and British Columbia Railway*and Slave Lake Railway*Yukon and Pacific Railway*and Havelock Railway*Petitcodiac and Havelock Railway*Coal and Mining Company*Freightways*London and Tillsonburg Railway*and North American RailwayF*Properties*Falls Railway*Tramway Company*Garry Hotel*and Saint Marys Bridge Company*and Saint Marys Railway Bridge CompanyG*and Guelph Railway*Perth and James Bay Railway*and Rideau Railway*Lines*Bay and Wellington Railway*Haven and Milwaukee Transportation Company*Junction Railroad*Junction Railway of Canada*Junction Railway*Rapids Terminal Railroad*Trunk Car Ferry Line*Trunk Fire Brigade*Trunk, Georgian Bay and Lake Erie Railway*Trunk Junction Railway*Trunk Milwaukee Car Ferry Company*Trunk Pacific Alaska Steamship Company*Trunk Pacific Branch Lines Company*Trunk Pacific Coast Steamship Company*Trunk Pacific Development Company*Trunk Pacific Dock Company of Seattle*Trunk Pacific Railway*Trunk Pacific Saskatchewan Railway*Trunk Pacific Telegraph Company*Trunk Pacific Terminal Elevator Company (Limited)*Trunk Pacific Town and Development Company*Trunk - Pennsylvania Transportation Company*Trunk Pension Fund*Trunk Radio Communications*Trunk Railway of Canada*Trunk Railway Acquisition*Trunk Railway of Canada East*Trunk Railway Fire Brigade*Trunk Railway Insurance and Provident Society*Trunk Railway Literary and Scientific Institute*Trunk Railway of Canada Superannuation and Provident Fund*Trunk Railway Regiment*Trunk Terminal Warehousing Company*Trunk Western Railroad*Trunk Western Railway*and Victoria Beach Railway and Development Company*American and European Short Line Railway*Eastern Railway*Northern Elevator Company*Northern Construction Company*Great Northern Railway*Northern Railway of Canada*Northern Western Telegraph Company of Canada*Great Western Railway*Shore RailwayH*and Cape Breton Railway and Coal Company*and Eastern Railway*and Guysborough Railway*and South Western Railway*and Yarmouth Railway*and Lake Erie Railway*and North-Western Railway*and Port Dover Railway*and South Western Railway*and Toronto Railway*and Saint Martins Railway*Transport Company*Extension Railway*Elevator Company*Bay Railway*and Quebec RailwayI*Rolling Stock Company*Indiana Railway*Land Company*and Prince Edward Island Railways Employees, Provident Fund*Express Company of Canada, (Limited)*Railway*Railway Windsor Branch*Bridge Company*Railway of New Brunswick*Coal, Iron and Railway*Coal, Field and Railway*Railway and Coal Company*Railway*- Richmond Collieries and Railway of Canada*and Richmond Railway*Bancroft and Ottawa RailwayJ*Cartier Union Railway*Bay and Eastern Railway*Bay Railway*Park LodgeK*Northern Extension Railway*Northern Railway*Napanee and Western Railway*and Toronto Railway*Smiths Falls and Ottawa RailwayL*and Hochelaga Railway*Jacques Cartier and Maisonneuve Railway*Manitoba Railway and Canal Company*St. Joseph Hotel Company*St. Louis and Province Line Railway*Simcoe Junction Railway*Superior Branch - Grand Trunk Pacific Railway*Superior Terminals Company*Navigation Company (Limited)*Valley Extension Railroad*Building - Toronto*Springs Railroad*and Auburn Railroad*Fenelon Falls and Ottawa River Railway*and Milton Railway*and Milton Tramway Company*and Gore Railroad*and Grand Trunk Junction Railway*Huron and Bruce Railway*and Port Sarnia Railway*and Megantic Railway*Extension Railway*Laurentian Railway*Coals*CollieriesM*Hotel, Edmonton*River Railway*Mann and Company*and St. Lawrence Railway*Northern Railway*Railway*and South Eastern Railway*Gardens*Iron Company*Railway and Mining Company*Springs and Fort Covington Railroad*and Nipissing Railway*Tramway Company*Air Line Railway*Michigan Railway*and Victoria Beach Railway*Extension Railway*Railway of Canada*Superior Express*and Manitoba Railroad*and Ontario Bridge Company*Junction Railway*Railroad*Missisquoi Valley Railroad*and Buctouche Railway*and Northumberland Strait Railway*Holdings*Colonization Railway*and Gatineau Colonization Railway*and White River Railroad*and Bytown Railway*and Champlain Junction Railway*and Champlain Railroad*and City of Ottawa Junction Railway*and European Short Line Railway*and Bytown Railway*Chambly and Sorel Railway*and Champlain Junction Railway*and Champlain Railroad*and City of Ottawa Junction Railway*and European Short Line Railway*Fruit and Produce Terminal Company*Island Belt Line Railway*and Kingston Railroad*and Kingston Railway*and Lachine Railroad*and New York Railroad*Portland and Boston Railway*and Province Line Junction Railway*and Province Line Railway*Railway Terminus Company*and Sorel Railway*and Southern Counties Railway*Stock Yards Company*Telegraph Company*Terminal Railway*and Vermont Junction Railway*Warehousing Company*and North-Western Railway*Park Coals*Park Coal Syndicate*Royal Tunnel and Terminal Company*Railway and Navigation Company*RailwayN*Tamworth and Quebec Railway*Construction Company (Limited)*Terminals of Canada*Transcontinental Railway*Transcontinental Railway Branch Lines Company*Valley Railway and Transportation Company*Brunswick and Prince Edward Railway*Brunswick and Prince Edward Island Railway*England Elevator Company*Hotel*Northern and Western Railway*Railway*Railway Steamship Services*Glasgow Iron, Coal and Railway*London Northern Railroad*London, Willimantic and Palmer Railroad*London, Willimantic and Springfield Railroad*Westminster Southern Railway*and St. Catharines Street Railway*Falls International Bridge Company*Falls Suspension Bridge Company*Falls, Wesley Park and Clifton Tramway Company*Hamilton and Pacific Railway*Lower Arch Bridge Company*St. Catharines and Toronto Navigation Company (Limited)*St. Catharines and Toronto Railway*and Atlantic Railway*Railway*North Eastern Railway*Grey Railway*Railway*Shore Railway*Shore Railway and St. Maurice Navigation Company*Simcoe Railway*Alberta Railways Company*Consolidated Holding Company*Extension Railway*Extension Railways Company*and North-Western Railway*North-Western and Sault Ste. Marie Railway*and Pacific Junction Railway*Pacific and Manitoba Railway*Railroad, (N.Y.)*Railway, (N.B.)*Railway of Canada*Townsites*Straits Tunnel Railway*Western Grand Trunk Railway of Illinois and Indiana*Western Grand Trunk Railway of Michigan*Branch Railroad*Scotia Central Railway*Scotia Eastern Railway*Scotia Iron and Steel Company*Scotia, Nictaux and Atlantic Central Railway*Scotia Railway*Scotia Southern Railway*Scotia Southern Railway*Scotia Steel and Coal Company*Scotia Iron and Steel Company*Scotian Hotel, HalifaxO*and Ottawa Railroad*and Lake Champlain Railroad*Railroad*Bobcaygeon and North Peterborough Junction Railway*Belmont and Northern Railway*Car Ferry Company, (Limited)*and Ottawa Railway*and Rainy River Railway*Sault Ste. Marie Railway*Simcoe and Huron Railroad Union Company*Railway and Navigation Company*Arnprior and Parry Sound Railway*Arnprior and Renfrew Railway*and Parry Sound Railway*Rideau Valley and Brockville Railway*Terminals Railway*and Port Austin RailroadP*Northern and Omineca Railway*Sound Colonization Railway*Valley Railway*Southern Railway*Peninsular Railroad*Peninsular Railway*Railway - Illinois*Railway - Indiana*Railway - Michigan*Railway Extension Company*and Chemong Lake Railway*and Port Hope Railway*and Elgin Branch Railway*Bay Railway*and 49th Street Junction Railway*Oxford and Northern Railroad*Oxford and Port Austin Railroad*Arthur, Duluth and Western Railway*Dalhousie, St. Catharines and Thorold Electric Street Railway*Dalhousie and Thorold Railway*Dover and Lake Huron Railway*Hope, Lindsay and Beaverton Railway*Huron and Indiana Railway*Huron and Lake Michigan Railroad*Huron and Milwaukee Railway*Huron Railroad Tunnel Company*Whitby and Port Perry Railway*and North-Western Railway*Elevator Company*County Railway*and Berlin Junction Railway*and Berlin Railway*Edward County Railway*Edward Island Car Ferry Terminals*Edward Island Ferry Service*Edward Island Railway*Prince Charles*Prince David*Prince George*Prince Henry*Prince John*Prince Robert*Rupert Dry Dock and Shipyard*Rupert Hotel Site*Prince Rupert*Prince William*Markets*and Copp*Virgil and Companys ExpressQ*Long Lake and Saskatchewan Railroad and Steamboat Company*Bridge Company*Bridge and Railway*and Gosford Railway*and James Bay Railway*and Lake St. John Railway*Montmorency and Charlevoix Railway*Montreal, Ottawa and Occidental Railway*Montreal and Southern Railway*New Brunswick and Nova Scotia Railway*Oriental Railway*Railway Bridge Company*Railway, Light and Power Company*and Richmond Railroad*and Saguenay Railway*Quebec Southern Railway*Elizabeth HotelR*and River Coal Company*River Bridge Company*Credit Corporation*Express Agency, Incorporated*Assets Company*River Valley Railway*Newfoundland Company*and Victoria Colonization Railway*and Victoria Railway*and Western Railway*Mines Railway*and Burlington Railroad*RailroadS*and Lake St. John Railway*Boniface Western Land Company*Catharines, Merritton and Thorold Street Railway, Company*Catharines and Niagara Centre Railway*Catharines Street Railway*Charles and Huron River Railway*Clair Frontier Tunnel Company*Clair Tunnel Company*John and Quebec Railway Bridge Company*John and Quebec Railway*John and Quebec Railway Trust Company*John Valley Railway*Johns Dry Dock*Joseph Valley Railway*Lawrence and Atlantic Railroad*Lawrence, Lower Laurentian and Saguenay Railway*Lawrence and Ottawa Grand Junction Railroad*Louis, Richibucto and Buctouche, Railway*Martins Railway*Martins and Upham Railway*Maurice Railway and Navigation Company*and Albert Railway*and Harvey Railway. Company*and St. Lawrence Railroad*and North Western Railway*Bridge Company*Midland Railway*North Western Railway*Falls Terminal Railway*Immobiliere de la Rue Scribe*Chicago and Western Indiana Railroad*Norfolk Railway*Shore Railway*New England Railway*New England Railway*Vermont Railway*Shefford and Chambly Railroad*and Huron Railway*Railway Construction Company*Transfer and StorageT*Railway*Warehouse and Cartage Company*Warehouse Registered*Warehouse Company*Islands Railway*Transport*Bay Colonization Railway*and Ottawa Beach Railway*Railway and Terminal Company*Saginaw and Mackinaw Railroad*Saginaw and Muskegon Railway*Terminal Railroad*Belt Line Railway*Dwellings*Eastern Railway*and Goderich Railway*and Guelph Railway*and Hamilton Railway*Niagara and Western Railway*and Nipissing Eastern Extension Railway*and Nipissing Railway*and Ottawa Railway*- Peterborough Transport Company*Simcoe and Lake Huron Railroad Union Company*Simcoe and Muskoka Junction Railway*Suburban Railway*Suburban Street Railway*Terminals Railway*Townsite CompanyU*Counties Railway*States and Canada Railroad*States and Canada Railway*States Social Security LegislationV*Coal, Iron and Manufacturing Company*Railway*Buren Bridge Company*Dock*Hotel Company*Terminal Railway*Victoria and Eastern Railway and Navigation Company*and Canada Railroad*Central Railroad*and Massachusetts Railroad*and Province Line Railroad*Victoria Bridge*Dock*Hotel Site*RailwayW*Holdings*and North Eastern Railway*Junction Railway*Railway*and Georgian Bay Railway*Grey and Bruce Railway*River Railroad*Extension Railway*Union Telegraph Company*Vermont Railroad*High Park and Toronto Street Railway (Limited)*Car Company*and Port Perry Extension Railway*Port Perry and Lindsay Railway*and Hantsport Railway*Great Northern Railway*and Hudson Bay Railway*and Hudsons Bay Railway and Steamship Company*Land Company*and Northern Railway*Transfer Railway (Limited)Y*and Carleton RailwaySee also*RadioReferences*List of companies included in the Canadian National Railways, from CN Synoptical History of Organization, Capital Stock, Funded Debt and Other General Information (1962)(
1511699
Judgment_(Star_Trek:_Enterprise)
__NOTOC__Judgment is the 19th episode of Season 2 of Trek: Enterprise which originally aired on April 9, 2003.SynopsisCaptain Archer is tried at a Klingon tribunal for attacking a Klingon ship and inciting a rebellion.PlotArcher stands in the witness pit of a Klingon tribunal where hes charged with aiding rebels of the Empire and attacking a Klingon ship.Later, in his cell, Archer is visited by Phlox, who gives the Captain an update that diplomacy is well under way. Archer tells Phlox to ferry the message that no matter what the outcome, TPol will leave and keep the Enterprise crew safe.In court, the prosecutor, Orak, faces off against Archers Advocate, KolosArcher is not supposed to speak. Orak brings forth Captain (now Second Weapons Officer) Duras to testify. Duras tells a tale of confronting a belligerent Archer, who fires on the Klingon ship first. Archer cant hold his tongue, and is silenced with pain sticks.Kolos offers a deal if Archer gives up the rebels. Archer instead insists that Kolos actually put up a defense. Kolos relates that the courts used to be about justice, but now the warrior mindset is taking over and all victories are savored. With this history lesson in hand, Kolos reenters the court and fights for Archer. Archer tells his side, and Kolos relates to the numerous times Archer has helped the Empire in the past. Archer may be a meddler, and should be judged on that, not on what hes accused of.Archer is spared execution, but sentenced to life on the Klingon dilithium mining planet of Rura Penthe, where the average life expectancy of a prisoner is between 6 months and a year. Kolos protests, and is himself sentenced to a year at Rura Penthe. TPol stands by Archers original instructions, and does not stage a rescue. Instead, she uses some backdoor diplomatic channels, and some bribes, to arrange for opportunity and transport to get the captain back. Archer wants Kolos to return with him, but Kolos decides that if one man can make a difference, he can best do that by following the law he has served for so long and serving his sentence. Archer and Kolos part with a handclasp.However, the story does not tell how Archer got into the hands of the Klingons. It remains a mystery.BackgroundThe tribunal takes place on the planet Narendra III. In the Trek: The Next Generation episode Enterprise, it is revealed that the Klingon outpost on this planet was destroyed by the Romulans, in spite of a valiant defense from the USS Enterprise-C, which was also destroyed. It was that event which led to the Klingon-Federation alliance seen in TNG.External links****
1515778
Antarctic_Treaty_(Gundam)
The Antarctic Treaty is a fictional wartime treaty in the Century timeline of the sci-fi mecha anime Suit Gundam.The Antarctic Treaty states that:* All uses of nuclear weapons are prohibited* All uses of biological weapons are prohibited* All uses of chemical weapons are prohibited* Dropping space colonies or large asteroids onto Earth is prohibited* All POWs must be treated humanely* All neutral territories must be respected and combat operations in these regions are prohibited. The neutrality at Side 6 was recognized and respected Events Leading to the Treaty Prior to the treaty are a series of events happening before the original Gundam TV series Suit Gundam.  First told in Gundam Century( (ja)) in a detailed manner,  the first and second chapter, titled Zeon mobile forces and Background of Guerrilla warfare, mentions small conflicts of Guerrilla warfare started by of Zeon of Side 3 to claim independency from the Federation and on the third chapter, titled Operation British, is a detailed version of the opening narration of Mobile Suit Gundam, where Zeon declared an all-out war on the Earth Federation government on January 3, U.C.0079, starting the Year War. During the battle, Zeon forces gassed entire colonies, killing billions of people, and both sides used nuclear warheads in the battle. With the element of surprise and their nuclear-powered Zaku suits, the Zeon forces overwhelmed the Federation colonial garrisons. The Zeon forces then launched British, attempting to drop a depopulated colony cylinder onto the Federations Jaburo HQ in South America. However, the Earth Federation Space Force engaged the Zeon forces on the Earths orbit, and the battle caused the colony cylinder to disintegrate.  The fourth chapter, Disaster, follows the impact on the largest chunk hit Sydney, Australia and wiped out 16% of the continent, creating a 300-mile crater. The first week of war (known as the One Week Battle) resulted in the complete destruction of Side 1, 2 and 4, and catastrophic climate change on Earth, killing half of Earth Spheres population.()Gundam Century then jumps to the events happening in the beginning of Mobile Suit Gundam, yet Gundam Officials specifies in detail that after the failure in missing the primary target, Zeon forces then attempted to repeat Operation British by hijacking a colony in Side 5 (also known as Loum). The Earth Federations 1st Combine Fleet, under Revil, set out to intercept the Zeon fleet. The two forces engaged at Side 5 on January 15, and due to Zeons tactical advantage with their mobile suits, the of Loum ended in the destruction of 80% of the Federation fleet and the capture of General Revil.Although actually a victory, the outcome of the battle gave the Principality a huge propaganda advantage. With the Earth Federation severely demoralized, Zabi attempted to frighten the Federation into submission by threatening to drop the space fortress Luna II on Jaburo. The two side met in Antarctica to discuss the terms of Earth Federations surrender. However, General Revil escaped with the help of Federal agents and sympathizers within Zeon, arriving at Luna II just in time to broadcast his famous Zeon is exhausted speech, citing what he had seen in Side 3 and exposing Gihren Zabis bluff. Regaining the spirit to fight on, the Earth Federation rejected all terms of surrender, but agreed to discuss on issues regarding the rules of war. On January 31, U.C. 0079, both sides agreed on the treaty. Motivations In the Gundam Encyclopedia:Gundam Officials, the editor, Yuka Minakawa, quoted the original author of Mobile Suit Gundam, Tomino, in the Antarctic Treaty section in page 532, that the Federation needed the treaty to be signed because:* They had no effective way of defending themselves from colony drops, especially against the tactical advantage of Zeon mobile suits at the time* They knew Zeons main weakness was the scarcity of mineral resources, and prolonging the war meant taking the lead in mass-production of ships and weapons, thus a long-term strategic advantage* They needed time to catch up with their own mobile suit development.The same section also states the Principality of Zeon agreed to the treaty in light of the following factors:* The continual use of weapons of mass-destruction were also dangerous to Zeon, as the Federation Forces could retaliate back with NBC strikes. The EFSF had enough nuclear warheads stored in Luna II to completely annihilate Side 3 (a few thousand according to Gundam Officials).* The banning of of mass destruction meant that conventional/mobile warfare would be the norm. With their mobile suits, Zeon would have the tactical advantage  they already outpaced the Earth Federation in MS development, having successfully deployed their Zakus in real combat (although the Federation engineers proposed their own mobile suit research project in U.C.0078, the V didnt formally start until after the Battle of Loum, and the mass deployment of Federation mobile suits didnt appear until November, U.C.0079)* The treaty allowed Zeon to bring the battlefront down to the surface of Earth. Surface access was considered paramount because in a prolonged war scenario their raw material resources were insufficient (Zeons national strength was only 1/30 compared to the Federation), and they soon after started various mining operations on Earth (the biggest being the MQuve mining operations near Odessa).(Gundam Officials, P.532 Antarctic Treaty,  (ja)) Violations of the treaty Within the multiple storylines, the Antarctic Treaty did not remain in effect after the end of the war (in U.C.0080) but was effectively broken many times:* U.C. 0079: Odessa: Zeon CO MQuve, after realizing the Eastern and Western European theaters were lost, launched a nuclear missile at the advancing Federation forces as he retreated. The missile was successfully intercepted by Ray in the RX-78-2 Gundam. (Mobile Suit Gundam TV series storyline)* U.C. 0079: In the waning days of the war, Zeon covert ops forces under the command of Zeon commander Killing plan a nuclear strike against the Side 6 colony Libot, where the RX-78NT1 Gundam Alex is under development. Patrolling Federation vessels intercept Killings forces before the strike can be executed, saving the colony inhabitants. (Mobile Suit Gundam 0080:War in the Pocket)Events mistaken as violations of the treaty.All events below are commonly thought of as violations but as the treaty was no longer in effect after the OYW ended they did not violate the treaty, at least to the Earth Federation side.  Although to the Zeon side, the Zeon independent war never ended, and thus the 0083 development of GP02A was viewed as a violation of the treaty and thus Delaz fleet used this as a reason to use the atomic weapon and drop the colony. They may have violated the Granada peace accords but as that is different from the Antarctic treaty they should not be counted as violations of the Antarctic treaty. Gundam official states this When the Principality is dissolved at the end of the One Year War, the Antarctic Treaty becomes officially defunct. However, most of its provisions are enshrined as international law with the signing of the Granada peace accords..(Gundam official http://www.gundamofficial.com/worlds/uc/background/glossary_misc.html#antarctictreaty)* U.C. 0083: the Federation secretly contracted Electronics to develop the RX-78GP02A Physalis Gundam unit; the unit was designed to attack with the Mk.82 tactical nuclear warheads, and was capable of sustaining the shock resulting from such explosions with its massive shield; for this reason all official records of it were subsequently deleted. (Mobile Suit Gundam 0083:Stardust Memories)* U.C. 0083: Stardust: after successfully stealing the GP02A from Federations Torrington base in Australia, the Delaz Fleet, a remnant group of Zabi loyalists who refuse to accept defeat in One Year War, fired a nuclear warhead on the Federation Naval Review, destroying/disabling two thirds of the ships taking part. (Mobile Suit Gundam 0083:Stardust Memories)* U.C. 0083: Operation Stardust: the Delaz Fleet dropped a colony on the North American continent to drastically reduce Earths food production. (Mobile Suit Gundam 0083:Stardust Memories)* U.C. 0085: the 30 Bunch Incident: the Titans task force used G3 nerve gas on Side 1s 30th colony, which were actively protesting against Federations policies, killing all 3 million of its inhabitants. This inspired the first organized resistance to the Titans.* U.C. 0087: Gryps Conflict: the Titans gassed Side 2s 21st Block colony with G3 as a show of force. (Mobile Suit Zeta Gundam)* U.C. 0088: Karns Neo-Zeon dropped a colony on the city of Dublin, as a show of force and intimidation. (Mobile Suit ZZ Gundam)* U.C. 0093: Aznables Second Neo-Zeon dropped the space fortress Fifth Luna on the city of Lhasa (Earth Federations headquarter at the time), as part of a series of attempts to initiate a winter on planet Earth. (Mobile Suit Gundam: Chars Counter Attack)* U.C. 0093: Char Aznable attempted to drop the asteroid Axis on Earth, to complete his plan of rendering Earth uninhabitable and forcing the space migration of the whole human race. (Mobile Suit Gundam: Chars Counter Attack)* U.C. 0093: the Earth Federations Bell task force used nuclear missiles during the space battle to stop the Axis drop on Earth, but failed to destroy the asteroid. The asteroid was later pushed away by a resonating force field generated by Rays psychoframe-equipped  Gundam. (Mobile Suit Gundam: Chars Counter Attack)* U.C. 0099: the Moon Crisis: a group of Zeon remnants plan to terrorize the Earth Sphere by sabotaging and dropping a large portion of the Moon onto Earth. The plan is foiled by Earth Federal Forces. (Mobile Suit Gundam 0099: Moon Crisis)* U.C. 0100: with the reabsorption of the Republic of Zeon into the Earth Federation, the Antarctic Treaty becomes technically defunct. (Mobile Suit Gundam 0099: Moon Crisis) Outcome The Antarctic Treaty is defunct at the end of the Year War. With the signing of the Granada Accords, it is assumed that based on the numerous colony drops, colony exterminations, and nuclear warhead uses that the Granada Treaty lifts the ban on nuclear weaponry only, but still bans biological and chemical weapons.Referencesja:#
1518440
Rustenburg
Rustenburg (, , Afrikaans and Dutch: Town of Rest) is a city and a local municipality of 395,539 inhabitants (2001 National Census) situated at the foot of the Magaliesberg mountain range in North West Province of Africa. It was one of the official host cities of the FIFA World Cup, being in close proximity to Phokeng, capital of the Bafokeng Nation, where the Bafokeng Stadium is located. The national football team also used this as their base camp for the tournament.HistoryRustenburg is prominent in Afrikaner history. The town was established in 1851 as an administrative centre for a fertile farming area producing citrus fruit, tobacco, peanuts, sunflower seeds, maize, wheat and cattle.  On 10 February 1859, the local Reformed Church community was established. One of the oldest Boer settlements in the north, Rustenburg was the home of Kruger, president of the African Republic, who bought a 5 square kilometer farm to the north-west of the town in 1863. The homestead on his farm, Boekenhoutfontein, is now the Paul Kruger Country Museum. When the Boer and the British came to blows in the Boer War (1899), the territory around Rustenburg became a battlefield. The two sides clashed famously at nearby Mafikeng, where the British garrison found itself under siege for months. These battle sites can be explored from Rustenburg.Before colonial settlers arrived, the area had been settled by agrarian Setswana speaking tribes for several hundred years.Rustenburgs population is primarily people.  Many belong to the Bafokeng Nation, extensive landowners earning royalties from mining operations. The Royal Bafokeng are descendants of Sotho settlers who displaced the local tribes from the region, which they came to call place of dew (Phokeng). In the early 1800s, the Bafokeng and other Tswana communities were conquered in a series of devastating wars launched by an offshoot of the Zulu kingdom, called the Matabele.  The Boers had also fought the Zulu and Matabele, and so the Boers and Tswana found in the Matabele a common enemy.  The Tswana and Boers planned together and worked toward defeating the Matabele from a Sotho-Tswana kingdom to the south, and together, they defeated the Matebele.  As the Boers settled in the area, called their settlement Rustenburg because they had relatively friendly relations with their Bafokeng allies in the area, and after the many violent military conflicts with other African chiefdoms, such as the Matabele, they believed they could rest (rusten in Dutch) in this settlement, whose name literally means Resting Town.  Although had already long lived in the area when the Boers arrived, the Bafokeng bought land rights from the Boers, and they purchased their first tracts of land in the late nineteenth and early twentieth century from the colonial rulers, some in exchange for serving in the Wars. Although these land purchases were technically illegal, Paul Kruger, who would become a president of the Transvaal Boer Republic, but was then a veld kornet, was friendly to the Bafokeng and helped arrange many of these purchases.  The majority of people in the region 20 years after the fall of apartheid still live in abject poverty despite the massive profits yielded by the platinum royalties. This has led in recent years to claims of kleptocracy against the royal family and claim disputes.Among the first colonial residents of Rustenburg were settlers of Indian origin. One of the first families of Indian origin was the Bhyat family, whose contribution to the citys history was marked by the renaming of a major streetname to Fatima Bhayat Street in honour of Bhyat who arrived in Rustenburg with her husband in 1877.With the arrival and successul farming practices of the Afrikaners (Boers) in the nineteenth century, Rustenburg became a primary agricultural region with vast citrus estates due to the favourable climate and abundant water supply.Platinum mining in Rustenburg began in 1929, shortly after the discovery of the Platinum Reef by Merensky, later named the Reef.The town has been transformed from a region recognized around the world since the 19th century for its natural springs and healing environment, as eloquently described in the book Rustenburg Romance by author and poet Rosenthal into one of the most polluted environments in the late 20th and early 21st century South Africa. The wanton despoliation of the environment through mining has drawn comparisons to the Norilsk complex in Russia, one of the ten most polluted cities in the world.()With the implementation of apartheid after 1948 life became more severe for non-whites with 9pm curfews and the most stringent enforcement of laws in the country. This was welcomed by the mining industry as it gave them a tighter grip on the migrant labour which was the backbone of their operations.(http://www.nelsonmandela.org/omalley/index.php/site/q/03lv02167/04lv02264/05lv02303/06lv02317/07lv02318/08lv02323.htm) The pass laws were abolished with the fall of apartheid.The township of Boitekong on the norththeast side of Rustenburg has one of the highest incidence of AIDS orphans in South Africa (http://www.news24.com/SouthAfrica/News/72-000-new-infections-in-6-months-20101201) Boitekong was the venue for World AIDS Day commemoration in December 2010.(http://www.info.gov.za/speech/DynamicAction?pageid461&sid14998&tid25252)  The township is in a geographical area which bears the brunt of the catchment area of the toxic effects of the mining industry coupled with a very poor quality of water supply from the local Dam, the water from which was for decades considered too toxic for human consumption until water shortages in the nineties compelled the purification and supply to Boitekong. Life for the majority under the rule of the Royal Bafokeng has parallels to the apartheid era.  In the Apartheid era, forced removals of old settlements were on the basis of racial divide whereas now it is done for installation of massive mining operations sometimes engulfing entire villages. (see Rasimone on Google Earth)The Royal Bafokeng own the stadium selected as a World Cup 2010 venue, the only private stadium that hosted games in the 2010 World cup. The Royal Bafokeng regard themselves as a separate nation which is in contradiction to the nation espoused by Desmond Tutu and Mandela. This nationhood is regarded by many today as a and rule tactic orchestrated by the mining conglomerates which has subsequently led to the calls for nationalization of the mining industry by the Youth League.Agriculture in the region has been in constant decline since the decimation of the vast citrus estates of Rustenburg in the 70s and 80s due to pollution from increased smelting and beneficiating processes by mines. There are only a fraction of the original citrus farms remaining. Comparisons can be drawn between the Klondike gold rush and the events in Rustenburg in the late 20th and early 21st century which led to it becoming one of the fastest growing cities in South Africa.In 1990, the first post-Apartheid conference between the Gereformeerde Kerk (the Dutch Reformed Church in Africa) and the South African churches was held in Rustenburg. During this conference, professor Willie Jonker of the University of Stellenbosch made this confession on behalf of the entire DRC:I confess before you and before the Lord, not only my own sin and guilt,and my personal responsibility for the political, social, economic and structural wrongs that have been done to many of you and the results from which you and our whole country are still suffering, but vicariously I dare also to do that in the name of the NGK white DRC, of which I am a member, and for the Afrikaans people as a whole.()The conference finally resulted in the signing of the Rustenburg Declaration, which moved strongly toward complete confession, forgiveness, and restitution.()ClimateRustenburg has a temperate subtropical climate (Kppen Cwa), although it may be defined subtropical by some sources. It has very warm summers (from December to February) and mild winters (from June to August). Due to the altitude, summers are not quite as hot as one might expect. Precipitation occur mainly in summer.dateAugust 2010Platinum hubRustenburg acts as a service centre for the many industries here. These include the agricultural communities surrounding the town, the platinum mining industry and the local manufacturing and product distribution industries.Due to the mainly dry climatic conditions, agricultural activity consists of the farming of livestock (cattle and game) and small stock (poultry for egg production).  There is also large-scale cultivation of citrus and irrigated crops such as tobacco and wheat, flowers and many plant nurseries.Most of the mining activity in the region is centred around platinum on the Reef which stretches from west of the Game Reserve towards Marikana and Brits in the east.  The two largest platinum mines in the world are to be found here, and the area also produces asbestos, tin, chrome, lead, marble, granite and slate.Tourist hubThe city is located on major highway routes and close to 2 major centres, making it a hub for tourist activities.  Within the city are some historic churches, including the Church (1871) and the Reformed Church (1898&ndash;1903), the historic statue of the Voortrekker girl and the Rustenburg Museum.Communities and battlefieldsThere are a multitude of sites with cultural and historical significance in and around Rustenburg. This is no surprise, given the many different communities in the area, such as the indigenous Bafokeng, Bakgatla and Botswana tribes, whose totemic tribal traditions are of much interest. There is also the German community of Kroondal that traces its origins back to 1857.Many Anglo-Boer and ethnic war battles took place in the area with the districts of Koster, Swartruggens and Rustenburg featuring prominent battlefields, memorial graves and ruined forts.  The area also has archaeological remains from the Age and Age.Game parksBy far the best known attractions in this area are the major nature reserves that are all within striking distance of Rustenburg itself.*Kgaswane Game Reserve is situated above the town of Rustenburg across a varied habitat of quartzite mountain peaks, it is open to hikers as well as vehicle visitors. It is a 4 257 ha reserve that offers a great range of viewing experiences to wildlife enthusiasts.*Game Reserve and Groot Marico Park are huge reserves north of the Pilanesberg, almost half the size of Belgium. They are conservation and transition zone between the Kalahari sandveld and the thornveld. Madikwe hosts all the major plains species, including the Big Five and has the second largest concentration of elephants in South Africa. The reserve is one of South Africas great natural treasures.*Game Reserve is one of the most accessible South African game reserves. It is located a 1.5 hour drive from Johannesburg and Pretoria and right outside Rustenburg. It is the fourth largest National Park in South Africa and is set high in the Pilanesberg range, traversing the floor of an ancient, long-extinct volcano. Pilanesberg conserves all the major mammal species including lion, leopard, elephant, rhino and buffalo.Holiday resortsSun City and Lost City, located beyond the Pilanesberg Game Reserve, are resorts where visitors can lose themselves in the luxury of an imagined world, with all the modern entertainments one can ask for. The complex is set on the slopes of a picturesque valley in the Pilanesberg Mountains and captures the essence of an ancient African kingdom. Casinos, the Valley of the Waves and two world-renowned championship golf courses are just some of the many attractions.Sport*Rustenburg was one of the host cities of the FIFA World Cup with the 42 000 seat Bafokeng Stadiumhttp://www.southafrica.info/ess_info/sa_glance/facts.htm.*Professional Football Clubs: Stars*Rustenburg is home to another world-class stadium, Park. It hosted some of the Rugby World Cup games.*The city is a regular venue for numerous sport-clubs incl. Chiefs, Platinum Leopards, Springboks, Stars and various high profile athletics meets.*A local school, Horskool Rustenburg is also the school with the most provincial athletes of any school in Africa *Rustenburg Judo Club is one of the strongest clubs in South Africa, dominating the provincial team of North West Province and winning the most medals of any single club in South Africa in SA National Championships over the last 15 years.*Rustenburg SkyDiving Club - a popular skydiving facility for sports skydiving and parachuting, skydiving, Freefall (AFF) and line courses.(SkyDive Rustenburg,  SkyDive Rustenburg website link retrieved 14th March 2010)(Parachute Association of South Africa)Development*Rustenburg is also reported to be the fastest growing city in South Africa http://www.england2010.co.uk/Rustenburg.htm.*Rustenburg is home to the two largest platinum mines in the world and the worlds largest platinum refinery, PMR http://www.angloplatinum.com/ (Precious Metal Refiners), which processes around 70% of the worlds platinum.*As a result of the mining activity in the area, there is also an increased focus on social development. Rustenburg is one of only 5 South African cities to have a community foundation, called the Greater Rustenburg Community Foundation (GRCF), that seeks to ensure the regional development reaches all levels of society.Rustenburg AirfieldAirfield (FARG) is the Rustenburg Local Municipality Airfield, licensed according to Aviation Authority standards.(South African Civil Aviation Authority,  CAA website link retrieved 14th March 2010)  Rustenburg SkyDiving Club operates every weekend year round from the airfield.(SkyDive Rustenburg,  SkyDive Rustenburg website link retrieved 25th June 2010)Famous peopleFamous people with roots in Rustenburg include:*Alec - Christian broadcaster*Johan Botha - Opera singer*Botha - Politician and foreign minister (19771990)*Cranko - Ballet choreographer*du Plessis - Singer-songwriter*du Preez - Rugby union player*TerBlanche - Actress*Stander - Bank robber*Cilliers-Barnard - PainterReferencesExternal links*Rustenburg Local Municipality*Rustenburg SkyDiving Club*Rustenburg Directoryaf:Rustenburgar:()ca:Rustemburgcs:Rustenburgda:Rustenburgde:Rustenburges:Rustenburgeo:Rustenburgeu:Rustenburgfa:(Afrique du Sud)ga:Rustenburggl:Rustenburgko:hr:Rustenburgid:Rustenburgit:Rustenburghe:jv:Rustenburglv:Restenberhalt:Rustenburgashu:Rustenburgmr:ms:Rustenburg(Zuid-Afrika)ja:no:Rustenburgpnb:pl:Rustenburgpt:RustemburgoAfrica de Sudru:sr:fi:Rustenburgsv:Rustenburgth:uk:vi:Rustenburgyo:Rustenburgzh:
1521354
Stilfontein
footnotes               Stilfontein (Afrikaans for quiet spring) is a mining town with 96,242 inhabitants, situated between Klerksdorp and Potchefstroom in North West Province of Africa.Stilfontein was established in 1949 as a residential centre for three large gold mines, the Hartebeesfontein, Buffelsfontein and Stilfontein mines.Stilfontein was struck by a mining-related earthquake in 9 March 2005, which damaged buildings in the town, which was followed by the closure of the Hartebeesfontein and Buffelsfontein when the Stilfontein Gold Mining was handed over into liquidation.(http://www.sundaytimes.co.za/zones/sundaytimesNEW/business/business1115643437.aspx)  The Simmer and Jack Mines took over the mines but disaster struck again on the 23 March 2006 when a fire trapped 8 miners underground at the Buffelsfontein mine. Demographics According to the 2001 Census, the population of Stilfontein was 14,708. The racial distribution was as follows: 84.9% White, 14.2% Black, 0.8% Coloured and 0.1% Asian. The population density was 1,717 persons per km (663 persons per mi). The white population is very likely to have been undercounted, a common problem with the 2001 census.(http://mapserver.statssa.gov.za/GeographyWebsite/AdvancedReporting/stats_index.html) Tourist attractions *Hartebeesfontein Gold Mine *Annual Rose Festival in spring   References (af:Stilfonteinnl:Stilfonteinpl:Stilfonteinro:Stilfontein
1527824
Sidney_Kidman
Sir Sidney Kidman (9 May 1857  2 September 1935)(Russel Ward, Kidman, Sir Sidney (1857 - 1935), Dictionary of Biography, Volume 9, MUP, 1983, pp 583-585. Retrieved 23 August 2009) was a pastoralist in Australia and controlled huge tracts of land.Early lifeSidney Kidman was born near Adelaide (probably at South Australia) third son of George Kidman (died December 1857), farmer, and his wife Elizabeth Mary, ne Nunn.( Kidman was educated at private schools in Norwood and left his home near Adelaide at age 13 with only 5 shillings and a one-eyed horse that he had bought with his savings. He joined a drover, and learned quickly. He worked as a drover, stockman and livestock trader. He made money trading whatever was needed, and supplying services (transport, goods,  a butcher shop) to new mining towns springing up in outback South Wales and Australia (including Cobar, Kapunda, Burra and eventually Broken Hill. Eventually he and his brothers ended up working on the same station, then bought their own. The partnership with his brother Sackville lasted until his death in 1899.EnterpriseKidman saved money and bought a bullock team, opened a butchers shop and store at the Cobar copper rush and made good profits. When he was 21 he inherited 400 from his grandfathers estate and traded with it successfully in horses and cattle. Kidman was in his middle twenties when he acquired a one-fourteenth share in the Broken Hill Proprietary mine for 10 bullocks worth about 4 each. He sold his share for 150 less 50 commission and was satisfied with the profit. He had mail contracts on a fairly large scale and in 1886 bought Owen Springs station. Gradually he extended his holdings until they reached out into Queensland and New South Wales. The great drought in 1901 was a disaster to him, but the of New South Wales had faith in him and supported him. Within a year he had made 40,000 and began buying on a large scale again. He eventually owned or had a large interest in an enormous area of land variously stated to have covered from 85,000 to . Before War I he was a millionaire.Benefitting from their experience and observation, Kidman had built a vast network of connected stations stretching from both the of Carpentaria and the Fitzroy River in Australia down into South Australia near the Ranges and also across New South Wales. He could grow and fatten the cattle on the remote stations in the north, and bring them down the lines of stations to markets in the south, providing good feed and water on the way to sell them in top condition. Starting from nothing, he built up a huge pastoral business, with over a hundred stations with total area of more than 3% of Australia - allowing him to move his cattle from north to south along the great inland river systems and drought proofing his empire. He was also an entrepreneur with interests in many other rural industries such as transport.LegacyS Kidman and Co is still the largest private landholder in Australia, although now on a much smaller scale.In World War I he donated wool, meat, horses, ambulances and even fighter airplanes to the government. He also guaranteed the jobs of employees who went to fight in the war, and assisted the widows of those who didnt come back. He was knighted in 1921.In 2010 a new estate of some 300 plus allotments was established on the northern edge of Kapunda named 5 Shillings.The Adelaide suburb of Kidman Park was named after him.NotesExternal links* Kidman info at South Australian history* S. Kidman and Co website** * * Biography of Sydney Kidman associated with ABC TV program Dynasties* Cattle Kings of Old Australia quadrant.org.auKidman
1532722
Avusy
Avusy is a municipality in the canton of Geneva in Switzerland.HistoryAvusy is first mentioned in 1260 as Avussie.(GeographyAvusy has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 68.6% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 8.9% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 21.8% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 0.6% is either rivers or lakes and  or 0.2% is unproductive land.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Land Use Statistics 2009 data  accessed 25 March 2010)  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 8.5% and transportation infrastructure made up 3.5%.  Power and water infrastructure as well as other special developed areas made up 9.1% of the area  Out of the forested land, 4.4% of the total land area is heavily forested and 4.4% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 53.6% is used for growing crops and 8.5% is pastures, while 6.6% is used for orchards or vine crops.  All the water in the municipality is flowing water.(The municipality is located in the countryside outside Geneva.  It consists of the villages of Avusy-Village, Athenaz, Szegnin and the hamlet of Champlong.  The settlement of Seingier existed between the 13th and 15th Century, but has since vanished.  The municipality of Avusy consists of the sub-sections or villages of Le Chteau, Les Creux-du-Loup, Le Pigeonnier, Les Gravires and Le Renfort.(Canton of Geneva Statistical Office Liste des 475 sous-secteurs statistiques du canton de Genve.  accessed 18 April 2011)DemographicsAvusy has a population (lcon) of .  , 14.1% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (19992009 ) the population has changed at a rate of 17%.  It has changed at a rate of 9.1% due to migration and at a rate of 8.6% due to births and deaths.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 21-April-2011)  Most of the population () speaks French (1,019 or 86.6%), with German being second most common (55 or 4.7%) and English being third (50 or 4.2%).(, the gender distribution of the population was 49.0% male and 51.0% female.  The population was made up of 582 Swiss men (41.7% of the population) and 101 (7.2%) non-Swiss men.  There were 620 Swiss women (44.4%) and 92 (6.6%) non-Swiss women.(Canton of Geneva Statistical Office Population rsidante du canton de Genve, selon lorigine et le sexe, par commune, en mars 2011 accessed 18 April 2011)  Of the population in the municipality 251 or about 21.3% were born in Avusy and lived there in 2000.  There were 428 or 36.4% who were born in the same canton, while 193 or 16.4% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 258 or 21.9% were born outside of Switzerland.(  In  there were 7 live births to Swiss citizens and 2 births to non-Swiss citizens, and in same time span there were 6 deaths of Swiss citizens.  Ignoring immigration and emigration, the population of Swiss citizens increased by 1 while the foreign population increased by 2.  There was 1 Swiss man and 2 Swiss women who immigrated back to Switzerland.  At the same time, there were 4 non-Swiss men who immigrated from another country to Switzerland and 1 non-Swiss woman who emigrated from Switzerland to another country.  The total Swiss population change in 2008 (from all sources, including moves across municipal borders) was an increase of 53 and the non-Swiss population increased by 14 people.  This represents a population growth rate of 5.1%.(  The age distribution of the population () is children and teenagers (019 years old) make up 27.3% of the population, while adults (2064 years old) make up 64.7% and seniors (over 64 years old) make up 8%.(  , there were 507 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 594 married individuals, 21 widows or widowers and 55 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011) the average number of residents per living room was 0.61 which is about equal to the cantonal average of 0.64 per room.(  In this case, a room is defined as space of a housing unit of at least  as normal bedrooms, dining rooms, living rooms, kitchens and habitable cellars and attics.()  About 57.7% of the total households were owner occupied, or in other words did not pay rent (though they may have a mortgage or a rent-to-own agreement).(Urban Audit Glossary pg 17)  , there were 430 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.7 persons per household.(  There were 98 households that consist of only one person and 43 households with five or more people.  Out of a total of 443 households that answered this question, 22.1% were households made up of just one person and there were 3 adults who lived with their parents.  Of the rest of the households, there are 115 married couples without children, 184 married couples with children  There were 22 single parents with a child or children.  There were 8 households that were made up of unrelated people and 13 households that were made up of some sort of institution or another collective housing.(   there were 238 single family homes (or 72.3% of the total) out of a total of 329 inhabited buildings.  There were 46 multi-family buildings (14.0%), along with 31 multi-purpose buildings that were mostly used for housing (9.4%) and 14 other use buildings (commercial or industrial) that also had some housing (4.3%).  Of the single family homes 65 were built before 1919, while 19 were built between 1990 and 2000.  The greatest number of single family homes (92) were built between 1981 and 1990.(Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011)   there were 451 apartments in the municipality.  The most common apartment size was 4 rooms of which there were 99.  There were 21 single room apartments and 191 apartments with five or more rooms.  Of these apartments, a total of 416 apartments (92.2% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 27 apartments (6.0%) were seasonally occupied and 8 apartments (1.8%) were empty.(  , the construction rate of new housing units was 1.5 new units per 1000 residents.(  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 0%.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:960 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:1200TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:200 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:40 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1850 from:start till:510 text:510  bar:1860 from:start till:514 text:514  bar:1870 from:start till:535 text:535  bar:1880 from:start till:450 text:450  bar:1888 from:start till:463 text:463  bar:1900 from:start till:452 text:452  bar:1910 from:start till:381 text:381  bar:1920 from:start till:379 text:379  bar:1930 from:start till:356 text:356  bar:1941 from:start till:349 text:349  bar:1950 from:start till:343 text:343  bar:1960 from:start till:382 text:382  bar:1970 from:start till:488 text:488  bar:1980 from:start till:504 text:504  bar:1990 from:start till:908 text:908  bar:2000 from:start till:1177 text:1,177SightsThe entire village of Szegnin  is designated as part of the of Swiss Heritage Sites()PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the CVP which received 21.23% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the SVP (19.38%), the Green Party (17%) and the SP (13.97%).  In the federal election, a total of 424 votes were cast, and the turnout was 51.8%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)In the 2009 Grand Conseil election, there were a total of 874 registered voters of which 405 (46.3%) voted.  The most popular party in the municipality for this election was the PDC with 18.2% of the ballots.  In the canton-wide election they received the fifth highest proportion of votes.  The second most popular party was the Libral (with 13.4%), they were first in the canton-wide election, while the third most popular party was the Les Radicaux (with 12.9%), they were sixth in the canton-wide election.(Canton of Geneva Statistical Office Election Results from multiple spreadsheets  accessed 18 April 2011)For the 2009 Conseil dEtat election, there were a total of 865 registered voters of which 459 (53.1%) voted.(In 2011, all the municipalities held local elections, and in Avusy there were 13 spots open on the municipal council.  There were a total of 965 registered voters of which 590 (61.1%) voted.  Out of the 590 votes, there were 1 blank votes, 3 null or unreadable votes and 63 votes with a name that was not on the list.(Economy, Avusy had an unemployment rate of 4%.  , there were 48 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 13 businesses involved in this sector.  43 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 10 businesses in this sector.  72 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 31 businesses in this sector.(  There were 622 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 45.0% of the workforce.   the total number of equivalent jobs was 129.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 34, all of which were in agriculture.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 40 of which 10 or (25.0%) were in manufacturing, 17 or (42.5%) were in mining and 14 (35.0%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 55.  In the tertiary sector; 8 or 14.5% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 1 was in the movement and storage of goods, 10 or 18.2% were in a hotel or restaurant, 4 or 7.3% were in the information industry, 15 or 27.3% were technical professionals or scientists, 7 or 12.7% were in education and 1 was in health care.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011), there were 51 workers who commuted into the municipality and 531 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 10.4 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.  About 15.7% of the workforce coming into Avusy are coming from outside Switzerland.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 11.9% used public transportation to get to work, and 74.4% used a private car.(ReligionFrom the , 538 or 45.7% were Catholic, while 264 or 22.4% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there were 2 members of an Orthodox church (or about 0.17% of the population), there were 3 individuals (or about 0.25% of the population) who belonged to the Christian Catholic Church, and there were 12 individuals (or about 1.02% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 4 (or about 0.34% of the population) who were Islamic.  There were 2 individuals who were Buddhist, 2 individuals who were Hindu and 1 individual who belonged to another church.  281 (or about 23.87% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 68 individuals (or about 5.78% of the population) did not answer the question.(EducationIn Avusy about 392 or (33.3%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 305 or (25.9%) have completed additional higher education (either University or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 305 who completed tertiary schooling, 42.0% were Swiss men, 38.4% were Swiss women, 11.1% were non-Swiss men and 8.5% were non-Swiss women.(  During the 2009-2010 school year there were a total of 342 students in the Avusy school system.  The education system in the Canton of Geneva allows young children to attend two years of non-obligatory Kindergarten.()  During that school year, there were 32 children who were in a pre-kindergarten class.  The cantons school system provides two years of non-mandatory kindergarten and requires students to attend six years of school, with some of the children attending smaller, specialized classes.  In Avusy there were 46 students in kindergarten or primary school and 2 students were in the special, smaller classes.  The school program consists of three lower, obligatory years of schooling, followed by three to five years of optional, advanced schools.  There were 46 lower secondary students who attended school in Avusy.  There were 73 upper secondary students from the municipality along with 10 students who were in a professional, non-university track program.  An additional 29 students attended a private school.(Canton of Geneva Statistical Office Elves rsidant dans le canton de Genve, selon le niveau denseignement, par commune de domicile  accessed 18 April 2011)  , there were 5 students in Avusy who came from another municipality, while 134 residents attended schools outside the municipality.(ReferencesExternal links* Official Website *de:Avusyes:Avusyeo:Avusyfr:Avusyid:Avusyit:Avusylmo:Avusynl:Avusyja:rm:Avusysv:Avusyvi:Avusyvo:Avusywar:Avusyzh:
1537760
Herzogenrath
Herzogenrath is a municipality in the district of Aachen in the German state of Rhine-Westphalia. It borders the Dutch town of Kerkrade, the national border in one section running along the middle of a main road.HistoryHerzogenrath began in the 11th century as a settlement called Rode near the river Wurm. In 1104, Augustinian monks founded an abbey, called Kloosterrade, to the west of this settlement.It became s-Hertogenrode or s-Hertogenrade (Dutch: the Dukes Rode) after the of Brabant took control of the region; in French it was called Rolduc (Rode-le-Duc).As is the case for many parts of Limburg, Herzogenrath changed hands several times in the last few centuries. Together with the rest of the Netherlands, it was under Spanish control from 1661, Austrian between 1713 and 1795 and French between 1795 and 1813. In 1815, when the of the Netherlands was formed under the terms of the Congress, the border was drawn through the town, the eastern part being Prussian Herzogenrath and the western part Dutch Kerkrade. The former abbey is now the Rolduc Congress Center in Kerkrade. Economy Until the 1950s, Herzogenraths economy was dominated by coal mines and a nearby coking plant. While some remains of the mining industry still form parts of the landscape in the form of overgrown slag heaps, todays Herzogenrath has moved into other industries. Large-scale employers include Saint-Gobain, Aixtron, Vetrotex (textile glass) and Ericsson Eurolab (electronics). The city hosts a number of electronics start-ups, profiting from the neighbouring Technical University Aachen. References  External links * Official site af:Herzogenrathde:Herzogenrathet:Herzogenratheo:Herzogenrathfa:fr:Herzogenrathit:Herzogenrathli:Hertseroajnl:Herzogenrathpl:Herzogenrathpt:Herzogenrathro:Herzogenrathru:sr:sv:Herzogenrathvo:Herzogenrathwar:Herzogenrath
1540895
River_Ayr
The River Ayr (pronounced like air, Uisge ir in Gaelic), longest river in what was the old county of Ayrshire of Scotland, is approximately 65 kilometres in length. It originates at Loch in Ayrshire on the border of Lanarkshire and winds its way through East and South Ayrshire  to the town of Ayr, where it empties into the of Clyde of the Ocean.  On its way, the river passes through the villages of  Muirkirk,  Sorn, Catrine, Failford, Stair and Annbank. The river has a area of 574 km2.Principal tributaries include the Water, Water, of Fail and of Coyle. Major land uses within the catchment area are agriculture, forestry, mining, leisure and recreation and urban development, the largest settlements being Ayr, Cumnock, Catrine, Ochiltree, Muirkirk and Sorn.(http://www.ayrshireriverstrust.org/river-ayr.htm(Fluss)
1544659
Phalaborwa
Phalaborwa is a town (131,000 inhabitants) situated in the Mopani district, halfway up along the length of the National Park in the Limpopo province in Africa. The Lowveld, also known as Valley of the Olifants, has the highest winter temperatures in South Africa. The rainfall is low and the average winter temperatures range from 10.9 to 25.2 C. During summer the average temperatures vary from 20 to 47 C with occasional heavy rainfall. Originally a mining town (and still home to the Mining Company), it has developed over the years into a tourist attraction. PMCs open cast mine is Africas widest man-made hole at almost 2,000 meters wide.(http://www.showcaves.com/english/za/mines/Palabora.html). Tourism and wildlife play a dominant role in the life of this town. It is the only town in South Africa that borders the Kruger National Park, the Mozambiquan border is only two hours away.  The Hans Merensky Golf Estate is situated on the edge of town.River Canyon, the Rondavels, Window and Bourke Lucks Potholes, the Tzaneen and Hoedspruit attractions can be visited during the day.The name Ba-Phalaborwa, given to the area by the Sotho tribes who moved here from the south, means better than the south. The Sotho mined and smelted copper and iron ore here as far back as 400 AD. Masorini, near Phalaborwa gate, is a reconstructed Ba-Phalaborwa hill village, with huts, grain storage areas, and an iron, smelting site.There are two townships, Namakgale and Lulekani where the Pedi and Tsonga reside, and rural areas such as Mashishimale, Makushane and Ga-Maseke. It also the birth place of the babirwa baga malema who presently reside in the eastern part of Botswana. South African Fast bowler, Dale Steyn hails from this town.References( External links*Phalaborwa Trade & Tourismaf:Phalaborwade:Phalaborwafr:Phalaborwanl:Phalaborwapl:Phalaborwaro:Phalaborwaru:fi:Phalaborwa
1548838
Ken_Hechler
websitewww.kenhechler.us/Kenneth William Hechler (born September 20, 1914) is an American politician. A member of the Democratic Party, he represented Virginia in the House of Representatives from 1959 to 1977 and was Virginia Secretary of State from 1985 to 2001.BiographyEarly life and military serviceHechler was born in New York on September 20, 1914.() He holds a BA from College,() and an MA and PhD from University in history and government. Hechler served on the faculty of Columbia University, University, and College in the pre-war years.Hechler held a series of minor appointed positions in the federal civil service until he was drafted into the States Army during War II. After graduation from Armored Force Officer Candidate School, he was assigned as a combat historian in the European Theater of Operations, and following the war was assigned to interview many of the defendants prior to the Trials, including Gring.He was also attached to the 9th Armored Division when one of its infantry-tank task forces captured the Bridge spanning the Rhine river at Remagen, Germany. He interviewed several of both the US and German soldiers involved, and in 1957 published the book The Bridge at Remagen which was adapted into a film in 1969.Entry into politicsFile:RepsVisitMSFC1962.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Representative Hechler and other members of the House Committee on Science and Astronautics visit the Space Flight Center on March 9, 1962 to gather first-hand information of the nations space exploration program.()He then was a House assistant to S. Truman from 1949 to 1953  and Research Director for Adlai Stevensons 1956 campaign. From 1953-1957 he was associate director of the American Political Science Association in Washington, DC. Hechler then was appointed to the faculty at Marshall College (now University) in West Virginia. He ran for States House of Representatives from West Virginias Fourth Congressional District, which then included Huntington and many unionized mill towns along the River north of that industrial city, in 1958. He won a narrow victory by 3,500 votes.In Congress, he earned a reputation as a liberal Democrat and in 1965, he was the only member of Congress to march with Dr. Luther King at Alabama.( He was the principal architect of the Mine Safety and Health Act of 1969, which for the first time put a ceiling on the amount of respirable dust allowed in coal mines, and stipulated stringent safety regulations. He faced little opposition in Democratic primaries and was reelected eight times.Election of 1972Hechler faced a close race for the first (and as it turned out, only) time in 1972.  Following the 1970 Census, West Virginias declining population cost it a congressional district. The state legislature merged Hechlers district with most of the old 5th District, comprising several coal-mining counties around Bluefield and Beckley. The 5th had been represented by Democrat Kee of Bluefield since 1965, and members of his family had held the district continuously since 1933. On paper, the new district favored Kee, who retained 65 percent of his former territory. However, Hechler routed him in the Democratic primary by almost 26 points and easily won reelection in November. He was reelected in 1974 after being unopposed in the primary and general election.Running for GovernorIn 1976, he entered a multi-candidate primary for governor, but lost that statewide race by a large margin. He then attempted a write-in campaign in his old district against the Democratic nominee, Rahall. Rahall was a follower and former staffer for Byrd. He lost to Rahall in a close election, taking 36 percent of the vote and pushing the Republican candidate into third place, and lost again to Rahall in the Democratic primary of 1978. Following these unsuccessful political bids, Hechler resumed his teaching career at Marshall University, the of Charleston and Virginia State University.Later careerIn 1984 he ran for Virginia Secretary of State, winning. He was re-elected in 1988, 1992, and 1996. In 1990, he again ran, in the middle of his Secretarial term, for his old Congressional seat, but was defeated by Rahall in the primary. His term as Secretary of State is most known for his successful prosecution of Owens, who sold his position as sheriff of Mingo County for $100,000 and was sentenced to fourteen years in federal prison. He also persuaded the West Virginia State Legislature to require that candidates publicly register loans, with specific terms of repayment. There was a growing rift between him and union leaders over his support of tough environmental laws, thought by union leaders to be at the cost of jobs.As Secretary of State, in 1985 he moved his legal residence to Charleston. Charleston is located in the 2nd District, which was vacated in 2000 by nine-term Democrat Wise, who was running for governor. He lost a three-way Democratic primary bid for that seat. In 2000, he walked 530 miles in joining Doris Haddock (D) in her cross country walk on behalf of campaign finance reform, shortly before the passage of the McCain-Feingold Act. In 2004 he ran yet again for his old post as Secretary of State. This time, he won the Democratic primary by a plurality, but lost the general election to Republican Ireland.Since the 2004 electionSince 2004, Hechler has campaigned against removal mining. On June 23, 2009, Hechler, then aged 94, participated in a protest near removal mining sites in the West Virginia coalfields in the Coal River Valley along with others.(Update on Todays Daring Dragline Protest, Launches 7 Days That Will Shake Mountaintop Removal Operations) He was one of 29 protesters arrested for trespass.2010 U.S. Senate campaignOn July 21, 2010, he filed to run in the special election to succeed the late Senator Byrd, running in the primary against Gov. Manchin.()() Hechler indicated that his primary goal in entering the race is to draw attention to the devastating impact of removal mining in West Virginia.() Hechler lost to Manchin, with less than 20% of the vote.() He endorsed Jesse Johnson of the Party for the Senate seat.()Works*Ken Hechler, The enemy side of the hill: The 1945 background on the interrogation of German commanders as seen subjectively by Major Kenneth W. Hechler, U.S. Dept. of the Army (1949)*Ken Hechler, The Bridge at Remagen, Ballantine, First edition (January 1, 1957)**The Bridge at Remagen (Presidio War Classic; World War II), Presidio Press (July 26, 2005), ISBN 978-0891418603**The Bridge at Remagen: The Amazing Story of March 7, 1945 - The Day the Rhine River was Crossed, Pictorial Histories Pub, Rev Sub edition (December 30, 1993), ISBN 978-0929521794*Ken Hechler, Endless Space Frontier: A History of the House Committee on Science and Astronautics, 1959-1978 (Aas History Series), Univelt (February 1982), ISBN 978-0877031574*Ken Hechler, Working With Truman, Putnam Adult; First Edition (November 19, 1982), ISBN 978-0399127625**Ken Hechler, Working With Truman: A Personal Memoir of the White House Years (Give em Hell Harry Series), University of Missouri Press (March 1996), ISBN 978-0826210678*Ken Hechler, Holding the line the 51st Engineer Combat Battalion and the Battle of the Bulge, December 1944-January 1945 (SuDoc D 103.43/4:4), Office of History, U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (1988)**Ken Hechler, Holding the Line, University Press of the Pacific (January 30, 2005), ISBN 978-1410219626*Ken Hechler, River-Horse: The Logbook of a Boat Across America, Penguin Books (1991)*Ken Hechler, Hero of the Rhine: The Karl Timmermann Story, Pictorial Histories Publishing Company, (January 1, 2004), ISBN 978-1575101101*Ken Hechler, Super Marine!: The Sgt. Orland D. Buddy Jones Story, Pictorial Histories Publishing Company (January 2007), ISBN 978-1575101354ReferencesExternal links*Ken Hechler official site*Ken Hechler for West Virginia official campaign site**Oral History Interview with Ken Hechler, Harry S. Truman Library & Museum, November 29, 1985 by Niel M. Johnson*HechlerHechler
1553376
Kuruc
The kuruc (Hungarian: kurucok kuruc, Slovak: kuruci kuruc) was a term used to denote the armed anti-Habsburg rebels in Hungary between 1671 and 1711.The kuruc army was mostly made up of serfs, including Magyar Protestant peasants,(Sndor Bonkl, The Rusyns, Carpatho-Rusyn Research Center, 1990 p. 22) many Slovaks(Jlius Bartl, Slovak history: chronology & lexicon, Bolchazy-Carducci Publishers, 2002, p. 257)  and the leading nobles were usually Hungarians. NameAccording to Bel, an 18th century scholar, the word was first used in 1514 for the armed peasants led by Dzsa. Bel supposed that the word kuruc is derived from the Latin word cruciatus (crusader), ultimately from crux (cross); and Dzsas followers were called crusaders because the peasant rebellion started as an official crusade against the Ottomans.Today etymologists do not accept Bels theory and consider the wordemerging in the 1660s in the forms kurus, kuroc or kurudschto be of unknown origin. Its original meaning was understood as rebel, partisan, dissident.(Istvn Ttfalusi ed., Magyar Etimolgiai Nagysztr (Etymological Dictionary of Hungarian))In 1671 the name was used by Meni, the beglerbeg pasha of Eger in what is today Hungary, to denote the predominantly noble refugees from Royal Hungary. Afterwards the name became quickly popular and was used from 1671 to 1711 in texts written in Hungarian, Slovak and Turkish to denote the rebels of Royal Hungary and northern Transylvania, fighting against the Habsburgs and their policies.The rebels of the first kuruc uprising called themselves bjdosk (ie. fugitives) or in official long form: different fugitive ordersbarons, nobles, cavalry and infantry soldierswho fight for the material and spiritual liberty of the Hungarian motherland.The leader of the last of the kuruc rebellions, II Rkczi, also did not use this term. Contemporary sources often used the term malcontents to denote the rebels.The opposite term (widespread after 1678) was labanc (from the Hungarian word lobonc, literally long hair, referring to the wig worn by the Austrian soldiers), denoting Austrians and their loyalist supporters.HistoryThe first kuruc uprisingThe first kuruc uprising occurred in 1672. The kuruc army gathered in the Partium where many refugees of different origins took shelter from the religious and political persecution occurring in Hungary. They called themselves bjdosk (fugitives). Their weapons were mostly pistols, light sabres and fokos (battle-axes). Their tactics and style of war were typical of cavalry. The main subgroups were Protestants, who were disgruntled by Habsburg ambitions of the Counter-Reformation; nobles (from the minor nobility, holding on to their privileges, while the Habsburg Court made attempts to deprive impoverished nobles of their nobility) and soldiers from the vgvrs (frontier castles) who were sacked by Habsburg generals. Later, when the Turks lost ground to the imperial armies and Austrian despotism intensified, Habsburg oppression of Hungarians played an increasingly important role in the motivation of the kuruc.Initially, in August 1672 the kuruc army invaded Hungary where they conquered the castles of Disgyr, nod, Szendr and Tokaj. After they defeated the Habsburg army of von Spankau near Kassa the towns of Upper Hungary surrendered and many disaffected people joined them from the Slovak and Ruthenian population of the northern counties.The two leaders of the army of fugitives were Szepesi and Szuhay, members of the minor nobility who previously took part in other anti-Habsburg movements.According to the recollections of Szepesi the fugitives began looting in the northern countries: In the guise of persecuting the Papists they pillaged whole counties. We began killing the plunderers but to no availthey didnt respect any officers.The Hofkriegsrath of Vienna immediately took some measures: strengthened the Habsburg troops, called more soldiers from Hungary and made peace with the Hajduks. On 26 October 1672 the Habsburg army defeated the fugitives at Gyurke (later Hungarian Gyrke, Slovak urkov). The rebels retreated across the line of the Tisza.After this initial success the Habsburg government began systematic religious and political persecution in Royal Hungary. The most infamous case was the trial of 300 Protestant pastors who were sentenced to death in 1674, and who later were sold as galley slaves in Naples, causing public outcry all over Europe.Universitas of the fugitivesIn 1675 the fugitives occupied Debrecen. Later in that year the town was sacked again by three different armies as was not uncommon that time in troubled Hungary.The fugitives tried to organise themselves as an independent community called universitas or communitas. They issued decrees, sent envoys to foreign powers, made a seal and held Diets (assemblies). That time they were already called kuruc although they never called themselves so. Between 1674 and 1678 their leader was Count Wesselnyi, the cousin of the late Palatine Wesselnyi.The fugitives established diplomatic connections with Poland in 1674 and France in 1675. In May 1677 France, Poland, the Principality of Transylvania and the Universitas of the Fugitives signed a treaty in Warsaw. According to that King XIV of France guaranteed 100,000 tallers aid and assistance. The fugitives were obliged to attack the Habsburgs with an army of at least 15,000 people. I Apafi, the Prince of Transylvania gave military and financial support to the universitas.In the autumn of 1677 2,000 French, Polish and Tatar soldiers arrived in Upper Hungary. This small army, led by colonel Beaumont, wasnt able to seriously threaten the Habsburg supremacy. Royal Hungary became one seat of the European war between Leopold I and King XIV of France. The president of the Viennese Hofkriegsrath, Montecuccoli draw a plan of pacification under the title LUngheria nellanno 1677. According to that Hungary would be occupied by three Austrian armies, the remnants of the Hungarian constitution abolished and a grand-scale program of German colonisation implemented. Chancellor Hocher, one of the most influential man in the Habsburg government, agreed with Montecuccolis plan. In the Secret Council he declared that all Hungarians are traitors.Under Mihly TelekiIn 1678 the fugitives accepted Teleki, the Chancellor of Transylvania as their leader. Prince Apafi proclaimed war against the Habsburgs. Before that he had to beg leave the Ottoman Sultan (his overlord). The Sultan made an unacceptable condition: in the case of success all Royal Hungary should became part of the Ottoman Empire.On 5 April 1678 Prince Apafi issued an ambiguous declaration to the people of Hungary: he announced that himself together with the Polish and the French kings took up the arms against the heavy yoke of oppression and recommended the submission to the mighty Turkish Emperor with a reasonable mind and sharp eye.The kuruc army of Teleki together with the Polish and French troops advanced well into Upper Hungary but they immediately retreated into Transylvania at the sight of the first Habsburg regiments. The failure wrecked Telekis image as a competent leader. On the other hand a small kuruc cavalry troop (with only 8000 people) occupied for a short time the most important mining towns and castles of Lower Hungary.The great kuruc uprisingsIn 1678 one of the most influential young nobleman of Upper Hungary and Transylvania, Thkly declared war against the Habsburgs. In August 1678 Thklys army occupied almost all Lower and Upper Hungary. The Habsburg rule in Hungary quickly collapsed. The fugitives joined the Uprising, and officially elected him their leader in Szoboszl in January 1680. The kuruc troops were merged into Thklys own army.That time onwards the history of the kurucs are synonymous with the history of the two great anti-Habsburg uprisings in the Kingdom of Hungary between 1680 and 1711, i.e. the Uprising and the Uprising. Although these movements are generally called kuruc wars, these anti-Habsburg uprisings had a much wider social base and more complex political aims as the original kuruc movements. See the history of the great kuruc uprisings under their respective leaders, Thkly and II Rkczi.Later usageIn the first half of the 18th century the term was generally used to denote Hungarian cavalry soldiers (Hussars) serving in the Habsburg army, especially in the time of the of the Austrian Succession (17401748). Many former kuruc soldiers of the Uprising joined the Habsburg army after 1711.The Prussians were also called kurucs in Hungarian literature, for example by Gvadnyi in 1790. The reason behind this strange usage was that all the enemies of the labanc Habsburgs were considered synonymous with the kurucs.In the end of the 18th century the word went out of usage in common parlance, and became an exclusively historical term for the rebels of Rkczi and Thkly.In present-day Hungarian language kuruc is sometimes used to denote Hungarian national radicals. Kuruc is also a name of a far-right, nationalist Hungarian webpage (http://www.kuruc.info/). External links *A detailed timeline  of all kuruc uprisings*Connection with TransylvaniaReferencesca:Kuruccs:Kurucide:Kuruzenfr:Kuruchu:Kurucokpl:Kurucowiero:Curuiru:sk:Kurucisl:Kruci
1555251
History_of_salt
Salts ability to preserve food was a foundation of civilization. It eliminated the dependence on the seasonal availability of food and it allowed travel over long distances.  However, salt was difficult to obtain, and so it was a highly valued trade item. Many roads, such as the Salaria in Italy, had been established by the age.Today, salt is almost universally accessible, relatively cheap and often iodized. Sources There have been two main sources for salt: sea water and salt.  Rock salt occurs in vast beds of sedimentary evaporite minerals that result from the drying up of enclosed lakes, playas, and seas. Salt beds may be up to 350 m thick and underlie broad areas. In the States and Canada extensive underground beds extend from the Appalachian basin of western York through parts of Ontario and under much of the Michigan basin. Other deposits are in Texas, Ohio, Kansas, Mexico, Scotia, and Saskatchewan. In the Kingdom underground beds are found in Cheshire and around Droitwich.  Salzburg, Austria, was named the city of salt for its mines.(Kurlansky, Mark. Salt: A World History. Penguin Books, 2003 ISBN 0142001619) Tuzla in Bosnia and Herzegovina were named place of salt by Turks.Salt is extracted from underground beds either by mining or by mining using water.  In solution mining the salt reaches the surface as brine, which is then turned into salt crystals by evaporation. History  Antiquity and Middle Ages Aside from being a contributing factor in the development of civilization, salt was also used in the military practice of the earth by various peoples, beginning with the Assyrians.It is commonly believed that Roman soldiers were at certain times paid with salt. (They say the soldiers who did their job well were worth their salt.)()()() This, however, is debatable: salary derives from the Latin word salrium, possibly referring to money given to soldiers so they could buy salt.() The Republic and Empire controlled the price of salt, increasing it to raise money for wars, or lowering it to be sure that the poorest citizens could easily afford this important part of the diet.It was also of high value to the Hebrews, Greeks, the Chinese and other peoples of antiquity.Already in the early years of the Republic, with the growth of the city of Rome, roads were built to make transportation of salt to the capital city easier. An example was the Salaria (originally a Sabine trail), leading from Rome to the Sea. The Adriatic Sea, having a higher salinity due to its shallow depth, had more productive solar ponds compared with those of the Sea, much closer to Rome.During the late Empire and throughout the Ages salt was a precious commodity carried along the roads into the heartland of the Germanic tribes. Caravans consisting of as many as forty thousand camels traversed four hundred miles of the Sahara bearing salt to inland markets in the Sahel, sometimes trading salt for slaves: Timbuktu was a huge salt and slave market. Biblical references In the Old Testament, Mosaic law called for salt to be added to all burnt sacrifices (Lev. 2:13).The of Ezra (550 BC to 450 BC) associated accepting salt from a person with being in that persons service. In Ezra 4:14, the servants of I of Persia explain their loyalty to the King. When translated, it is either stated literally as because we have eaten the salt of the palace or more figuratively as because we have maintenance from the king.Salt is used as a metaphor in the Bible.  In the New Testament, Matthew 5:13, Jesus said, You are the salt of the earth.  He added that if the salt loses its flavor, it is good for nothing but to be trampled. Jesus said this in order to show his disciples how valuable they were and this saying is commonly used today to describe someone who is of particular value to society. In addition, the preservative quality of salt is in view here to show how the disciples were called to preserve the society and the world around them from moral decay. On another occasion, according to the Gospels, Jesus commanded his followers to have salt within them. Cities and wars File:Laesoe Saltsyderi 2011 ubt-5.JPG|thumb|Salt production on Ls, Denmark (reconstruction)Salt has played a prominent role in determining the power and location of the worlds great cities.  Liverpool rose from just a small English port to become the prime exporting port for the salt dug in the great Cheshire salt mines and thus became the entrept for much of the worlds salt in the 19th century.(Salt created and destroyed empires. The salt mines of Poland led to a vast kingdom in the 16th century, only to be destroyed when Germans brought in salt (to most of the world, considered superior to salt). Venice fought and won a war with Genoa over salt. However, Genoese Columbus and Caboto would later destroy the Mediterranean trade by introducing the World to the market.(Cities, states and duchies along the salt roads exacted heavy duties and taxes for the salt passing through their territories. This practice even caused the formation of cities, such as the city of Munich in 1158, when the then of Bavaria, the Lion, decided that the of Freising no longer needed their salt revenue.(The gabellea hated French salt taxwas enacted in 1286 and maintained until 1790.  Because of the gabelles, common salt was of such a high value that it caused mass population shifts and exodus, attracted invaders and caused wars.(In history, salt has been a major factor in outcome of wars. In the Revolutionary War, the British used Loyalists to intercept Rebel salt shipments and interfere with their ability to preserve food.( During the of 1812, salt brine was used to pay soldiers in the field, as the government was too poor to pay them with money. Before and Clark set out for the Territory, President Jefferson in his address to Congress mentioned a mountain of salt supposed to lie near the Missouri River, which would have been of immense value, as a reason for their expedition. (By 1810, new discoveries along the Kanawha and Sandy Rivers had greatly reduced the value of salt.){{During Indias independence movement, Gandhi organized the Satyagraha protest to demonstrate against the British salt tax.( English Wich towns Wich and wych are names associated (but not exclusively) with brine springs or wells in England. Originally derived from the Latin vicus, meaning place,   by the 11th century use of the wich suffix in placenames was associated with places with a specialised function including that of salt production.(Domesday Book)   Several English places carry the suffix and are historically related to salt, including the four Cheshire wiches of Middlewich, Nantwich, Northwich and Leftwich (a small village south of Northwich), and Droitwich in Worcestershire. Middlewich, Nantwich, Northwich and Droitwich are known as the Domesday Wiches due to their mention in the Book,  an indication of the significance of the salt-working towns in the economy of the region, and indeed of the country.( Salt trade During more modern times, it became more profitable to sell salted food than pure salt. Thus sources of food to salt went hand in hand with salt making. The British controlled saltworks in the Bahamas as well as American cod fisheries.(  This may have added to their economic clout during their 19th century imperial expansion period.  The search for oil in the late 19th and early 20th centuries used the technology and methods pioneered by salt miners, even to the degree that they looked for oil where salt domes were located.( see Spindletop Salt production On an industrial scale, salt is produced in one of two principal ways: the evaporation of salt water (brine) or by mining.  Evaporation can either be solar evaporation() or using some heating device. Solar evaporation of seawater In the correct climate (one for which the ratio of evaporation to rainfall is suitably high) it is possible to use solar evaporation of sea water to produce salt.  Brine is evaporated in a linked set of ponds until the solution is sufficiently concentrated by the final pond so that the salt crystallizes on the ponds floor. Open pan production from brine One of the traditional methods of salt production in more temperate climates is using open pans.()   In an open pan, salt brine is heated in large, shallow open pans.  Earliest examples date back to prehistoric times and the pans were made of either a type of ceramic called briquetage, or lead. Later examples were made from iron. This change coincided with a change from wood to coal for the purpose of heating the brine.() Brine would be pumped into the pans and concentrated by the heat of the fire burning underneath. As crystals of salt formed, these would be raked out and more brine added. Closed pan production under vacuum The open pan salt works has effectively been replaced with a closed pan system where the brine solution is evaporated under a partial vacuum.() Salt mines In the second half of the 19th century, industrial mining and new drilling techniques made the discovery of more and deeper deposits possible, increasing mine salts share of the market. Although mining salt was generally more expensive than extracting it from brine via solar evaporation of seawater, the introduction of this new source reduced the price of salt due to a reduction of monopolization. Extraction of salt from brine is still heavily used, for example, vacuum salt produced by British Salt in Middlewich has 57% of the UK market() for salt used in cooking. Other salt uses The earliest systematic exposition of the different kinds of salts, its uses, and the methods of its extraction was published in China around 2700 BCE. Hippocrates encouraged his fellow healers to make use of salt water to heal various ailments by immersing their patients in sea water. The ancient Greeks continued this, and in 1753, English author and physician Dr. Charles Russel published The Uses of Sea Water. See also * process* Salt Co. v. United States* salt* Garum* sauce* in Cheshire* chloride* salts* Riot* March References  Further reading * Salt Institute History of Salt* The Role of Salt in Eastern North American Prehistory External links * Graphic showing mineral needs of an average American pdf* Richard Cowen, The importance of salt (draft book chapter)de la salde la saldo salvan zout
1559976
Grasse_River
The Grasse River or Grass River (per 1905 decision of the Board on Geographic Names) is a () river in northern York, in the States.  The river was named after Joseph Paul de Grasse, comte de Grasse (1722-1788), a French admiral who assisted American forces during the Battle of Yorktown in the Revolutionary War. The river mainly flows northeast from the foothills of the Mountains into the Lawrence Valley, making up what is known as the greater Lawrence River Drainage Basin along with other tributaries such as the Oswegatchie and River.thumb|The Grasse River upstream of Massena, @ Hwy 56thumb|The Grasse River in Massena Centerthumb|Dredging of the Grasse Riverthumb|Sinking of the Steamer Sirius on the Grasse Riverthumb|Another of the Steamer SiriusThe sourceThe river is created by a series of small ponds, lakes and streams located in the northern New York towns of Russell, Clare and Clifton.  Two main branches of streams and ponds, known as the Northern Branch and Southern Branch, lay claim as the ultimate source. The southern branch is the dominant flow of the river, feeding off Pond and Little Moosehead Pond, and is located near the hamlet of Degrasse.  The weaker northern branch is fed from smaller ponds such as Pond, Pond and Pond near the hamlet of Russell, and runs through the River Wild Forest Reserve.  The two branches meet in the town of Russell and form the main branch of the river which slowly grows along its northeasterly track.This area of New York was first explored in the 1790s as part of the Purchase, in which Alexander Macomb, a wealthy Revolutionary-Era American merchant purchased 3.6 million acres (15,000 km) from New York State at 12 cents an acre.  This area was divided into counties and townships which were established between 1800 to 1815.  The area thrived on thick pine forests, stone quarries and the mining of various ores.  On the St. Lawrence Valley floor, the pine forests were razed and the land used for agriculture, and later for industry.The courseThe Grasse River, along with the other tributaries to the Lawrence River, served as a water power source for several mills in the towns and hamlets along its course.  Virtually none of these mills have survived, but stone foundations, burned out furnaces and other ancient structures can be located along its banks.  Several old world dams exist along the path of the Grasse River, while its so called twin sister river, the Raquette, contains a series of old and new age hydropower dams.The Grasse River makes it way through many small hamlets and two major towns, Massena and Canton.  From the town of Russell where its two source branches meet, the river makes it way down into the village of Canton flowing mostly north away from the Adirondack foothills.  It flows past the hamlets of Morley and Bucks Bridge into the town of Madrid.  The first of two major dams appears just several yards west of York State Route 345.  Just south of the dam is the Municipal Park which hosts several large events during the summer season.  The Country Club is located upriver from the park on the northern bank.  From this point the river flows northwards to the hamlet of Chase Mills near Creek State Park on the Lawrence River.  From Chase Mills, the river begins its northeasterly path into the town of Louisville passing through a series of small rapids or waterfalls, depending on the amount of water flowing.  The river then flows into the township and village of Massena, passing by the Massena Rod & Gun Club on the northern bank, in the town of Louisville.The Grasse River defines the northern edge of Massenas downtown district.  At the southern end of the village, the Raquette River was the location of the Health Spa and Health Spring.  Located several yards east of the downtown bridge on the Grasse River is the second remaining major dam of the river, known as the Dam or weir, standing only 34 feet (1 m) tall.  In the late 1990s, the mid-section of the weir was breached and now lies several yards away from the dam.The river continues to cut through the village of Massena to the eastern borders where the old Power Canal connects with the river.  This canal was constructed by the Reduction Company (now Alcoa) in the 1900s.  The canal connects the Grasse River with the St. Lawrence River and was used to supply a hydropower dam.  The dam was one of the first 10 hydro-dams built in the United States, operating until 1956 when the St. Lawrence River was flooded for the Lawrence Seaway Project.  The St. Lawrence River end of the canal is blocked off by a massive wall, known as the Intake (the village water supply is also drawn in through this wall).  On the Grasse River end, the cement and brick structure of the old powerhouse remains, without any equipment inside the original buildings.The river from the old powerhouse onwards is calm and level to its mouth in the Lawrence River.  This section of the river is the only section that can be traversed by motor/power boats, but activity is light as Lake St. Lawrence is the draw for boating in the area (which is behind a pair of shipping locks and two dams if one were trying to travel from the Grasse to the lake).  This was only possible during the construction of the old powerhouse, as the river was dredged to  along its course to the St. Lawrence.  At the mouth of the Grasse River is Lock, part of the Lawrence Seaway Shipping System.  Several hundred yards upriver from the mouth of the Grasse is a docking area which contains a large floating crane with replacement doors for the locks, and the tugboat Robinson Bay, which is used for icebreaking in the spring.Pollution and environmental degradationThere are high levels of PCB contamination in the last several miles of the Grasse, the most significant being located near the old powerhouse and at a drainage outlet on the river for the Alcoa plant located north.  Alcoa has spent years cleaning this section of river.  In an early attempt at cleanup, the company capped the river bottom so that the chemicals could not be released.  This plan failed due to the weir break in the village of Massena and resulting ice flows.  Before its breach, this weir had kept ice upriver longer, allowing it to melt.  Since it was breached, larger pieces of ice now flow down this section of river and have breached the river bottom cap.  It has also caused major erosion of the shoreline along this section of river, due to the ice gouging it out during the spring ice flows.Cleanup effortsIn 2005, a company was hired by ALCOA to remove the chemicals from the riverbed near what is known as Outfall One, one of the factorys water drainages just downriver from the powerhouse.  The river bottom was removed and piped into machines where it was cleaned and deposited in a private landfill on ALCOAs property.  ALCOA is also working on plans to prevent large chunks of ice from moving down this section of river.  Early plans called for large cement barriers to be built in the town of Louisville, but those plans have met some opposition from local residents.  Other ideas have included repairing and/or rebuilding the downtown weir in Massena, but many problems have cropped up, including that the weir is privately owned (by a deed that gives ownership over that section of river down to the bedrock).  The most recent idea, proposed by the Massena Electric Company, calls for a small one-turbine hydroelectric dam to be constructed about a half-mile downriver from the old weir.ReferencesSee also*of New York riversExternal links*
1561423
Yekepa
footnotes                Yekepa is a town in northern Liberia, lying near the Guinean border.  It was the base for Lamcos ore mining operation until it was destroyed in the Liberian Civil War.  Nearby Hill is one of the highest points in the nation. The community is home to the Bible College University.()Rehabilitation of the once prosperous mining town has now been taken up by Mittal, the steel giant.  The company received the green light in May 2007 after many a controversy. It has begun the reconstruction of hospital, schools and the township. External links * http://www.youtube.com/user/jensiator Movies from Yekepa* http://thejll.com/yekepa/home.shtml Images and info Yekepa* https://platypus.gruk.net/horde3/services/go.php?urlhttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.larsjohannesson.com%2Fphoto%2Falbums%2Fliberia-bilder%2F Images from Yekepa, the Mines and more, 2008 References da:Yekepafr:Yekepaja:pl:Yekepa
1564132
1852_in_South_Africa
__NOTOC__EventsJanuary* 17 January - The African Republic is established with the signing of the Sand River Convention February* 26 February - The British troopship, HMS Birkenhead is wrecked near Gansbaai, CapeMarch* 16 March - Voortrekker leaders, Pretorius and Potgieter reconcil Unknown date* Copper mining begins at SpringbokfonteinDeaths* 25 June - Heinrich Beil, musician and botanist, dies in Keurbooms River near BayReferencesSee of South African history for list of References
1567596
Zhytomyr_Oblast
 website                www.zhitomir-region.gov.uaZhytomyr Oblast (, translit. Zhytomyrska oblast; also referred to as Zhytomyrshchyna - ) is an oblast (province) of northern Ukraine. The administrative center of the oblast is the city of Zhytomyr. HistoryThe oblast was created as part of the Soviet Socialist Republic on September 22, 1937.The oblast is located in the historic region of  Polesia (, translit. Polissia).GeographyThe total area of the Zhytomyr Oblast encompasses . Among the points of interest it is important to mention the following sites that were nominated for the Wonders of Ukraine* Church of Saint Basil the Great (Ovruch)* village state preserve* Memorial Astronautical MuseumPopulationThe current estimated population of the oblast is 1,328,158 (as of 2006). Zhytomyr Oblast is the most important center of minority in Ukraine, which is numbered there at 49,000.EconomyThe economy of Zhytomyr Oblast mostly deals with mining of granite and other construction stone, forestry, agriculture and various machinery manufacturing.The northern part of the province is highly affected by the disaster: some of the towns and raions are devastated and are included in the Chernobyl zone, while others are prohibited from producing their own agriculture.Administrative divisionsThe Zhytomyr Oblast is subdivided into 23 raions (districts), and 5 of its cities are designated as separate raions within the oblast.  The districts of the Zhytomyr oblast include:* Andrushivka Raion (, translit. Andrushivskyi raion)* Baranivka Raion (, translit. Baranivskyi raion)* Berdychiv City ()* Berdychiv Raion (, translit. Berdychivskyi raion)* Raion (, translit. Brusylivskyi raion)* Cherniakhiv Raion (, translit. Cherniakhivskyi raion)* Chervonoarmiisk Raion (, translit. Chervonoarmiiskyi raion)* Chudniv Raion (, translit. Chudnivskyi raion)* Korosten City (, translit. Korosten)* Korosten Raion (, translit. Korostenskyi raion)* Korostyshiv Raion (, translit. Korostyshivskyi raion)* Luhyny Raion (, translit. Luhynskyi raion)* Liubar Raion (, translit. Liubarskyi raion)* Malyn City ()* Malyn Raion (, translit. Malynskyi raion)* Narodychi Raion (, translit. Narodytskyi raion)* Novohrad-Volynskyi City (, translit. Novohrad-Volynskyi)* Novohrad-Volynskyi Raion (, translit. Novohrad-Volynskyi raion)* Olevsk Raion (, translit. Olevskyi raion)* Ovruch Raion (, translit. Ovrutskyi raion)* Popilnia Raion (, translit. Popilnianskyi raion)* Radomyshl Raion (, translit. Radomyshlskyi raion)* Romaniv Raion (, translit. Romanivskyi raion)* Ruzhyn Raion (, translit. Ruzhynskyi raion)* Volodarsk-Volynskyi Raion (, translit. Volodarsko-Volynskyi raion)* Yemilchyne Raion (, translit. Emilchynskyi raion)* Zhytomyr City ()* Zhytomyr Raion (, translit. Zhytomyrskyi raion)Important citiesthumb|right|175px|Detailed map of Zhytomyr Oblast.Important cities of Zhytomyr Oblast include:* Baranivka* Berdychiv* Korosten* Malyn* Novohrad-Volynskyi* ZhytomyrNomenclatureMost of Ukraines oblasts are named after their capital cities, officially referred to as oblast centers (, translit. oblasnyi tsentr). The name of each oblast is a relative adjective, formed by adding a feminine suffix to the name of respective center city: Zhytomyr is the center of  the Zhytomyrska oblast (Lviv Oblast). Most oblasts are also sometimes referred to in a feminine noun form, following the convention of traditional regional place names, ending with the suffix -shchyna, as is the case with the Zhytomyr Oblast, Zhytomyrshchyna.See also* divisions of UkraineReferencessngde JytmyroblastSchytomyroblastde Zhytomyrprovincode JytomyroblastZhytomyrdi ytomyrapgabalssritisZjytomyrja:ytomierskide JitomirvilyetiJtomroblasoblastalueoblastOblast(tnh)Oblastzh:
1570195
Grand_Duke_George_Mikhailovich_of_Russia
 birth_place  Madrid, SpainGrand Duke George Mikhailovich of Russia (Russian: Georgiy Mikhailovich Romanov, Russian Cyrillic:   ; born 13 March 1981) is the apparent to Vladimirovna, Grand Duchess of Russia, a claimant to the disputed Headship of the Imperial Family of Russia. He uses as his title of pretension Tsarevich and Grand Duke of Russia with the style of Highness; as the son of a Prince of Prussia he also has the title Prince of Prussia with the style of Highness.Early lifeGeorge was born in Madrid in 1981, the son of Franz Wilhelm of Prussia (at the time styled HIH Grand Duke Michael Pavlovich of Russia) and Grand Duchess Maria Vladimirovna of Russia, only child of Cyrillovich, Grand Duke of Russia. He was baptised on 6 May 1981, in Madrid; his godfather is King II of Greece. Also present at the baptism were King Juan Carlos and Sofa of Spain and King Simeon II and Queen Margarita of Bulgaria.( Succession to the Imperial throne of Russia (Note: referenced document written in support of a disputed point of view.))Following his birth, George was given the title Duke of Russia by his maternal grandfather.(Massie p. 264)  Prince Vasili Alexandrovich, then president of the Family Association, responded in writing that The Romanov Family Association hereby declares that the joyful event in the Prussian Royal House does not concern the Romanov Family Association since the newborn prince is not a member of either the Russian Imperial House or of the Romanov family.(In anticipation of his eventual succession as pretender and with his maternal grandfathers approval, his mother applied for a change of name with the French authorities as Grand Duke George of Russia instead of Prinz of Preussen.( This was refused by the French Minister of Justice. His parents separated in 1982 and divorced in 1985. His father, who stopped using his Russian title after his separation, has said of his son, I have his German passport right here; I always carry it with me. It says he is Prince George of Prussia.(Massie, 270.)George spent the first years of his life in France before moving to Spain.() There he and his mother lived, along with his maternal grandmother, in the home of his maternal half-aunt, Helen Kirby, who inherited a significant fortune from her father, Sumner Moore Kirby.Heir to his motherOn 21 April 1992, upon the death of his maternal grandfather Grand Duke Vladimir Cyrillovich, Georges mother claimed to have succeeded as the sovereign and Curatrix of the Throne of Russia,(Dynastic Succession) making him, to supporters of his mother, heir-apparent and tsarevich. He visited Russia for the first time shortly thereafter to attend the funeral of his grandfather.( His claim to the throne is contested, for reasons detailed in the article on the of succession to the Russian throne.In 1996, when he, his mother, and his grandmother Leonida returned to Russia after living in Madrid, one of President Yeltsins former bodyguards was assigned as tutor to the 15-year-old prince. He was also set to study at a Russian Naval college but these plans were dropped out of concern that he would be bullied.()When asked by reporters if he expected the monarchy in Russia to be restored some day, he replied, I hope so. George is also distantly in the of succession to the British throne through his mothers descent from The Prince Alfred, Duke of Edinburgh and Saxe-Coburg-Gotha, second son of Victoria.  George is also descended through his father from Empress Frederick, eldest daughter of Victoria.Education and careerGeorge was educated at College in Madrid and at Benets Hall, Oxford.In Brussels, George worked at the Parliament where he was an assistant to de Palacio, former European Commissioner for Transport and Energy. Later he moved to Luxembourg where he was employed at the European Commissions Directorate-General for Atomic Energy and Security.On 12 December 2008, George was appointed an aide to the Director General of Norilsk Nickel, a major Russian nickel-mining company.(Georgy Romanov appointed as Advisor to General Director of MMC Norilsk Nickel.)AncestryReferences*External links* Official website of his mother* Official (English-language) website of the House of HohenzollernMijilovich Romnov (1981)Mikhalovitch de Russie (1981)ja:Michajowicz Romanow (ur. 1981) 
